S. 

241, 

PERMANENTLY 

THE
UNIVERSAL  SERVICE  FUND  FROM  PORTIONS 
OF  THE  ANTI–DEFICIENCY  ACT

EXEMPTING 

S.  HRG.  109–39

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

APRIL  11,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

21–486 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 11, 2005 ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller ...........................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Abshire, Sheryl, District Administrative Coordinator of Technology, Calcasieu 
Parish Public Schools ...........................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Dalton,  Patricia  A.,  Managing  Director,  Physical  Infrastructure  Issues,  U.S. 
Government Accountability Office ......................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Hamlen, Steve, President and CEO, United Utilities, Inc. ..................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Schlick,  Austin  C.,  Acting  General  Counsel,  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission; accompanied by Lisa Gelb, Deputy Chief, FCC’s Wireline Competi-
tion Bureau ...........................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Talbott,  Brian  L.,  Ph.D.,  Chairman  of  the  Board,  Universal  Service  Adminis-
trative Company ...................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
2
2
45
53
2
2
43
1
51

30
32

12
14
36
37

4
6

7
9

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

S.  241,  PERMANENTLY  EXEMPTING  THE
FROM

UNIVERSAL 
PORTIONS  OF  THE  ANTI–DEFICIENCY  ACT 

SERVICE 

FUND 

MONDAY,  APRIL  11,  2005

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:05  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Good  afternoon.  We  appreciate  it  if  the  wit-
nesses  could  come  forward.  We  are  going  to  convene  this  hearing 
to  examine  Senate  Bill  241,  it’s  a  bill  to  permanently  exempt  the 
Universal Service Fund from the Antideficiency Act. 

At  the  end  of  last  season,  Congress  had  to  move  quickly  to  pass 
a temporary 1-year exemption from the ADA to prevent further dis-
ruption  to  the  E-rate  program.  And  given  that  we  only  passed  a 
temporary  exemption  last  year,  our  Committee  must  now  look  at 
how we can permanently fix this problem. 

The witnesses are Austin Schlick, Acting General Counsel for the 
FCC, Lisa Gelb, for the FCC, Brian Talbott, Chairman of the Board 
of the Universal Service Administrative Company, Patricia Dalton, 
Managing  Director  of  Physical  Infrastructure  Issues  for  the  GAO, 
Sheryl Abshire, District Administrative Coordinator for Technology 
of, how do you say it, Calcasieu? 

Ms. ABSHIRE. Calcasieu. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Steve  Hamlen,  President  and  CEO,  United 

Utilities. 

I  should  announce  to  you  that  in  consideration  of  the  supple-
mental  appropriations  bill  that  contains  the  Defense  portion,  pri-
marily  it’s  a  Defense  matter  and  when  they  call  us,  we  are  going 
to  have  to  go,  so  we  hope  that  we  can  move  along  quickly  and  get 
your statements. 

And we would ask you to summarize them if possible in the short 
period of time and we will print the full written statement into the 
record without objection and it would be our hope that we can dis-
cuss  the  issues  that  you  will  present  to  us  as  quickly  as  possible 
with our apologies due to the problems of that supplemental appro-
priations bill. Senator Inouye. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator INOUYE. That’s right, Mr. Chairman. I thank you for con-
vening  this  hearing,  and  I’m  also  very  pleased  to  advise  you  that 
I  have  co-sponsored  this  measure  with  you,  Senators  Rockefeller 
and  Snowe.  And  I  request  that  my  full  statement  be  part  of  the 
record. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Mr. Chairman, I want to thank you for holding this hearing to examine the need 
to  exempt  the  Universal  Service  Fund  from  certain  accounting  provisions  of  the 
Antideficiency Act. I am pleased to cosponsor S. 241 with you, Senators Snowe and 
Rockefeller, and many others on this Committee. 

Schools, libraries and rural health care providers in all of our states rely on fund-
ing from the USF annually. My state of Hawaii alone has received over $27 million 
from the E-rate and Rural Health Care programs since they were created under the 
Telecommunications Act of 1996. 

However,  everyone  on  this  Committee  remembers  very  well  the  events  of  last 
year.  While  lawyers  and  policy  makers  in  Washington  argued  about  accounting 
rules  and  antideficiency  requirements,  schools,  libraries  and  rural  health  care  pro-
viders across the country were faced with the dilemma of shutting down or delaying 
deployment  of  innovative  educational  and  medical  services  because  of  unreliable 
funding.  For  many  people  in  the  affected  communities,  losing  access  to  these  serv-
ices  would  have  meant  losing  opportunities  to  change,  enrich,  and  improve  their 
lives.  With  your  leadership  Mr.  Chairman,  a  temporary  fix  was  enacted  during  the 
closing  days  of  session  last  Congress,  but  we  must  act  now  to  ensure  that  future 
disruptions to these critical programs do not occur. 

I  want  to  be  clear.  Congress  must  act  to  ensure  that  schools,  libraries,  and  rural 
health  care  providers  continue  to  receive  this  funding  in  a  timely  and  predictable 
manner.  I  believe  that  enacting  a  permanent  solution  must  be  one  of  our  highest 
priorites this session. 

Technology  is  transforming  how  we  receive  and  share  information,  and  in  turn, 
it  is  empowering  people  to  change  their  lives  and  the  life  of  their  communities.  Ac-
cess  to  the  Internet  is  the  encyclopedia  of  the  twenty-first  century,  and  I,  for  one, 
will not allow our young people to lose that access. 

I am pleased to hear from the panel of witnesses before us on the Universal Serv-
ice  Fund  and  the  issues  relating  to  the  Antideficiency  Act.  However,  it  seems  that 
we  are  missing  a  critical  perspective  at  the  table—the  Office  of  Management  and 
Budget,  which  has  raised  concerns  with  this  legislation.  We  would  like  to  have  a 
full record and I am disappointed that OMB is depriving us of their important per-
spective on this matter. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  is  a  very  serious  matter  and  we  must  work  hard  to  find  a 
solution.  I  commit  to  working  with  you  and  our  colleagues  to  move  this  legislation 
through the Congress. Thank you.

Senator STEVENS. Senator Rockefeller? 

STATEMENT OF THE HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV,

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. The same request, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Rockefeller follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV,

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Mr. Chairman, I deeply appreciate your cooperation in scheduling this hearing on 
the  applicability  of  the  Anti-deficiency  Act  to  the  Universal  Service  Fund.  I  would 
also like to thank you and Senator Inouye for your co-sponsorship of S. 241, Senator 
Snowe’s  and  my  bill  to  make  permanent  the  exemption  of  Universal  Service  from 
the Anti-deficiency Act. Our bill has bipartisan support with 29 cosponsors. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

I would note that this Committee has asked the Office of Management and Budg-
et  to  appear  to  discuss  their  objections  to  this  important  legislation—they  have  de-
clined to appear. I would also note that OMB has consistently refused to put in writ-
ing any objections they have. 

I  find  it  highly  inappropriate  to  have  the  Administration  object  to  a  bill  without 
the  courtesy  of  telling  me  why.  I  am  deeply  disappointed  by  the  Administration’s 
actions  in  this  manner.  OMB  was  the  driver  of  many  of  the  issues  we  are  facing 
here  today,  and  it  is  more  than  appropriate  that  they  should  be  testifying  to  their 
thoughts on addressing these issues. 

The  telecommunications,  education,  library,  rural  health,  and  consumer  commu-
nities  have  also  expressed  strong  support  for  this  bill.  It  is  my  understanding  that 
the  Committee  will  soon  mark-up  this  bill  and  I  hope  that  we  will  be  able  to  keep 
an accelerated schedule to adopt this bill. We need to act soon if to avoid the confu-
sion  and  problems  we  experienced  last  year  on  Universal  Service,  particularly  E-
rate and rural health care. 

Last  year,  the  Office  and  Management  and  Budget  and  the  Federal  Communica-
tions Commission imposed accounting changes on the Universal Service Administra-
tive  Corporation  (USAC)—the  non-profit  that  administers  the  Universal  Service 
Fund—resulting in the Anti-deficiency Act applying to the USF. 

Because  of  these  accounting  changes,  two  of  the  four  universal  service  programs 
were  suspended  for  several  months,  creating  enormous  difficulties  for  thousands  of 
schools and rural health care providers across the country. Some schools were forced 
to shut down their internet because they could not get funding from the E-rate pro-
grams.  Because  of  our  actions,  we  avoided  a  massive  disruption  in  the  operations 
of  our  nation’s  small  rural  telecommunications  firms  who  are  dependent  on  uni-
versal  service  funding  to  make  sure  they  can  connect  their  consumers  to  our  na-
tion’s telecommunications network. 

On  the  last  day  of  our  session  and  do  to  the  considerable  efforts  of  Senator  Ste-
vens  and  Senator  Burns,  we  secured  an  agreement  on  a  telecommunications  pack-
age  that  included  a  one-year  exemption  of  the  Anti-deficiency  Act  for  all  of  Uni-
versal Service. Today’s hearing will focus on S. 241, legislation to make the exemp-
tion permanent. 

Our  legislation  does  nothing  more  than  allow  the  Universal  Service  Fund  to  con-

tinue operating as it has since 1998. The benefits of this bill include:

(1)  Avoiding  a  massive  funding  disruption  to  schools,  libraries,  and  health  pro-
viders this summer;
(2)  Preventing  excessive  spikes  in  the  line-items  on  consumer  phone  bills;  and
(3) Providing financial stability our small telecommunications firms need.

We all know that we need to thoroughly debate and decide on a more comprehen-
sive  approach  to  telecommunication  policy,  including  financing  of  the  Universal 
Service Fund. In my view, this will take time. This bill is unrelated to broader ques-
tions  of  the  policies  we  must  adopt  to  the  Universal  Service  Fund  in  light  of  the 
telecommunications  changes  that  have  occurred  in  the  last  decade.  The  Anti-defi-
ciency  Act  is  an  arcane  budget  policy  we  can  address  independently  of  other  uni-
versal service fund issues. 

We  all  know  that  telecommunications  has  changed  dramatically  since  enactment 
of  the  1996  Act,  and  this  Committee  will  examine  what  changes  we  need  to  make 
to that law. I know that Senator Stevens and Snowe and the other Members of this 
Committee  are  deeply  aware  of  the  fundamental  importance  of  the  four  component 
Universal  Service  Funds—the  High  Cost  Fund,  the  Low-Income  Fund,  the  E-rate, 
and  the  Rural  Health  Fund.  In  1996,  we  agreed  in  our  historic  conference  report 
that:

‘‘. . . Universal  service  is  an  evolving  level  of  telecommunications  services  that 
the Commission shall establish periodically under this section . . . the definition of 
the  services  that  are  supported  by  Federal  universal  service  support  mechanisms 
shall  consider  the  extent  to  which  such  telecommunications  services  are  essential 
to education, public health or public safety . . .’’

I  still  strongly  believe  in  the  principles  of  Universal  Service,  and  I  am  confident 
that we can forge consensus among the telecommunications industry on ways to ful-
fill these continuing obligations are part of ongoing telecommunications reform. 

But knowing the power and importance of telecommunications in our economy we 
cannot  let  our  rural  areas,  our  low-income  families,  our  school  and  libraries,  or  our 
rural health clinics be left out and isolated. These institutions cannot afford to have 
their  universal  service  funding  disrupted.  We  should  enact  our  Anti-deficiency  ex-
emption as an interim step to safe guard all aspects of Universal Service. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

Again,  I  would  like  to  thank  the  Committee’s  Co-Chairman—Senators  Stevens 

and Inouye for all of their assistance with this legislation.

Senator  STEVENS.  Without  objection,  all  statements  are  printed 
in  the  record,  including  those  Senators  that  come  in,  if  they  wish 
to  insert  them.  Let  us  start  first  with  the  Acting  General  Counsel 
of the FCC. 

STATEMENT  OF  AUSTIN  C.  SCHLICK,  ACTING  GENERAL
COUNSEL,  FEDERAL  COMMUNICATIONS  COMMISSION;
ACCOMPANIED  BY  LISA  GELB,  DEPUTY  CHIEF,  FCC’S 
WIRELINE COMPETITION BUREAU 
Mr.  SCHLICK.  Good  afternoon.  My  name  is  Austin  Schlick.  I’m 
the  Acting  General  Counsel  for  the  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission. Thank you for this opportunity to appear before you to dis-
cuss  S.  241  and  application  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  to  the  Uni-
versal  Service  Fund.  Appearing  with  me  this  afternoon  is  Lisa 
Gelb, Deputy Chief of the FCC’s Wireline Competition Bureau. Ms. 
Gelb will address any questions you may have for the Commission 
about operational aspects of the Universal Service Fund. 

The  Antideficiency  Act  prohibits  government  expenditures  and 
obligations  in  excess  of  the  amounts  available  in  an  appropriation, 
fund  or  apportionment.  The  central  purpose  of  the  Antideficiency 
Act  is  to  prevent  Federal  agencies  from  incurring  obligations  that 
would  require  them  to  receive  additional  appropriations  from  Con-
gress. 

The Universal Service Fund is funded by industry contributions, 
not  Congressional  appropriations.  Nevertheless,  the  Antideficiency 
Act  applies  to  the  Universal  Service  Fund  because  the  fund  is  rec-
ognized by OMB, CBO, and GAO as a permanent indefinite appro-
priation. In September 2004, the FCC concluded the Fund was op-
erating in violation of the Antideficiency Act. 

The events that led the agency to that conclusion began in Octo-
ber  2003  when  the  Commission  adopted  a  rule  requiring  USAC  to 
account  for  the  financial  transactions  of  the  Universal  Service 
Fund in accordance with government accounting principles for Fed-
eral agencies, known as GovGAAP, beginning with fiscal year 2005. 
The  decision  to  require  USAC  to  adhere  to  GovGAAP  for  trans-
actions  of  the  Fund  was  based  on  the  need  to  bring  the  FCC  into 
compliance  with  statutory  and  OMB  requirements  for  financial  re-
porting. 

The  transition  to  GovGAAP  standards  highlighted  new  account-
ing  issues  in  the  E-rate  and  rural  health  care  programs.  In  those 
programs,  USAC  issues  a  funding  commitment  decision  letter  that 
notifies  program  applicants  which  specific  services  will  be  funded 
under  the  program  and  the  amount  of  funding  that  will  be  pro-
vided. 

In  the  process  of  implementing  GovGAAP,  the  question  arose 
whether commitment letters issued by USAC constitute obligations 
for  purposes  of  applying  the  Antideficiency  Act.  In  addition,  OMB 
informally  advised  the  Commission  and  USAC  the  USF  moneys 
that  were  invested  in  Federal  securities  might  not  be  considered 
available reserves that could be used to offset obligations under the 
Antideficiency Act. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

In August of 2004, USAC suspended issuance of all commitment 
letters  in  the  E-rate  and  rural  healthcare  programs  until  those 
questions were answered. 

In  September  of  2004,  the  Commission’s  Office  of  General  Coun-
sel  concluded  that  the  USAC  commitment  letters  do  constitute  re-
cordable obligations for purposes of applying the Antideficiency Act 
and USAC’s non-Federal investments could not be treated as avail-
able funds. 

Both OMB and GAO have since rendered opinions agreeing with 

the FCC’s application of the Antideficiency Act. 

On  September  27,  2004,  the  FCC’s  managing  director  and  chief 
of  the  FCC’s  Wireline  Competition  Bureau  directed  USAC  to  liq-
uidate its non-Federal investments in order to have sufficient cash 
on  hand  to  comply  with  the  Antideficiency  Act.  The  deficiency  was 
cured as of September 30th, 2004. 

The  FCC  has  also 

the 
Antideficiency Act to the high cost and low income support mecha-
nisms  of  the  Universal  Service  Fund.  In  the  high  cost  and  low  in-
come  support  programs  there  is  no  specific  obligational  document 
equivalent to commitment letters in the E-rate program. 

the  application  of 

considered 

Our  tentative  view  is  that  obligations  in  these  programs  do  not 
occur  until  USAC  signs  an  internal  disbursement  authorization 
that  determines  the  amounts  each  carrier  should  be  paid  for  tele-
phone services provided during the prior month. 

Assuming  the  Fund  has  adequate  cash  on  hand  to  cover  those 
disbursement decisions, operation of high cost and low income pro-
grams  complies  with  the  Antideficiency  Act.  Given  the  importance 
of  the  issue,  however,  the  Commission  has  sought  OMB’s  expert 
guidance. 

Enactment  of  Public  Law  108–494  in  December  2004  permitted 
the  Fund,  for  1  year,  to  incur  obligations  prior  to  receipt  of  cash 
to  cover  those  obligations.  The  obligations  incurred  during  the  ex-
emption 
the 
Antideficiency Act. As a result, during 2005 USAC may issue com-
mitment  letters  in  the  E-rate  program  and  rural  health  care  pro-
gram  without  having  to  have  cash  on  hand  at  that  time  to  cover 
the associated future disbursements. 

permanently 

Because  the  current  exemption  expires  at  the  end  of  2005,  the 
Commission is proceeding cautiously by protecting cash reserves in 
the  Fund  that  may  be  needed  for  Antideficiency  Act  compliance  in 
the future. 

First, on December 22nd, 2004, the FCC staff directed USAC not 
to shift funds out of the Federal investments that qualify as avail-
able  amounts  under  the  Antideficiency  Act  without  prior  approval. 
Second,  on  March  17th,  2005,  the  FCC  staff  directed  USAC  not  to 
issue  commitment  letters  for  the  E-rate  and  rural  health  care  pro-
grams in amounts that exceed the annual disbursement caps estab-
lished by the FCC. 

The  determinations  by  the  FCC,  OMB  and  GAO  that  commit-
ment letters constitute recordable obligations mean that as of Jan-
uary  1,  2006,  the  commitment  letters  may  not  be  issued  by  USAC 
unless there is sufficient cash on hand to cover the obligations. 

exempt 

period 

remain 

from 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

S.  241,  however,  would  make  permanent  the  Fund’s  current  ex-
emption from the Antideficiency Act’s restrictions on obligations in 
excess of available resources. 

Thank you for the opportunity to provide the Commission’s views 
on  the  impact  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  on  the  Universal  Service 
Fund. Ms. Gelb and I will be happy to answer your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Schlick follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF AUSTIN C. SCHLICK, ACTING GENERAL COUNSEL, FEDERAL 

COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Good afternoon, Mr. Chairman, Senator Inouye, and distinguished Members of the 
Committee.  Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  to  discuss  S.  241 
and application of the Antideficiency Act to the Universal Service Fund (Fund). Ap-
pearing  with  me  this  afternoon  is  Lisa  Gelb,  Deputy  Chief  of  the  FCC’s  Wireline 
Competition  Bureau.  Ms.  Gelb  will  address  any  questions  you  may  have  for  the 
Commission about operational aspects of the Universal Service program. 

The  Antideficiency  Act  prohibits  government  expenditures  and  obligations  in  ex-
cess of the amounts available in an appropriation, fund, or apportionment. The cen-
tral  purpose  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  is  to  prevent  federal  agencies  from  incurring 
obligations  that  would  require  them  to  seek  additional  appropriations  from  Con-
gress. The Universal Service Fund is funded by industry contributions, not congres-
sional  appropriations.  Nevertheless,  the  Antideficiency  Act  applies  to  the  Universal 
Service  Fund  because  the  Fund  is  recognized  by  the  Office  of  Management  and 
Budget (OMB), the Congressional Budget Office, and the Government Accountability 
Office (GAO) as a permanent indefinite appropriation. In September 2004, the FCC 
concluded that the Fund was operating in violation of the Antideficiency Act. 

The  events  that  led  the  agency  to  that  conclusion  began  in  October  2003,  when 
the  Commission  adopted  a  rule  requiring  the  Universal  Service  Administrative 
Company  (USAC)  to  account  for  the  financial  transactions  of  the  Universal  Service 
Fund  in  accordance  with  government  accounting  principles  for  federal  agencies, 
known  as  GovGAAP,  beginning  with  Fiscal  Year  2005.  The  decision  to  require 
USAC  to  adhere  to  GovGAAP  for  transactions  of  the  Fund  was  based  on  the  need 
to  bring  the  FCC  into  compliance  with  statutory  and  OMB  requirements  for  finan-
cial reporting for federal agencies and their programs. 

The  transition  to  GovGAAP  standards  highlighted  new  accounting  issues  in  the 
E-rate and rural health care programs. In those programs, USAC issues a Funding 
Commitment  Decision  Letter  that  notifies  program  applicants  which  specific  serv-
ices  will  be  funded  under  the  program  and  the  amount  of  funding  that  will  be  pro-
vided.  In  the  process  of  implementing  GovGAAP,  the  question  arose  whether  the 
Commitment  Letters  issued  by  USAC  constituted  ‘‘obligations’’  for  purposes  of  ap-
plying the Antideficiency Act. In addition, OMB informally advised the Commission 
and USAC that USF monies that were invested in non-federal securities, as defined 
by OMB, might not be considered available reserves that could be used to offset obli-
gations under the Antideficiency Act. 

In  August  2004,  USAC  suspended  issuance  of  all  Commitment  Letters  in  the  E-
rate  and  rural  healthcare  programs  until  these  questions  were  answered.  In  Sep-
tember 2004, the Commission’s Office of General Counsel concluded that the USAC 
Commitment  Letters  do  constitute  recordable  obligations  for  purposes  of  applying 
the  Antideficiency  Act  and  USAC’s  non-federal  investments  could  not  be  treated  as 
available  funds.  Both  OMB  and  GAO  have  since  rendered  opinions  agreeing  with 
the FCC General Counsel’s conclusion. 

Based  on  those  determinations,  the  Fund  was  being  operated  in  violation  of  the 
Antideficiency  Act  because  Commitment  Letters  in  the  E-rate  and  rural  healthcare 
programs were issued at times when the Fund did not have sufficient cash available 
to cover those new obligations. On September 27, 2004, the FCC’s Managing Direc-
tor  and  the  Chief  of  the  FCC’s  Wireline  Competition  Bureau  directed  USAC  to  liq-
uidate  its  non-federal  investments  in  order  to  have  sufficient  cash  on  hand  to  com-
ply with the Antideficiency Act. 

The  Commission  has  transmitted  a  report  of  this  Antideficiency  Act  violation  to 
the  President  and  Congress,  as  required  by  statute.  The  FCC  reported  that  on  the 
last business day before the FCC directed USAC to liquidate its non-federal invest-
ments,  the  total  outstanding  program  obligations  of  the  Fund  exceeded  available 
budgetary  resources  by  $3.5  billion  and  exceeded  OMB’s  initial  FY  2004  apportion-
ment for the Fund. The deficiency was cured as of September 30, 2004. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

The FCC has also considered the application of the Antideficiency Act to the High 
Cost  and  Low  Income  support  mechanisms  of  the  Universal  Service  Fund.  In  the 
High Cost and Low Income support programs, there is no specific obligational docu-
ment equivalent to the Commitment Letters in the E-rate program. As a result, de-
termining  the  time  of  obligation  is  more  complex.  At  this  point  our  tentative  view 
is that obligations in these programs do not occur until USAC signs an internal dis-
bursement  authorization  that  determines  the  amounts  each  carrier  should  be  paid 
for telephone services provided during the prior month. Assuming the Fund has ade-
quate  cash  on  hand  to  cover  those  disbursement  decisions,  operation  of  the  High 
Cost and Low Income programs complies with the Antideficiency Act. Given the im-
portance of the issue, however, the Commission has sought OMB’s expert guidance. 
The passage of the Universal Service Antideficiency Temporary Suspension Act in 
December  2004  permitted  the  Fund,  for  one  year,  to  incur  obligations  prior  to  the 
receipt  of  cash  to  cover  those  obligations  without  violating  the  Antideficiency  Act. 
The  obligations  incurred  during  the  exemption  period  remain  permanently  exempt 
from the Antideficiency Act. As a result, during 2005 USAC may issue Commitment 
Letters  in  the  E-rate  program  and  the  rural  healthcare  program  without  having  to 
have cash on hand at that time to cover the associated future disbursements. 

Because the current exemption expires at the end of 2005, the Commission is pro-
ceeding  cautiously  by  protecting  cash  reserves  in  the  Fund  that  may  be  needed  for 
Antideficiency  Act  compliance  in  the  future.  First,  on  December  22,  2004,  the  FCC 
staff directed USAC not to shift funds out of federal investments that would qualify 
as  available  amounts  under  the  Antideficiency  Act,  without  prior  approval.  Second, 
on  March  17,  2005,  the  FCC  staff  directed  USAC  not  to  issue  Commitment  Letters 
for  the  E-rate  and  rural  healthcare  programs  in  amounts  that  exceed  the  annual 
disbursement caps established by FCC rules. 

The  determinations  by  the  FCC,  OMB,  and  GAO  that  Commitment  Letters  con-
stitute  recordable  obligations  mean  that,  as  of  January  1,  2006,  Commitment  Let-
ters  may  not  be  issued  by  USAC  unless  there  is  sufficient  cash  on  hand  to  cover 
the obligations. Further, if USF monies are invested in non-federal securities, those 
funds  will  not  be  available  for  obligation.  S.  241,  however,  would  make  permanent 
the  Fund’s  current  exemption  from  the  Antideficiency  Act’s  restrictions  on  obliga-
tions in excess of available resources. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  the  Commission’s  views  on  the  impact 
of  the  Antideficiency  Act  on  the  Universal  Service  Fund.  Ms.  Gelb  and  I  will  be 
happy to answer your questions.

Senator STEVENS. Ms. Gelb, do you have anything to add to that 

statement? 

Ms. GELB. No, I don’t, Senator. 
Senator STEVENS. Mr. Talbott. 

STATEMENT OF BRIAN L. TALBOTT, PH.D., CHAIRMAN OF THE 

BOARD, UNIVERSAL SERVICE ADMINISTRATIVE COMPANY 
Mr.  TALBOTT.  Good  afternoon,  my  name  is  Brian  Talbott,  Chair-
man  of  the  Board  of  the  Universal  Service  Administrative  Com-
pany.  It  is  my  privilege  to  be  here  today  to  speak  to  you  about 
USAC and its administration of the Universal Service Fund. 

The  Fund  provides  approximately  $6.5  billion  annually  to  sup-
port  access  to  telecommunications  and  other  services  by  rural  and 
low income consumers, schools, libraries, and rural health care pro-
viders.  On  behalf  of  all  of  the  USF  stakeholders,  I  would  like  to 
thank  this  Committee  for  its  role  in  the  passage  of  the  Universal 
Service  Antideficiency  Temporary  Suspension  Act  last  September. 
USAC  is  a  not-for-profit  corporation  designated  by  the  FCC  to 
administer  the  four  universal  service  support  mechanisms  created 
by the Telecommunications Act of 1996. I have served on the board 
since USAC’s creation in 1997, was elected chair in January of this 
year. 

From  1998  through  2004,  USAC  accounted  for  financial  trans-
actions  and  funding  in  accordance  with  GAAP.  Generally,  this  ap-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

proach  was  fully  consistent  with  the  FCC  rules,  and  the  extensive 
audits resulted in no material findings from 1998 through 2003. In 
October  2003,  the  FCC  ordered  USAC  to  change  our  accounting 
methodology  from  GAAP  to  Federal  Government  accounting  prin-
ciples, GovGAAP. 

At the time, the USAC board understood from FCC staff that the 
transition  to  GovGAAP  was  necessitated  by  the  fact  that  USF 
funds were a component of the FCC’s financial statements and that 
this  change  would  have  no  impact  on  the  way  USAC  administers 
its programs. 

At the end of September 2004, late in the process of transitioning 
to  GovGAAP,  the  FCC  directed  USAC  to  treat  E-rate  and  rural 
health  care  under  GovGAAP.  This  requirement  fundamentally 
changed  the  manner  in  which  USAC  had  administered  the  Fund 
since 1997. 

At the same time, FCC staff after consulting with OMB staff in-
formed USAC for the first time that the Antideficiency Act applied 
to  our  funds.  FCC  staff  further  informed  USAC  that  under 
GovGAAP,  investments  in  government-backed  mutual  funds,  gov-
ernment agency securities and money market funds were also con-
sidered obligations for government accounting purposes, and had to 
be liquidated to ensure compliance with ADA. 

USAC  raised  the  question  of  whether  high  cost  and  low  income 
projections  also  constitute  obligations  and  USAC  has  not  yet  re-
ceived  an  answer  to  that  question.  Application  of  ADA,  combined 
with  the  accounting  determination  and  E-rate  and  rural  health 
care  funding  commitments  constituting  budgetary  obligations  had 
a number of dramatic consequences. 

USAC  suspended  new  funding  commitments  for  new  funds  leav-
ing schools, libraries and rural health care providers without need-
ed support. 

USAC was required to move more than $3 billion in safe govern-
ment money market investments to Treasury securities resulting in 
a 4.6 million dollar loss to the fund. 

At  the  end  of  last  year,  Congress  enacted  the  Universal  Service 
Temporary  Suspension  Act  and  this  allowed  USAC  to  quickly  re-
sume  its  normal  course  of  operations  and  begin  issuing  funding 
commitments. Many of the consequences experienced in 2004 could 
very well return upon expiration of the statute. 

The  most  serious  occur  if  USAC  is  unable  to  make  E-rate  com-
mitments  at  the  start  of  the  school  year.  This  significant  uncer-
tainty  for  schools  will  adversely  affect  their  planning  processes. 
Rural health care providers already strapped for funds will have to 
wait even longer for funding required to serve critical patient med-
ical needs. 

Because  high  cost  support  payments  to  rural  telephone  compa-
nies  constitute  a  significant  portion  of  their  revenues,  any  suspen-
sion or delay in disbursements of funds may delay network mainte-
nance  or  improvements.  To  the  extent  that  USF  investments  are 
limited  to  Treasury  securities,  USAC’s  ability  to  use  safe  invest-
ments with higher yields to offset increases in the contribution fac-
tor  will  be  severely  limited.  Investment  returns  help  keep  the  con-
tribution factor as low as possible. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

A  decrease  in  income  will  increase  the  funding  burden  on  all 
Americans.  If  the  ADA  is  permanently  applied  to  the  Fund  and 
high  cost  and  low  income  projections  are  deemed  to  be  budgetary 
obligations,  a  significant  increase  in  the  contribution  factor  could 
occur. 

The  application  of  GovGAAP  and  ADA  does  not  enhance  USAC 
or  the  FCC’s  ability  to  address  waste,  fraud  or  abuse.  USAC 
strongly supports the application of effective accounting rules for fi-
nancial  transactions.  Accounting  under  GAAP  between  1998  and 
2004, however, did not create the problems USAC has encountered 
under GovGAAP. USAC is committed to doing all it can to prevent 
waste,  fraud  and  abuse  and  get  substantial  resources  toward 
achieving that objective. 

None  of  the  extensive  measures  that  USAC  takes  to  prevent 
waste,  fraud  and  abuse  are  related  to  GovGAAP  and  the  applica-
tion of ADA to the Fund. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  providing  me  with  the  opportunity 
to  address  the  Committee.  USAC  looks  forward  to  continuing  our 
work with Congress and I would be happy to respond to any ques-
tions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Talbott follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BRIAN L. TALBOTT, PH.D., CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD, 

UNIVERSAL SERVICE ADMINISTRATIVE COMPANY 

Good afternoon, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee. My name is Brian 
Talbott.  I  am  the  Chairman  of  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  Universal  Service  Ad-
ministrative Company (USAC). It is my privilege to be here today to speak with you 
about USAC and its administration of the Universal Service Fund (USF). The USF 
provides  approximately  $6.5  billion  annually  to  support  access  to  telecommuni-
cations and other services by rural and low-income consumers, schools, libraries and 
rural health care providers. On behalf of all USF stakeholders, I would like to thank 
this  Committee  for  its  role  in  the  passage  of  the  Universal  Service  Antideficiency 
Temporary  Suspension  Act  last  December.  This  Act  provided  much  needed  relief  to 
schools, libraries, and rural health care providers, as well as to the companies serv-
ing them. 
Overview 

USAC is the not-for-profit corporation designated by the Federal Communications 
Commission  (FCC)  to  administer  the  High  Cost,  Low  Income,  Rural  Health  Care, 
and Schools and Libraries (E-rate) universal service support mechanisms created by 
the  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996  and  FCC  regulations  adopted  pursuant  to  the 
Act.  USAC  is  governed  by  a  Board  of  Directors,  each  of  whom  is  appointed  by  the 
Chairman  of  the  FCC.  I  have  served  on  the  Board  since  USAC’s  creation  in  1997 
and was elected Chairman in January 2005. 
Application of Government Accounting Principles (GovGAAP) to the USF 

From  1998  through  2004,  USAC,  pursuant  to  FCC  regulations,  accounted  for  the 
financial transactions of the USF in accordance with Generally Accepted Accounting 
Principles  (GAAP).  The  extensive  annual  audits  conducted  under  strict  FCC  over-
sight as required by Part 54 of the FCC’s rules resulted in no material findings from 
1998 through 2003. The 2004 audit has not yet been completed. 

In  October  2003,  the  FCC  ordered  USAC  to  change  the  USF  accounting  method-
ology  from  GAAP  to  Federal  Government  accounting  principles,  or  GovGAAP.  The 
FCC  stated  that  the  purpose  of  moving  the  USF  to  GovGAAP  was  ‘‘to  ensure  that 
the  Commission  can  maintain  its  obligations  under  federal  financial  management 
and  reporting  statutes  and  directives  of  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget 
(OMB)’’  because  the  USF  is  a  component  of  the  FCC’s  financial  statement.  At  the 
time,  the  USAC  Board  understood  from  FCC  staff  that  the  transition  to  GovGAAP 
would  have  no  impact  on  the  manner  in  which  USAC  administers  the  programs 
themselves. 

Throughout  the  last  quarter  of  2003  and  during  2004,  USAC  undertook  the  nec-
essary  steps  to  train  our  financial  staff  in  and  conform  our  systems  to  GovGAAP 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

in  order  to  meet  the  October  1,  2004  implementation  deadline.  As  USAC  worked 
with  FCC  staff  to  transition  to  GovGAAP,  USAC  staff  raised  the  question  whether 
GovGAAP  should  be  interpreted  to  mandate  treating  commitment  letters  USAC 
sends  to  beneficiaries  in  the  E-rate  and  Rural  Health  Care  programs  as  ‘‘obliga-
tions’’  for  purposes  of  government  accounting.  USAC  staff  raised  a  similar  question 
as to the treatment of the projections USAC files with the FCC regarding High Cost 
and Low Income program payments. 

In late September 2004, USAC received the answer to one of these questions. FCC 
staff  directed  USAC  to  treat  the  E-rate  and  Rural  Health  Care  commitment  letters 
as  government  obligations.  This  new  requirement  fundamentally  changed  the  man-
ner  in  which  USAC  had  administered  the  USF  since  1997  in  accordance  with  the 
Telecommunications  Act  of  1996,  FCC  regulations,  close  FCC  oversight,  and  sub-
stantial  audit  review.  With  regard  to  the  High  Cost  and  Low  Income  program  pro-
jections, USAC was informed that a request had been made to OMB for an opinion 
concerning  whether  those  projections  are  government  obligations  as  well.  We  have 
not received an answer to that question. 
Impact of the Antideficiency Act on the USF 

During the process of transitioning to GovGAAP, USAC was verbally informed by 
FCC  staff  that  the  USF  might  be  subject  to  the  Federal  Antideficiency  Act  (ADA). 
In  late  September  2004,  FCC  staff,  after  consulting  with  OMB,  informed  USAC  for 
the  first  time  that  the  ADA  applied  to  the  USF.  At  the  same  time,  FCC  staff  in-
formed  USAC  that  under  GovGAAP,  USF  investments  in  government-backed  mu-
tual  funds,  government  agency  securities,  and  money  market  funds  were  also  con-
sidered  ‘‘obligations’’  for  government  accounting  purposes  and  had  to  be  liquidated 
to ensure compliance with the ADA. 

Application  of  the  ADA  to  the  USF,  combined  with  the  accounting  determination 
that E-rate and Rural Health Care funding commitments constitute budgetary obli-
gations, had a number of dramatic consequences:

• Between  August  and  November  2004,  USAC  suspended  new  funding  commit-
ments in the E-rate and Rural Health Care programs, leaving schools, libraries 
and rural health care providers without needed support.

• Suspension of issuing commitments resulted in delays in making the most effec-
tive  use  of  services.  For  example,  in  one  case  in  Alaska,  while  the  school  dis-
trict’s service provider continued to provide service under a multi-year contract 
despite the lack of a commitment from USAC, the school board became anxious 
that  the  amount  of  debt  accumulating  could  lead  to  bankruptcy.  The  district 
began to plan for the abrogation of its contract and to turn off the services when 
it received a commitment in January. In another case, a library would not allow 
a  service  provider  to  proceed  to  install  internal  connections  without  a  commit-
ment  from  USAC  because  the  library  viewed  the  discounted  share  as  an  un-
funded liability for which the city could be sued.

• The  late  determination  that  the  ADA  applied  to  the  USF  required  USAC  to 
move  more  than  $3  billion  in  safe  government-backed  money  market  invest-
ments to Treasury securities, resulting in a $4.6 million loss.

Reapplication  of  the  ADA  to  the  USF  will  result  in  significant  uncertainty  and 
instability  to  the  detriment  of  the  USF  and  its  many  stakeholders.  I  will  provide 
a few examples here:

• USAC  makes  commitments  to  schools  for  each  school  year  under  FCC  rules.  If 
USAC  is  unable  to  make  commitments  before  the  start  of  the  school  year,  the 
significant  uncertainty  for  the  schools  will  adversely  affect  their  planning  proc-
esses and achievement of educational goals.

• Rural  health  care  providers  already  strapped  for  funds  will  have  to  wait  even 

longer for funding required to serve critical patient medical needs.

• Because  High  Cost  support  payments  to  rural  telephone  companies  in  many 
cases constitute a significant portion of their revenues, any suspension or delay 
in disbursement of funds will disrupt their revenue flow and may delay network 
maintenance and improvements.

• To the extent that USF investments are limited to Treasury securities, USAC’s 
ability to use safe investments with higher yields to offset increases in the con-
tribution factor will be severely limited.

• If the ADA is permanently applied to the USF, and High Cost and Low Income 
projections are deemed to be budgetary obligations, a significant increase in the 
contribution factor could occur.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

• USAC  will  be  required  to  keep  separate  accounts  for  monies  collected,  com-
mitted and disbursed in 2005 for years to come if a permanent exemption is not 
forthcoming.  This  increases  administrative  costs  and  complexity.  Because 
USAC’s  administrative  costs  come  from  the  USF,  increasing  administrative 
costs in turn increases the burden on those who contribute to the USF.

Although USAC was able to make some limited E-rate commitments in November 
and  December  2004,  as  the  end  of  the  year  approached,  USAC  was  holding  back 
on  issuing  some  $500  million  in  commitments  due  to  a  lack  of  unobligated  monies 
as  defined  by  GovGAAP  and  the  application  of  the  ADA  to  the  USF.  Then,  at  the 
end  of  last  year,  Congress  enacted  the  Universal  Service  Antideficiency  Temporary 
Suspension  Act.  This  allowed  USAC  to  quickly  resume  its  normal  course  of  oper-
ations  and  continue  issuing  funding  commitments  in  the  E-rate  and  Rural  Health 
Care  Programs.  I  would  like  to  thank  all  of  you  for  your  leadership  in  that  effort. 
The  temporary  exemption,  which  allows  the  USF  to  incur  obligations  for  a  limited 
period  without  regard  to  the  ADA  or  the  apportionment  limitations  otherwise  im-
posed on the expenditure of federal appropriations, offers the USF some administra-
tive  relief  for  2005.  Many  of  the  deleterious  consequences  experienced  in  late  2004, 
however, could very well return upon expiration of the statute. Consequently, with-
out a permanent exemption, there will be significant uncertainty as to how the uni-
versal  service  programs  will  operate  in  the  future,  which  could  lead  to  instability 
in the programs. We know that the unanticipated consequences of the changes man-
dated  by  GovGAAP  and  the  application  of  the  ADA  to  the  USF  created  serious  ad-
ministrative  issues  that  harmed  the  programs  without  evident  benefits.  USAC  rec-
ognizes  the  need  for  appropriate  mechanisms  to  ensure  effective  oversight  of  USF 
programs.  Just  as  imposition  of  the  ADA  created  damaging  uncertainty  in  the  ad-
ministration of the USF programs, however, the rolling application of additional fed-
eral  statutes  and  regulations  to  the  USF  and  its  administrative  structure,  without 
careful  consideration  of  their  need  and  their  impact  on  the  programs,  could  lead  to 
similar difficulties. 
Effect of the Application of the ADA on USF Investments 

The design of the universal service programs requires USAC to maintain a signifi-
cant  USF  balance.  Since  its  inception,  USAC  has  managed  the  USF  prudently,  in-
vesting  funds  on  hand  in  different  safe  vehicles,  including  government-backed  mu-
tual  funds,  government  agency  securities,  and  money  market  funds,  all  of  which—
despite their proven safety and high liquidity—are now considered budgetary obliga-
tions under GovGAAP. OMB rules mandate that in order for funds to be considered 
‘‘unobligated’’ such funds must be invested only in United States Treasury securities 
or in cash. 

If  the  ADA  applies  to  the  USF  as  of  January  1,  2006,  USAC’s  ability  to  invest 
the  USF  in  a  manner  that  safely  optimizes  interest  income  will  be  severely  cur-
tailed,  because  investments  in  essentially  anything  other  than  cash  and  direct 
Treasury  or  federal  agency  instruments—no  matter  how  safe  or  liquid—are  consid-
ered  ‘‘obligations’’  for  purposes  of  GovGAAP  accounting.  At  best,  USAC  might  be 
able  to  invest  a  very  small  amount  of  the  funds  in  accounts  that  would  be  consid-
ered  obligated.  Right  now,  all  USF  investments  are  in  cash  accounts  or  Treasury 
instruments. 

In  three  days  last  year,  at  the  direction  of  FCC  staff,  USAC  sold  approximately 
$3  billion  in  safe  investments  and  placed  those  funds  in  cash  and  Treasury  instru-
ments, resulting in a $4.6 million loss. This reallocation of the USF investment port-
folio  resulted  in  an  immediate  20  percent  decrease  in  investment  returns.  That  is, 
fourth  quarter  2004  interest  income  was  $9.7  million,  compared  to  $12  million  in 
interest income in the third quarter of 2004. Because investment returns help keep 
the contribution factor as low as possible, a decrease in interest income will increase 
the funding burden on all Americans. 
The  Transition  to  GovGAAP  and  Application  of  the  ADA  to  the  USF  Have 
No  Impact  On  USAC’s  Ability  to  Deter,  Prevent,  and  Detect  Waste, 
Fraud, and Abuse and Are Not Required to Limit USF Expenditures 

Not only has the application of GovGAAP and the ADA to the USF created insta-
bility  in  the  E-rate  program,  these  measures  do  not  enhance  USAC’s  or  the  FCC’s 
ability  to  address  waste,  fraud,  or  abuse  of  the  USF.  They  are  simply  rules  gov-
erning  the  accounting  treatment  of  the  USF.  USAC  strongly  supports  the  applica-
tion  of  effective  accounting  rules  to  the  financial  transactions  of  the  USF.  Account-
ing under GAAP between 1998 and 2004 did not have the effect of creating the col-
lection and disbursement problems USAC has encountered under GovGAAP. 

USAC  is  committed  to  doing  all  it  can  to  prevent  waste,  fraud,  and  abuse  in  the 
universal  service  support  mechanisms  and  devotes  substantial  resources  toward 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

achieving  that  objective.  Since  it  began  administering  the  USF,  USAC  has  denied 
millions  of  dollars  in  funding  requests  from  ineligible  entities  and  entities  seeking 
ineligible  services.  None  of  the  measures  that  USAC  takes  to  prevent  waste,  fraud, 
and abuse—extensive data validation procedures, close scrutiny of invoices, and ben-
eficiary audits, to name just a few examples—are related to GovGAAP or the appli-
cation of the ADA to the USF. 

There may be some concern regarding whether application of the ADA to the USF 
is necessary to contain USF spending. The answer is no. There are extensive statu-
tory  and  regulatory  constraints  on  the  USF  and  no  issues  regarding  USF  spending 
in  excess  of  applicable  laws  have  been  raised.  These  constraints  are  unaffected  by 
the ADA. Application of the ADA could, however, create unpredictability and uncer-
tainty  regarding  the  timing  and  amount  of  USF  payments  that  beneficiaries  could 
expect to receive. 
Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  providing  me  with  the  opportunity  to  address  the 
Committee.  On  behalf  of  all  of  the  many  USF  stakeholders,  I  again  applaud  the 
Congress for passage of the Universal Service Antideficiency Temporary Suspension 
Act last December, and USAC welcomes your consideration of a permanent ADA ex-
emption for the reasons I have discussed. USAC looks forward to continuing to work 
with Congress and I would be happy to respond to any questions you may have.

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Ms.  Dalton.  For  the  information  of  the  Senators  that  have  come 
and joined us, we have already agreed to put the statements in the 
record if you have any statements. Ms. Dalton. 
STATEMENT  OF  PATRICIA  A.  DALTON,  MANAGING  DIRECTOR, 
PHYSICAL  INFRASTRUCTURE  ISSUES,  U.S.  GOVERNMENT
ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 
Ms.  DALTON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  come  before  you  today  to 
discuss  the  applicability  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  to  the  federal  E-
rate program, which provides schools and libraries across the coun-
try  with  funding  for  telecommunications  and  Internet  services. 
GAO recently released a report which examined the FCC’s manage-
ment  and  oversight  of  the  E-rate  program.  This  afternoon,  I  will 
briefly  summarize  our  findings  with  regard  to  the  FCC’s  applica-
tion  of  various  fiscal  controls  to  the  E-rate  program—specifically, 
the Antideficiency Act. 

Appropriated  funds  are  subject  to  a  variety  of  statutory  provi-
sions,  including  the  Antideficiency  Act,  which  is  the  cornerstone  of 
Congressional  efforts  to  provide  funds  control  for  executive  branch 
expenditures.  The  Act’s  primary  purpose  is  to  prevent  the  obliga-
tion  or  expenditure  of  funds  in  excess  of  amounts  available  in  an 
appropriation  or  in  advance  of  the  appropriation  of  funds  unless 
authorized by law. Thus the Antideficiency Act is a key statute for 
financial  management  and  for  protecting  funds  from  fraud,  waste 
and abuse. 

In 2000, the FCC concluded that the Universal Service Fund con-
stitutes a permanent indefinite appropriation—that is, funding ap-
propriated  or  authorized  by  law  to  be  collected  and  available  for 
specified  purposes  without  further  congressional  action.  We  agree 
with the FCC’s determination. 

In  deciding  that  the  Fund  is  a  permanent  indefinite  appropria-
tion, the FCC set in motion a chain of events involving the applica-
bility  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  which  led,  at  one  point,  to  the  sus-
pension  of  E-rate  funding  commitments  to  schools  and  libraries, 
and  which  culminated  in  action  by  Congress  in  December  2004  to 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

grant the Universal Service Fund a temporary exemption from the 
Antideficiency Act. 

As  detailed  in  our  report,  we  agree  with  the  FCC  that,  absent  a 
statutory  exemption,  the  Universal  Service  Fund  is  subject  to  the 
Antideficiency  Act  and  the  E-rate  program’s  commitment  decision 
letters  constitute  obligations  for  purposes  of  the  Act.  Additional 
issues,  however,  remain  to  be  resolved  by  the  FCC.  These  issues 
include  whether  other  actions  taken  in  the  Universal  Service  pro-
gram constitute obligations and the timing of and amounts of obli-
gations that must be reported. 

As  we  point  out  in  our  report,  the  laws  encompassing  fiscal  and 
accountability controls are not applied in isolation; rather, they are 
part of a framework that addresses issues of financial management 
and  general  management  of  Federal  agencies  and  programs.  Our 
report is critical of the FCC for addressing the applicability of stat-
utes to the program on a case-by-case basis, as issues have arisen. 
This  has  put  the  FCC  and  the  E-rate  program  in  a  position  of  re-
acting  to  problems  as  they  occur—as  happened  with  the 
Antideficiency Act—rather than setting up an organization and in-
ternal controls designed to ensure compliance with applicable laws. 
Since  we  released  our  report,  the  FCC  has  contracted  with 
NAPA,  the  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration,  to  study 
and  explore  alternative  models  to  the  current  organizational  and 
governance  structure  of  the  Universal  Service  Fund  program.  We 
believe  this  study  will  go  a  long  way  towards  addressing  the  con-
cerns outlined in our report. 

Because  it  is  unknown  at  this  time  what  changes  to  universal 
service,  if  any,  may  result  from  the  NAPA  study,  and  because  we 
believe  that  a  comprehensive  assessment  is  needed  to  examine 
which Federal requirements, procedures and practices should apply 
to this program, it is our opinion that a permanent exemption from 
the  Antideficiency  Act  should  not  be  granted  at  this  time.  Instead, 
other options should be considered. 

One option would be for Congress to grant the Universal Service 
Fund  a  2-  or  3-year  exemption  from  the  Act.  This  option  would 
allow  time  for  NAPA  to  complete  its  study,  report  its  findings  to 
the FCC, and for Congress and the FCC to consider whether struc-
tural  changes  to  the  universal  service  program  are  called  for.  A 
comprehensive  assessment  should  then  be  made  to  determine, 
based  on  the  decisions  concerning  the  structure  of  the  program, 
which  Federal  requirements,  policies  and  practices—including  the 
Antideficiency  Act—should  apply  to  the  Universal  Service  Fund 
and  to  any  entities  administering  the  program.  It  could  at  that 
time  be  determined  whether  a  permanent  and  complete  exemption 
from the Antideficiency Act is warranted. 

Alternatively,  crafting  a  limited  exemption  to  the  Antideficiency 
Act  or  other  financial  management  requirements  may  be  more  ap-
propriate. Based on what was learned in 2004, a limited exemption 
would  recognize  the  program’s  unique  financial  structure  and  pro-
vide  flexibility  in  managing  the  program.  For  example,  Congress 
could specify that the FCC can use certain receivables or assets as 
budgetary resources. It also could define how or when an obligation 
is recognized. Such an approach would target specific issues within 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

the unique operation of the Fund and yet leave important financial 
controls in place. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  This  concludes  my  opening  state-

ment. I’d be happy to respond to any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Dalton follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PATRICIA A. DALTON, MANAGING DIRECTOR, PHYSICAL 

INFRASTRUCTURE ISSUES, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Mr. Chairman, Mr. Co-Chairman, and Members of the Committee: 
We are pleased to be here to discuss the results of our recently completed review 
of the Federal Communications Commission’s (FCC’s) universal service program for 
schools  and 
libraries  and  to  discuss  specifically  the  applicability  of  the 
Antideficiency  Act  to  the  program.  As  you  know,  the  Telecommunications  Act  of 
1996  expanded  the  concept  of  universal  service  to  include  assistance  to  schools  and 
libraries  in  acquiring  telecommunications  and  Internet  services;  the  act  charged 
FCC with establishing the universal service discount mechanism for eligible schools 
and libraries. The commission, in turn, created a large and ambitious program that 
became  commonly  known  as  the  ‘‘E-rate’’  program,  and  set  the  annual  funding  cap 
for the program at $2.25 billion. FCC designated the Universal Service Administra-
tive  Company  (USAC),  a  private,  not-for-profit  corporation  established  under  FCC’s 
rules, to carry out the day-to-day operations of the E-rate program. FCC retains re-
sponsibility  for  overseeing  the  program’s  operations  and  ensuring  compliance  with 
the commission’s rules. 

Since  1998,  the  E-rate  program  has  committed  more  than  $13  billion  in  funding 
to  help  schools  and  libraries  across  the  nation  acquire  telecommunications  and 
Internet  services.  Eligible  schools  and  libraries  can  apply  annually  to  receive  sup-
port,  which  can  be  used  for  specific  eligible  services  and  equipment  such  as  tele-
phone  services,  Internet  access  services,  and  the  installation  of  internal  wiring  and 
other  related  items.  Recently,  however,  allegations  have  been  made  that  some  E-
rate  beneficiaries  (schools  and  libraries)  and  service  providers  (e.g.,  telecommuni-
cations  and  network  equipment  companies)  have  fraudulently  obtained,  wasted,  or 
abused  E-rate  funding.  In  May  2004,  for  example,  one  service  provider  involved  in 
E-rate  projects  in  several  states  pleaded  guilty  to  bid  rigging  and  wire  fraud  and 
agreed  to  pay  more  than  $20  million  in  criminal  fines,  civil  payments,  and  restitu-
tion. 

In  February  2005,  we  issued  a  report  on  various  aspects  of  the  program.  Specifi-
cally,  we  evaluated  (1)  the  effect  of  the  current  structure  of  the  E-rate  program  on 
FCC’s  management  of  the  program,  (2)  FCC’s  development  and  use  of  performance 
goals  and  measures  in  managing  the  program,  and  (3)  the  effectiveness  of  FCC’s 
oversight  mechanisms—rulemaking  proceedings,  beneficiary  audits,  and  reviews  of 
USAC decisions (appeals)—in managing the program. 

Our  testimony  today  is  based  on  this  report,  which  contains  a  fuller  discussion 
of the results of our review and recommendations for improving FCC’s management 
and oversight of the E-rate program. 1 In summary, we found the following: 

• FCC established E-rate as a multibillion-dollar program operating under an or-
ganizational structure unusual to the Federal Government, but never conducted 
a  comprehensive  assessment  to  determine  which  federal  requirements,  policies, 
and  practices  apply  to  the  program,  to  the  Universal  Service  Administrative 
Company,  and  to  the  Universal  Service  Fund  itself.  FCC  has  addressed  these 
issues  on  a  case-by-case  basis,  but  this  has  put  FCC  and  the  E-rate  program 
in  the  position  of  reacting  to  problems  as  they  occur  rather  than  setting  up  an 
organization  and  internal  controls  designed  to  ensure  compliance  with  applica-
ble laws.
• With regard to the Antideficiency Act, we agree with FCC’s conclusions that the 
Universal  Service  Fund  is  a  permanent  indefinite  appropriation,  is  subject  to 
that act, and that the issuance of E-rate funding commitment letters constitutes 
obligations  for  purposes  of  the  Act.  We  believe  that  Congress  should  consider 
either granting the Universal Service Fund a two- or three-year exemption from 
the Antideficiency Act or crafting a limited exemption that would provide man-
agement flexibility. For example, Congress could specify that FCC could use cer-
tain  receivables  or  assets  as  budgetary  resources.  These  more  limited  solutions 

1 Telecommunications: Greater Involvement Needed by FCC in the Management and Oversight 
of the E-rate Program, GAO–05–151 (Washington, DC: Feb. 9, 2005). The report is available on 
GAO’s Web site at www.gao.gov.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

would  allow  time  for  the  National  Academy  of  Public  Administration  to  com-
plete  its  study  of  the  Universal  Service  Fund  program  and  report  its  findings 
to  FCC.  Congress  and  FCC  could  then  comprehensively  assess,  based  on  deci-
sions concerning the structure of the program, which federal requirements, poli-
cies,  and  practices  should  apply  to  the  fund  and  to  any  entities  administering 
the  program.  It  could  then  be  determined  whether  a  permanent  and  complete 
exemption from the Antideficiency Act is warranted.

• FCC has not developed meaningful performance goals and measures for assess-
ing and managing the program. As a result, there is no way to tell whether the 
program has resulted in the cost-effective deployment and use of advanced tele-
communications services for schools and libraries.

• FCC’s  program  oversight  mechanisms  contain  weaknesses  that  limit  FCC’s 
management  of  the  program  and  its  ability  to  understand  the  scope  of  waste, 
fraud,  and  abuse  within  the  program.  For  example,  FCC’s  rulemakings  have 
often  lacked  specificity  and  have  led  to  situations  where  important  USAC  ad-
ministrative procedures have been deemed unenforceable by FCC. There is also 
a  significant  backlog  of  E-rate  appeals  that  adds  uncertainty  to  the  program 
and impacts beneficiaries.

FCC  has  taken  some  important  steps,  particularly  in  recent  months,  to  address 
some  of  the  areas  of  concern  discussed  in  our  report.  Nevertheless,  we  believe  that 
FCC  has  not  done  enough  to  proactively  manage  and  provide  a  framework  of  gov-
ernment  accountability  for  the  multibillion-dollar  E-rate  program.  To  address  the 
management and oversight problems we have identified, we recommended in our re-
port that the Chairman of FCC: (1) conduct and document a comprehensive assess-
ment  to  determine  whether  all  necessary  government  accountability  requirements, 
policies, and practices have been applied and are fully in place to protect the E-rate 
program  and  universal  service  funding;  (2)  establish  meaningful  performance  goals 
and  measures  for  the  E-rate  program;  and  (3)  develop  a  strategy  for  reducing  the 
E-rate program’s appeals backlog, including that adequate staffing resources are de-
voted to E-rate appeals. 
Background 

The  concept  of  ‘‘universal  service’’  has  traditionally  meant  providing  residential 
telephone  subscribers  with  nationwide  access  to  basic  telephone  services  at  reason-
able  rates.  The  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996  broadened  the  scope  of  universal 
service to include, among other things, support for schools and libraries. The act in-
structed  the  commission  to  establish  a  universal  service  support  mechanism  to  en-
sure  that  eligible  schools  and  libraries  have  affordable  access  to  and  use  of  certain 
telecommunications  services  for  educational  purposes. 2 In  addition,  Congress  au-
thorized  FCC  to  ‘‘establish  competitively  neutral  rules  to  enhance,  to  the  extent 
technically  feasible  and  economically  reasonable,  access  to  advanced  telecommuni-
cations  and  information  services  for  all  public  and  nonprofit  elementary  and  sec-
ondary  school  classrooms . . . and  libraries . . . ’’ 3 Based  on  this  direction,  and 
following  the  recommendations  of  a  Federal-State  Joint  Board  on  Universal  Serv-
ice, 4 FCC established the schools and libraries universal service mechanism that is 
commonly referred to as the E-rate program. The program is funded through statu-
torily mandated payments by companies that provide interstate telecommunications 
services. 5 Many of these companies, in turn, pass their contribution costs on to their 

2 47 U.S.C. § 254(h)(1)(B). 
3 47 U.S.C. § 254(h)(2). 
4 The Federal-State Joint Board on Universal Service was established in March 1996 to make 
recommendations  to  implement  the  universal  service  provisions  of  the  Telecommunications  Act 
of  1996.  The  board  is  composed  of  FCC  commissioners,  state  utility  commissioners,  and  a  con-
sumer advocate representative. 

5 These  companies  include  providers  of  local  and  long  distance  telephone  services,  wireless 
telephone  services,  paging  services,  and  pay  phone  services.  47  CFR.  § 54.706.  Along  with  the 
E-rate  program,  other  universal  service  programs  under  the  Universal  Service  Fund  are  the 
High  Cost  program,  the  Low  Income  program,  and  the  Rural  Health  Care  program.  The  High 
Cost program assists customers living in high-cost, rural, or remote areas through financial sup-
port to telephone companies, thereby lowering rates for local and long distance service. The Low 
Income  program  assists  qualifying  low-income  consumers  through  discounted  installation  and 
monthly telephone services and free toll limitation service. The Rural Health Care program as-
sists health care providers located in rural areas through discounts for telecommunications serv-
ices.  These  four  programs  are  sometimes  collectively  referred  to  as  the  Universal  Service  Fund 
program.  For  more  information  on  the  various  universal  service  programs,  see  GAO,  Tele-
communications:  Federal  and  State  Universal  Service  Programs  and  Challenges  to  Funding, 
GAO–02–187 (Washington, DC: Feb. 4, 2002). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

16

subscribers  through  a  line  item  on  subscribers’  phone  bills. 6 FCC  capped  funding 
for  the  E-rate  program  at  $2.25  billion  per  year,  although  funding  requests  by 
schools  and  libraries  can  greatly  exceed  the  cap.  For  example,  schools  and  libraries 
requested more than $4.2 billion in E-rate funding for the 2004 funding year. 

In  1998,  FCC  appointed  USAC  as  the  program’s  permanent  administrator,  al-
though  FCC  retains  responsibility  for  overseeing  the  program’s  operations  and  en-
suring  compliance  with  the  commission’s  rules. 7 In  response  to  congressional  con-
ference  committee  direction, 8 FCC  has  specified  that  USAC  ‘‘may  not  make  policy, 
interpret  unclear  provisions  of  the  statute  or  rules,  or  interpret  the  intent  of  Con-
gress.’’ 9 USAC  is  responsible  for  carrying  out  the  program’s  day-to-day  operations, 
such  as  maintaining  a  Web  site  that  contains  program  information  and  application 
procedures;  answering  inquiries  from  schools  and  libraries;  processing  and  review-
ing  applications;  making  funding  commitment  decisions  and  issuing  funding  com-
mitment  letters;  and  collecting,  managing,  investing,  and  disbursing  E-rate  funds. 
FCC  permits—and  in  fact  relies  on—USAC  to  establish  administrative  procedures 
that  program  participants  are  required  to  follow  as  they  work  through  the  applica-
tion and funding process. 

Under  the  E-rate  program,  eligible  schools,  libraries,  and  consortia  that  include 
eligible  schools  and  libraries 10 may  receive  discounts  for  eligible  services.  Eligible 
schools  and  libraries  may  apply  annually  to  receive  E-rate  support.  The  program 
places  schools  and  libraries  into  various  discount  categories,  based  on  indicators  of 
need, so that the school or library pays a percentage of the cost for the service and 
the E-rate program funds the remainder. E-rate discounts range from 20 percent to 
90 percent. USAC reviews all of the applications and related forms and issues fund-
ing  commitment  decision  letters.  Generally,  it  is  the  service  provider  that  seeks  re-
imbursement  from  USAC  for  the  discounted  portion  of  the  service  rather  than  the 
school or library. 11 
FCC  Established  an  Unusual  Program  Structure  without  Comprehensively 
Addressing  the  Applicability  of  Governmental  Standards  and  Fiscal 
Controls 

FCC  established  an  unusual  structure  for  the  E-rate  program  but  has  never  con-
ducted  a  comprehensive  assessment  of  which  federal  requirements,  policies,  and 
practices  apply  to  the  program,  to  USAC,  or  to  the  Universal  Service  Fund  itself. 
FCC only recently began to address a few of these issues. 

The Telecommunications Act of 1996 neither specified how FCC was to administer 
universal service to schools and libraries nor prescribed the structure and legal pa-
rameters  of  the  universal  service  mechanisms  to  be  created.  The  Telecommuni-
cations  Act  required  FCC  to  consider  the  recommendations  of  the  Federal-State 
Joint Board on Universal Service and then to develop specific, predictable, and equi-
table support mechanisms. Using the broad language of the act, FCC crafted an am-
bitious  program  for  schools  and  libraries—roughly  analogous  to  a  grant  program—
and  gave  the  program  a  $2.25  billion  annual  funding  cap.  To  carry  out  the  day-to-
day activities of the E-rate program, FCC relied on a structure it had used for other 
universal  service  programs  in  the  past—a  not-for-profit  corporation  established  at 
FCC’s direction that would operate under FCC oversight. However, the structure of 
the E-rate program is unusual in several respects compared with other federal pro-
grams:

6 The  line  item  is  called  various  things  by  various  companies,  such  as  the  ‘‘federal  universal 
service  fee’’  or  the  ‘‘universal  connectivity  fee.’’  Some  companies  do  not  separate  out  universal 
service  costs  as  a  line  item,  but  instead  just  build  it  into  their  overall  costs.  Either  way,  con-
sumers ultimately pay for the various universal service programs, including E-rate. 

7 USAC was established at the direction of FCC and operates under FCC’s rules and policies. 
8 See S.1768, 105th Cong., § 2004(b)(2)(A) (1998). 
9 47 CFR § 54.702(c). 
10 Eligibility of schools and libraries is defined at 47 U.S.C. § 254. Generally, educational insti-
tutions  that  meet  the  definition  of  ‘‘schools’’  in  the  Elementary  and  Secondary  Education  Act 
of  1965  are  eligible  to  participate,  as  are  libraries  that  are  eligible  to  receive  assistance  from 
a  state’s  library  administrative  agency  under  the  Library  Services  and  Technology  Act.  Exam-
ples  of  entities  not  eligible  for  support  are  home  school  programs,  private  vocational  programs, 
and  institutions  of  higher  education.  In  addition,  neither  private  schools  with  endowments  of 
more  than  $50  million  nor  libraries  whose  budgets  are  part  of  a  school’s  budget  are  eligible  to 
participate. 20 U.S.C. § 9122. 

11 The  school  or  library  could  also  pay  the  service  provider  in  full  and  then  seek  reimburse-

ment from USAC for the discount portion. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

• FCC appointed USAC as the permanent administrator of the Universal Service 
Fund, 12 and  FCC’s  Chairman  has  final  approval  over  USAC’s  Board  of  Direc-
tors.  USAC  is  responsible  for  administering  the  program  under  FCC  orders, 
rules,  and  directives.  However,  USAC  is  not  part  of  FCC  or  any  other  govern-
ment  entity;  it  is  not  a  government  corporation  established  by  Congress;  and 
no  contract  or  memorandum  of  understanding  exists  between  FCC  and  USAC 
for  the  administration  of  the  E-rate  program.  Thus,  USAC  operates  and  dis-
burses funds under less explicit federal ties than many other federal programs.
• Questions  as  to  whether  the  monies  in  the  Universal  Service  Fund  should  be 
treated as federal funds have troubled the program from the start. Even though 
the  fund  has  been  listed  in  the  budget  of  the  United  States  and,  since  fiscal 
year 2004, has been subject to an annual apportionment from OMB, the monies 
are  maintained  outside  of  Treasury  accounts  by  USAC  and  some  of  the  monies 
have  been  invested. 13 The  United  States  Treasury  implements  the  statutory 
controls  and  restrictions  involving  the  proper  collection  and  deposit  of  appro-
priated  funds,  including  the  financial  accounting  and  reporting  of  all  receipts 
and  disbursements,  the  security  of  appropriated  funds,  and  agencies’  respon-
sibilities for those funds. 14

As  explained  below,  appropriated  funds  are  subject,  unless  specifically  exempted 
by law, to a variety of statutory controls and restrictions. These controls and restric-
tions,  among  other  things,  limit  the  purposes  for  which  federal  funds  can  be  used 
and provide a scheme of accountability for federal monies. Key requirements are in 
Title  31  of  the  United  States  Code  and  the  appropriate  Treasury  regulations, 15 
which  govern  fiscal  activities  relating  to  the  management,  collection,  and  distribu-
tion of public money. 

Since the inception of the E-rate program, FCC has struggled with identifying the 
nature of the Universal Service Fund and the managerial, fiscal, and accountability 
requirements  that  apply  to  the  fund.  FCC’s  Office  of  Inspector  General  first  looked 
at the Universal Service Fund in 1999 as part of its audit of the commission’s fiscal 
year  1999  financial  statement  because  FCC  had  determined  that  the  Universal 
Service Fund was a component of FCC for financial reporting purposes. During that 
audit,  the  FCC  IG  questioned  commission  staff  regarding  the  nature  of  the  fund 
and,  specifically,  whether  it  was  subject  to  the  statutory  and  regulatory  require-
ments  for  federal  funds.  In  the  next  year’s  audit,  the  FCC  IG  noted  that  the  com-
mission could not ensure that Universal Service Fund activities were in compliance 
with all laws and regulations because the issue of which laws and regulations were 
applicable to the fund was still unresolved at the end of the audit. 

FCC officials told us that the commission has substantially resolved the IG’s con-
cerns through recent orders, including FCC’s 2003 order that USAC begin preparing 
Universal  Service  Fund  financial  statements  consistent  with  generally  accepted  ac-
counting principles for federal agencies (GovGAAP) and keep the fund in accordance 
with the United States Government Standard General Ledger. While it is true that 
these  steps  and  other  FCC  determinations  discussed  below  should  provide  greater 
protections  for  universal  service  funding,  FCC  has  addressed  only  a  few  of  the 
issues that need to be resolved. In fact, staff from the FCC’s IG’s office told us that 
they  do  not  believe  the  commission’s  GovGAAP  order  adequately  addressed  their 
concerns because the order did not comprehensively detail which fiscal requirements 
apply to the Universal Service Fund and which do not. 
FCC’s  Decision  on  the  Antideficiency  Act  Should  Be  Addressed  in  a

Broader Context 

FCC has made some determinations concerning the status of the Universal Serv-
ice  Fund  and  the  fiscal  controls  that  apply.  For  example,  FCC  has  concluded  that 

12 USAC  was  appointed  the  permanent  administrator  subject  to  a  review  after  one  year  by 
FCC  to  determine  that  the  universal  service  programs  were  being  administered  in  an  efficient, 
effective,  and  competitively  neutral  manner.  47  CFR  § 54.701(a).  This  review  was  never  con-
ducted. 

13 The  Universal  Service  Fund  is  included  in  the  federal  budget  as  a  special  fund.  OMB  con-
cluded  that  the  Fund  does  not  constitute  public  money  subject  to  the  Miscellaneous  Receipts 
Statute,  31  U.S.C.  § 3302,  and  therefore  can  be  maintained  outside  the  Treasury  by  a  non-
governmental manager. Letter from Mr. Robert G. Damus, OMB General Counsel to Mr. Chris-
topher Wright, FCC General Counsel, dated April 28, 2000. 

14 See 31 U.S.C. §§ 331, 3301–3305 and the Treasury Financial Manual, vol. I, which instructs 
federal  agencies  in  areas  of  central  accounting  and  reporting,  disbursing,  deposit  regulations, 
and other fiscal matters necessary for the financial accounting and reporting of all receipts and 
disbursements of the Federal Government.

15 As  set  forth  in  part  31  of  the  Code  of  Federal  Regulations  or  the  Treasury  Financial  Man-

ual. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

18

the  Universal  Service  Fund  is  a  permanent  indefinite  appropriation  subject  to  the 
Antideficiency  Act  and  that  its  issuance  of  funding  commitment  letters  constitutes 
recordable  obligations  for  purposes  of  the  act.  We  agree  with  FCC’s  determinations 
on  these  issues,  as  explained  in  detail  in  appendix  I.  However,  FCC’s  conclusions 
concerning the status of the Universal Service Fund raise further issues relating to 
the collection, deposit, obligation, and disbursement of those funds—issues that FCC 
needs  to  explore  and  resolve  comprehensively  rather  than  in  an  ad  hoc  fashion  as 
problems arise. 

Status  of  funds  as  appropriated  funds.  In  assessing  the  financial  statement  re-
porting  requirements  for  FCC  components  in  2000,  FCC  concluded  that  the  Uni-
versal  Service  Fund  constitutes  a  permanent  indefinite  appropriation  (i.e.,  funding 
appropriated  or  authorized  by  law  to  be  collected  and  available  for  specified  pur-
poses  without  further  congressional  action).  We  agree  with  FCC’s  conclusion.  Typi-
cally, Congress will use language of appropriation, such as that found in annual ap-
propriations acts, to identify a fund or account as an appropriation and to authorize 
an agency to enter into obligations and make disbursements out of available funds. 
Congress,  however,  appropriates  funds  in  a  variety  of  ways  other  than  in  regular 
appropriations  acts.  Thus,  a  statute  that  contains  a  specific  direction  to  pay  and  a 
designation  of  funds  to  be  used  constitutes  an  appropriation. 16 In  these  statutes, 
Congress  (1)  authorizes  the  collection  of  fees  and  their  deposit  into  a  particular 
fund, and (2) makes the fund available for expenditure for a specified purpose with-
out further action by Congress. This authority to obligate or expend collections with-
out  further  congressional  action  constitutes  a  continuing  appropriation  or  a  perma-
nent  appropriation  of  the  collections. 17 Because  the  Universal  Service  Fund’s  cur-
rent  authority  stems  from  a  statutorily  authorized  collection  of  fees  from  tele-
communications  carriers  and  the  expenditure  of  those  fees  for  a  specified  purpose 
(that is, the various types of universal service), it meets both elements of the defini-
tion of a permanent appropriation. 

Decision  regarding  the  Antideficiency  Act.  As  noted  above,  in  October  2003,  FCC 
ordered  USAC  to  prepare  financial  statements  for  the  Universal  Service  Fund,  as 
a component of FCC, consistent with GovGAAP, which FCC and USAC had not pre-
viously applied to the fund. In February 2004, staff from USAC realized during con-
tractor-provided training on GovGAAP procedures that the commitment letters sent 
to  beneficiaries  (notifying  them  whether  or  not  their  funding  is  approved  and  in 
what  amount)  might  be  viewed  as  ‘‘obligations’’  of  appropriated  funds. 18 If  so,  and 
if  FCC  also  found  the  Antideficiency  Act—which  does  not  allow  an  agency  or  pro-
gram to make obligations in excess of available budgetary resources—to be applica-
ble to the E-rate program, then USAC would need to dramatically increase the pro-
gram’s  cash-on-hand  and  lessen  the  program’s  investments 19 to  provide  budgetary 
authority  sufficient  to  satisfy  the  Antideficiency  Act.  As  a  result,  USAC  suspended 
funding  commitments  in  August  2004  while  waiting  for  a  commission  decision  on 
how  to  proceed.  At  the  end  of  September  2004—facing  the  end  of  the  fiscal  year—
FCC  decided  that  commitment  letters  were  obligations,  that  the  Antideficiency  Act 
did apply to the program, and that USAC would need to immediately liquidate some 
of  its  investments  to  come  into  compliance  with  the  Antideficiency  Act.  According 
to  USAC  officials,  the  liquidations  cost  the  fund  approximately  $4.6  million  in  im-
mediate  losses  and  could  potentially  result  in  millions  in  foregone  annual  interest 
income. 

FCC  was  slow  to  recognize  and  address  the  issue  of  the  applicability  of  the 
Antideficiency Act, resulting in the abrupt decision to suspend funding commitment 
decision letters and liquidate investments. In response to these events, in December 
2004, Congress passed a bill granting the Universal Service Fund a one-year exemp-
tion from the Antideficiency Act. 20 Nevertheless, FCC’s conclusion on this issue was 
correct:  Absent  a  statutory  exemption,  the  Universal  Service  Fund  is  subject  to  the 

16 63 Comp. Gen. 331 (1984); 13 Comp. Gen. 77 (1933). 
17 E.g.,  United  Biscuit  Co.  v.  Wirtz,  359  F.2d  206,  212  (DC  Cir.  1965),  cert.  denied,  384  U.S. 

971 (1966); 69 Comp. Gen. 260, 262 (1990); 73 Comp. Gen. 321 (1994). 

18 An ‘‘obligation’’ is an action that creates a legal liability or definite commitment on the part 

of the government to make a disbursement at some later date. 

19 According  to  USAC,  the  Universal  Service  Fund  was  invested  in  a  variety  of  securities,  in-
cluding  cash  and  cash  equivalents,  government  and  government-backed  securities,  and  high-
grade  commercial  paper.  USAC  generally  did  not  seek  the  approval  of  the  commission  on  par-
ticular  investments,  although  investments  were  made  with  FCC  knowledge  and  oversight 
through formal audits and informal meetings and review. 

20 Universal  Service  Antideficiency  Temporary  Suspension  Act,  Pub.  L.  No.  108–494,  § 302, 
118  Stat.  3986  (2004).  The  law  exempts  universal  service  monies  from  the  Antideficiency  Act 
until December 31, 2005. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Antideficiency  Act,  and  its  funding  commitment  decision  letters  constitute  obliga-
tions for purposes of the act. 

19

The  Antideficiency  Act  applies  to  ‘‘official[s]  or  employee[s]  of  the  United  States 
Government . . . mak[ing]  or  authorizing  an  expenditure  or  obligation . . . from 
an  appropriation  or  fund.’’  31  U.S.C.  § 1341(a).  As  discussed  above,  the  Universal 
Service  Fund  is  an  ‘‘appropriation  or  fund.’’  Even  though  USAC—a  private  entity 
whose  employees  are  not  federal  officers  or  employees—is  the  administrator  of  the 
program  and  the  entity  that  obligates  and  disburses  money  from  the  fund,  applica-
tion  of  the  act  is  not  negated.  This  is  because,  as  recognized  by  FCC,  it,  and  not 
USAC,  is  the  entity  that  is  legally  responsible  for  the  management  and  oversight 
of the E-rate program and because FCC’s employees are federal officers and employ-
ees of the United States subject to the Antideficiency Act. Thus, the Universal Serv-
ice Fund will again be subject to the Antideficiency Act when the one-year statutory 
exemption expires, unless action is taken to extend or make permanent the exemp-
tion. 

An  important  issue  that  arises  from  the  application  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  to 
the Universal Service Fund is what actions constitute obligations chargeable against 
the  fund.  Under  the  Antideficiency  Act,  an  agency  may  not  incur  an  obligation  in 
excess  of  the  amount  available  to  it  in  an  appropriation  or  fund.  Thus,  proper  re-
cording of obligations with respect to the timing and amount of such obligations per-
mits  compliance  with  the  Antideficiency  Act  by  ensuring  that  agencies  have  ade-
quate  budget  authority  to  cover  all  of  their  obligations.  Our  decisions  have  defined 
an ‘‘obligation’’ as a commitment creating a legal liability of the government, includ-
ing  a  ‘‘legal  duty . . . which  could  mature  into  a  liability  by  virtue  of  actions  on 
the part of the other party beyond the control of the United States . . . ’’ 21 

With respect to the Universal Service Fund, the funding commitment decision let-
ter  provides  the  school  or  library  with  the  authority  to  obtain  services  from  a  pro-
vider  with  the  commitment  that  the  school  or  library  will  receive  a  discount  and 
the service provider will be paid for the discounted portion with E-rate funding. Al-
though  the  school  or  library  could  decide  not  to  seek  the  services  or  the  discount, 
so  long  as  the  funding  commitment  decision  letter  remains  valid  and  outstanding, 
USAC  and  FCC  no  longer  control  the  Universal  Service  Fund’s  liability;  it  is  de-
pendent on the actions taken by the school or library. Consequently, we agree with 
FCC  that  a  recordable  obligation  is  incurred  at  the  time  of  issuance  of  the  funding 
commitment decision letter indicating approval of the applicant’s discount. 

Additional  issues  that  remain  to  be  resolved  by  FCC  include  whether  other  ac-
tions  taken  in  the  Universal  Service  Fund  program  constitute  obligations  and  the 
timing and amounts of obligations that must be recorded. For example, this includes 
the  projections  and  data  submissions  by  USAC  to  FCC  and  by  participants  in  the 
High  Cost  and  Low  Income  support  mechanisms  to  USAC.  FCC  has  indicated  that 
it is considering this issue and consulting with the Office of Management and Budg-
et. FCC should also identify any other actions that may constitute recordable obliga-
tions and ensure that those are properly recorded. 

While  we  agree  with  FCC’s  determinations  that  the  Universal  Service  Fund  is  a 
permanent appropriation subject to the Antideficiency Act and that its funding com-
mitment  decision  letters  constitute  recordable  obligations  of  the  Universal  Service 
Fund  (see  app.  I),  there  are  several  significant  fiscal  law  issues  that  remain  unre-
solved.  We  believe  that  where  FCC  has  determined  that  fiscal  controls  and  policies 
do not apply, the commission should reconsider these determinations in light of the 
status  of  universal  service  monies  as  federal  funds.  For  example,  in  view  of  its  de-
termination that the fund constitutes an appropriation, FCC needs to reconsider the 
applicability of the Miscellaneous Receipts Statue, 31 U.S.C. § 3302, which requires 
that  money  received  for  the  use  of  the  United  States  be  deposited  in  the  Treasury 
unless otherwise authorized by law. 22 FCC also needs to assess the applicability of 
other  fiscal  control  and  accountability  statutes  (e.g.,  the  Single  Audit  Act  and  the 
Cash Management Improvement Act). 23 

21 See B–300480, April 9, 2003. 
22 Because  OMB  and  FCC  had  believed  the  funds  were  not  public  monies  ‘‘for  the  use  of  the 
United  States’’  under  the  Miscellaneous  Receipts  Statute,  neither  OMB  nor  FCC  viewed  the 
Universal Service Fund as subject to that statute. 

23 For  example,  in  October  2003,  when  the  FCC  ordered  USAC  to  comply  with  GovGAAP,  it 
noted  that  the  Universal  Service  Fund  was  subject  to  the  Debt  Collection  Improvement  Act  of 
1996.  In  that  same  order,  FCC  stated  that  ‘‘the  funds  may  be  subject  to  a  number  of  federal 
financial and reporting statutes’’ (emphasis added) and ‘‘relevant portions of the Federal Finan-
cial  Management  Improvement  Act  of  1996,’’  but  did  not  specify  which  specific  statutes  or  the 
relevant  portions  or  further  analyze  their  applicability.  FCC  officials  also  told  us  that  it  was 
uncertain whether procurement requirements such as the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) 
Continued

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

Another major issue that remains to be resolved involves the extent to which FCC 
has delegated some functions for the E-rate program to USAC. For example, are the 
disbursement policies and practices for the E-rate program consistent with statutory 
and  regulatory  requirements  for  the  disbursement  of  public  funds? 24 Are  some  of 
the  functions  carried  out  by  USAC,  even  though  they  have  been  characterized  as 
administrative  or  ministerial,  arguably  inherently  governmental  activities 25 that 
must  be  performed  by  government  personnel?  Resolving  these  issues  in  a  com-
prehensive  fashion,  rather  than  continuing  to  rely  on  reactive,  case-by-case  deter-
minations, is key to ensuring that FCC establishes the proper foundation of govern-
ment  accountability  standards  and  safeguards  for  the  E-rate  program  and  the  Uni-
versal Service Fund. 

We  are  encouraged  that  FCC  recently  announced  that  it  has  contracted  with  the 
National Academy of Public Administration (NAPA) for NAPA to study the adminis-
tration  of  the  Universal  Service  Fund.  NAPA  will  review  the  current  status  of  the 
Universal  Service  Fund  program  as  well  as  other  similar  governmental  and  quasi-
governmental programs. Among other things, NAPA is to examine the pros and cons 
of  continuing  with  the  program’s  current  structure  or  switching  to  an  alternative 
model. NAPA is also to identify specific ways to improve the oversight and operation 
of  the  program,  as  well  as  any  legislative  or  rule  changes  that  would  be  needed  to 
implement  its  recommendations.  In  addition,  the  review  will  identify  internal  con-
trols  in  typical  federal  grant  or  subsidy  programs  that  are  not  present  in  the  Uni-
versal  Service  Fund  program  and  determine  whether  the  manner  in  which  other 
analogous  programs  handle  the  holding,  investment,  and  monitoring  of  program 
funds offers models for improving the operation of the Universal Service Fund. 

We believe that NAPA’s study will go a long way toward addressing the concerns 
outlined  in  our  report,  and  we  look  forward  to  seeing  the  results  of  NAPA’s  efforts. 
Given this important ongoing study and the unresolved issues mentioned previously, 
Congress  may  wish  to  consider  deferring  a  decision  on  permanently  exempting  the 
Universal  Service  Fund  from  the  Antideficiency  Act  at  this  time  and  instead  con-
sider  either  granting  the  fund  a  two-  or  three-year  exemption  from  the 
Antideficiency  Act  or  crafting  a  limited  exemption  that  would  provide  management 
flexibility.  For  example,  Congress  could  specify  that  FCC  could  use  certain  receiv-
ables  or  assets  as  budgetary  resources.  These  more  limited  solutions  would  allow 
time for the National Academy of Public Administration to complete its study of the 
Universal Service Fund program and report its findings to FCC. Congress and FCC 
could  then  comprehensively  assess,  based  on  decisions  concerning  the  structure  of 
the program, which federal requirements, policies, and practices should apply to the 
fund  and  to  any  entities  administering  the  program.  It  could  then  be  determined 
whether  a  permanent  and  complete  exemption  from  the  Antideficiency  Act  is  war-
ranted. 
FCC  Did  Not  Develop  Useful  Performance  Goals  and  Measures  for

Assessing and Managing the E-rate Program 

Although $13 billion in E-rate funding has been committed to beneficiaries during 
the  past  7  years,  FCC  did  not  develop  useful  performance  goals  and  measures  to 
assess  the  specific  impact  of  these  funds  on  schools’  and  libraries’  Internet  access 
and  to  improve  the  management  of  the  program,  despite  a  recommendation  by  us 
in 1998 to do so. At the time of our current review, FCC staff was considering, but 
had not yet finalized, new E-rate goals and measures in response to OMB’s concerns 
about this deficiency in a 2003 OMB assessment of the program. 

One  of  the  management  tasks  facing  FCC  is  to  establish  strategic  goals  for  the 
E-rate  program,  as  well  as  annual  goals  linked  to  them.  The  Telecommunications 
Act  of  1996  did  not  include  specific  goals  for  supporting  schools  and  libraries,  but 
instead  used  general  language  directing  FCC  to  establish  competitively  neutral 
rules for enhancing access to advanced telecommunications and information services 
for all public and nonprofit private elementary and secondary school classrooms and 

applied  to  arrangements  between  FCC  and  USAC,  but  they  recommended  that  those  require-
ments be followed as a matter of policy. 

24 See 31 U.S.C. §§ 3321, 3322, 3325, and the Treasury Financial Manual. 
25 See  OMB  Circular  A–76,  May  29,  2003,  which  defines  an  inherently  governmental  activity 
as  requiring  ‘‘the  exercise  of  substantial  discretion  in  applying  government  authority  and/or  in 
making decisions for the government.’’ OMB Cir. A–76, Attachment A. Inherently governmental 
activities include the establishment of procedures and processes related to the oversight of mon-
etary  transactions  or  entitlements.  OMB  Circular  A–76  further  states  that  ‘‘[e]xerting  ultimate 
control 
of  United  States  government 
property . . . including  establishing  policies  or  procedures  for  the  collection,  control,  or  dis-
bursement  of  appropriated  and  other  federal  funds’’  involves  an  inherently  governmental  activ-
ity. 

the  acquisition,  use 

or  disposition 

over 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

libraries. 26 As  the  agency  accountable  for  the  E-rate  program,  FCC  is  responsible 
under the Government Performance and Results Act of 1993 (Results Act) for estab-
lishing the program’s long-term strategic goals and annual goals, measuring its own 
performance  in  meeting  these  goals,  and  reporting  publicly  on  how  well  it  is 
doing. 27 

For fiscal years 2000 through 2002, FCC’s goals focused on achieving certain per-
centage  levels  of  Internet  connectivity  during  a  given  fiscal  year  for  schools,  public 
school  instructional  classrooms,  and  libraries.  However,  the  data  that  FCC  used  to 
report  on  its  progress  was  limited  to  public  schools  (thereby  excluding  two  other 
major  groups  of  beneficiaries—private  schools  and  libraries)  and  did  not  isolate  the 
impact of E-rate funding from other sources of funding, such as state and local gov-
ernment. This is a significant measurement problem because, over the years, the de-
mand  for  internal  connections  funding  by  applicants  has  exceeded  the  E-rate  funds 
available for this purpose by billions of dollars. Unsuccessful applicants had to rely 
on other sources of support to meet their internal connection needs. Even with these 
E-rate  funding  limitations,  there  has  been  significant  growth  in  Internet  access  for 
public schools since the program issued its first funding commitments in late 1998. 
At the time, according to data from the Department of Education’s National Center 
for  Educational  Statistics  (NCES),  89  percent  of  all  public  schools  and  51  percent 
of  public  school  instructional  classrooms  already  had  Internet  access.  By  2002,  99 
percent  of  public  schools  and  92  percent  of  public  school  instructional  classrooms 
had  Internet  access. 28 Yet  although  billions  of  dollars  in  E-rate  funds  have  been 
committed since 1998, adequate program data was not developed to answer a funda-
mental  performance  question:  How  much  of  the  increase  since  1998  in  public 
schools’ Internet access has been a result of the E-rate program, as opposed to other 
sources of federal, state, local, and private funding? 

Performance  goals  and  measures  are  used  not  only  to  assess  a  program’s  impact 
but  also  to  develop  strategies  for  resolving  mission-critical  management  problems. 
However, management-oriented goals have not been a feature of FCC’s performance 
plans, despite long-standing concerns about the program’s effectiveness in key areas. 
For  example,  two  such  goals—related  to  assessing  how  well  the  program’s  competi-
tive  bidding  process  was  working  and  increasing  program  participation  by  low-in-
come  and  rural  school  districts  and  rural  libraries—were  planned  but  not  carried 
forward. 

FCC did not include any E-rate goals for fiscal years 2003 and 2004 in its recent 
annual performance reports. The failure to measure effectively the program’s impact 
on  public  and  private  schools  and  libraries  over  the  past  7  years  undercuts  one  of 
the fundamental purposes of the Results Act: to have federal agencies adopt a fact-
based,  businesslike  framework  for  program  management  and  accountability.  The 
problem  is  not  just  a  lack  of  data  for  accurately  characterizing  program  results  in 
terms of increasing Internet access. Other basic questions about the E-rate program 
also  become  more  difficult  to  address,  such  as  the  program’s  efficiency  and  cost-ef-
fectiveness in supporting the telecommunications needs of schools and libraries. For 
example, a review of the program by OMB in 2003 concluded that there was no way 
to  tell  whether  the  program  has  resulted  in  the  cost-effective  deployment  and  use 
of  advanced  telecommunications  services  for  schools  and  libraries. 29 OMB  also 
noted  that  there  was  little  oversight  to  ensure  that  the  program  beneficiaries  were 
using the funding appropriately and effectively. In response to these concerns, FCC 
staff have been working on developing new performance goals and measures for the 
E-rate  program  and  plan  to  finalize  them  and  seek  OMB  approval  in  fiscal  year 
2005. 

26 47 U.S.C. § 254(h)(2)(A). 
27 For  additional  details  on  the  Results  Act  and  its  requirements,  see  GAO,  Executive  Guide: 
Effectively  Implementing  the  Government  Performance  and  Results  Act,  GAO/GGD–96–118 
(Washington, DC: June 1996). GAO first noted the lack of clear and specific E-rate performance 
goals  and  measures  in  its  July  1998  testimony  before  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce, 
Science,  and  Transportation.  See  GAO,  Schools  and  Libraries  Corporation:  Actions  Needed  to 
Strengthen  Program  Integrity  Operations  before  Committing  Funds,  GAO/T–RCED–98–243 
(Washington, DC: July 16, 1998), pp. 15–16. 

28 See NCES, Internet Access in U.S. Public Schools and Classrooms: 1994–2002, NCES–2004–
011  (Washington,  DC;  October  2003).  This  was  the  most  recent  update  available  at  the  time  of 
our review. 

29 OMB  reviewed  E-rate  using  its  Program  Assessment  Rating  Tool  (PART),  which  is  a  diag-
nostic  tool  intended  to  provide  a  consistent  approach  to  evaluating  federal  programs  as  part  of 
the executive budget formulation process. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

FCC’s  Oversight  Mechanisms  Are  Not  Fully  Effective  in  Managing  the

E-rate Program 

FCC  testified  before  Congress  in  June  2004  that  it  relies  on  three  chief  compo-
nents in overseeing the E-rate program: rulemaking proceedings, beneficiary audits, 
and  fact-specific  adjudicatory  decisions  (i.e.,  appeals  decisions).  We  found  weak-
nesses  with  FCC’s  implementation  of  each  of  these  mechanisms,  limiting  the  effec-
tiveness  of  FCC’s  oversight  of  the  program  and  the  enforcement  of  program  proce-
dures to guard against waste, fraud, and abuse of E-rate funding. 
FCC’s Rulemakings Have Led to Problems with USAC’s Procedures and Enforcement 

of Those Procedures 

As part of its oversight of the E-rate program, FCC is responsible for establishing 
new rules and policies for the program or making changes to existing rules, as well 
as providing the detailed guidance that USAC requires to effectively administer the 
program.  FCC  carries  out  this  responsibility  through  its  rulemaking  process.  FCC’s 
E-rate  rulemakings,  however,  have  often  been  broadly  worded  and  lacking  speci-
ficity. Thus, USAC has needed to craft the more detailed administrative procedures 
necessary  to  implement  the  rules.  However,  in  crafting  administrative  procedures, 
USAC  is  strictly  prohibited  under  FCC  rules  from  making  policy,  interpreting  un-
clear  provisions  of  the  statute  or  rules,  or  interpreting  the  intent  of  Congress.  We 
were  told  by  FCC  and  USAC  officials  that  USAC  does  not  put  procedures  in  place 
without  some  level  of  FCC  approval.  We  were  also  told  that  this  approval  is  some-
times  informal,  such  as  e-mail  exchanges  or  telephone  conversations  between  FCC 
and USAC staff. This approval can come in more formal ways as well, such as when 
the  commission  expressly  endorses  USAC  operating  procedures  in  commission  or-
ders  or  codifies  USAC  procedures  into  FCC’s  rules.  However,  two  problems  have 
arisen with USAC administrative procedures. 

First,  although  USAC  is  prohibited  under  FCC  rules  from  making  policy,  some 
USAC  procedures  deal  with  more  than  just  ministerial  details  and  arguably  rise  to 
the level of policy decisions. For example, in June 2004, USAC was able to identify 
at  least  a  dozen  administrative  procedures  that,  if  violated  by  the  applicant,  would 
lead  to  complete  or  partial  denial  of  the  funding  request  even  though  there  was  no 
precisely corresponding FCC rule. The critical nature of USAC’s administrative pro-
cedures is further illustrated by FCC’s repeated codification of them throughout the 
history  of  the  program.  FCC’s  codification  of  USAC  procedures—after  those  proce-
dures  have  been  put  in  place  and  applied  to  program  participants—raises  concerns 
about  whether  these  procedures  are  more  than  ministerial  and  are,  in  fact,  policy 
changes that should be coming from FCC in the first place. Moreover, in its August 
2004  order  (in  a  section  dealing  with  the  resolution  of  audit  findings),  the  commis-
sion  directs  USAC  to  annually  ‘‘identify  any  USAC  administrative  procedures  that 
should  be  codified  in  our  rules  to  facilitate  program  oversight.’’  This  process  begs 
the  question  of  which  entity  is  really  establishing  the  rules  of  the  E-rate  program 
and raises concerns about the depth of involvement by FCC staff with the manage-
ment of the program. 

Second,  even  though  USAC  procedures  are  issued  with  some  degree  of  FCC  ap-
proval,  enforcement  problems  could  arise  when  audits  uncover  violations  of  USAC 
procedures by beneficiaries or service providers. The FCC IG has expressed concern 
over situations where USAC administrative procedures have not been formally codi-
fied because commission staff have stated that, in such situations, there is generally 
no legal basis to recover funds from applicants that failed to comply with the USAC 
procedures. In its August 2004 order, the commission attempted to clarify the rules 
of the program with relation to recovery of funds. However, even under the August 
2004  order,  the  commission  did  not  clearly  address  the  treatment  of  beneficiaries 
who violate a USAC administrative procedure that has not been codified. 
FCC Has Been Slow to Address Problems Raised by Audit Findings 

FCC’s  use  of  beneficiary  audits  as  an  oversight  mechanism  has  also  had  weak-
nesses,  although  FCC  and  USAC  are  now  working  to  address  some  of  these  weak-
nesses.  Since  2000,  there  have  been  122  beneficiary  audits  conducted  by  outside 
firms, 57 by USAC staff, and 14 by the FCC IG (two of which were performed under 
agreement  with  the  Inspector  General  of  the  Department  of  the  Interior).  Bene-
ficiary  audits  are  the  most  robust  mechanism  available  to  the  commission  in  the 
oversight  of  the  E-rate  program,  yet  FCC  generally  has  been  slow  to  respond  to 
audit findings and has not made full use of the audit findings as a means to under-
stand and resolve problems within the program. 

First,  audit  findings  can  indicate  that  a  beneficiary  or  service  provider  has  vio-
lated existing E-rate program rules. In these cases, USAC or FCC can seek recovery 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

of  E-rate  funds,  if  justified. 30 In  the  FCC  IG’s  May  2004  Semiannual  Report,  how-
ever,  the  IG  observes  that  audit  findings  are  not  being  addressed  in  a  timely  man-
ner and that, as a result, timely action is not being taken to recover inappropriately 
disbursed  funds. 31 The  IG  notes  that  in  some  cases  the  delay  is  caused  by  USAC 
and, in other cases, the delay is caused because USAC is not receiving timely guid-
ance  from  the  commission  (USAC  must  seek  guidance  from  the  commission  when 
an  audit  finding  is  not  a  clear  violation  of  an  FCC  rule  or  when  policy  questions 
are raised). Regardless, the recovery of inappropriately disbursed funds is important 
to the integrity of the program and needs to occur in a timely fashion. 

Second,  under  GAO’s  Standards  for  Internal  Controls  in  the  Federal  Govern-
ment, 32 agencies  are  responsible  for  promptly  reviewing  and  evaluating  findings 
from  audits,  including  taking  action  to  correct  a  deficiency  or  taking  advantage  of 
the  opportunity  for  improvement.  Thus,  if  an  audit  shows  a  problem  but  no  actual 
rule  violation,  FCC  should  be  examining  why  the  problem  arose  and  determining 
if a rule change is needed to address the problem (or perhaps simply addressing the 
problem  through  a  clarification  to  applicant  instructions  or  forms).  FCC  has  been 
slow,  however,  to  use  audit  findings  to  make  programmatic  changes.  For  example, 
several important audit findings from the 1998 program year were only recently re-
solved by an FCC rulemaking in August 2004. 

In its August 2004 order, the commission concluded that a standardized, uniform 
process for resolving audit findings was necessary, and directed USAC to submit to 
FCC  a  proposal  for  resolving  audit  findings.  FCC  also  instructed  USAC  to  specify 
deadlines  in  its  proposal  ‘‘to  ensure  audit  findings  are  resolved  in  a  timely  man-
ner.’’ 33 USAC submitted its Proposed Audit Resolution Plan to FCC on October 28, 
2004.  The  plan  memorializes  much  of  the  current  audit  process  and  provides  dead-
lines  for  the  various  stages  of  the  audit  process.  FCC  released  the  proposed  audit 
plan for public comment in December 2004. 34 

In  addition  to  the  Proposed  Audit  Resolution  Plan,  the  commission  instructed 
USAC  to  submit  a  report  to  FCC  on  a  semiannual  basis  summarizing  the  status 
of  all  outstanding  audit  findings.  The  commission  also  stated  that  it  expects  USAC 
to  identify  for  commission  consideration  on  at  least  an  annual  basis  all  audit  find-
ings  raising  management  concerns  that  are  not  addressed  by  existing  FCC  rules. 
Lastly,  the  commission  took  the  unusual  step  of  providing  a  limited  delegation  to 
the  Wireline  Competition  Bureau  (the  bureau  within  FCC  with  the  greatest  share 
of the responsibility for managing the E-rate program) to address audit findings and 
to act on requests for waiver of rules warranting recovery of funds. 35 These actions 
could  help  ensure,  on  a  prospective  basis,  that  audit  findings  are  more  thoroughly 
and  quickly  addressed.  However,  much  still  depends  on  timely  action  being  taken 
by FCC, particularly if audit findings suggest the need for a rulemaking. 

In  addition  to  problems  with  responding  to  audit  findings,  the  audits  conducted 
to  date  have  been  of  limited  use  because  neither  FCC  nor  USAC  have  conducted 
an  audit  effort  using  a  statistical  approach  that  would  allow  them  to  project  the 
audit  results  to  all  E-rate  beneficiaries.  Thus,  at  present,  no  one  involved  with  the 
E-rate  program  has  a  basis  for  making  a  definitive  statement  about  the  amount  of 
waste,  fraud,  and  abuse  in  the  program. 36 Of  the  various  groups  of  beneficiary  au-
dits conducted to date, all were of insufficient size and design to analyze the amount 
of  fraud  or  waste  in  the  program  or  the  number  of  times  that  any  particular  prob-
lem  might  be  occurring  programwide.  At  the  time  we  concluded  our  review,  FCC 

30 USAC,  through  its  duties  as  administrator  of  the  fund,  initially  seeks  recovery  of  erro-
neously disbursed funds. In addition, the commission adopted rules in April 2003 to provide for 
suspension and debarment from the program for persons convicted of criminal violations or held 
civilly  liable  for  certain  acts  arising  from  their  E-rate  participation.  Debarments  would  be  for 
a period of three years unless circumstances warrant a longer debarment period in order to pro-
tect the public interest. 

31 See  FCC,  Office  of  the  Inspector  General  Semiannual  Report  to  Congress,  October  1,  2003–

March 31, 2004 (Washington, DC; May 3, 2004). 

32 GAO/AIMD–00–21.3.1. 
33 FCC, Fifth Report and Order, In the Matter of Schools and Libraries Universal Service Sup-

port Mechanism, FCC–04–190 (Washington, DC; Aug. 13, 2004), para. 74. 

34 Comments were due January 5, 2005; reply comments were due January 20, 2005. 
35 FCC 04–190, para. 75. 
36 In  testimony  before  the  House  Subcommittee  on  Oversight  and  Investigations  of  the  Com-
mittee  on  Energy  and  Commerce  in  June  2004,  FCC’s  Inspector  General  submitted  a  prepared 
statement  that  said  the  ‘‘results  of  audits  that  have  been  performed  and  the  allegations  under 
investigation  lead  us  to  believe  the  program  may  be  subject  to  unacceptably  high  risk  of  fraud, 
waste and abuse.’’ At the same hearing, the Chief of FCC’s Office of Strategic Planning and Pol-
icy Analysis and the Deputy Chief of FCC’s Wireline Competition Bureau submitted a prepared 
statement that said that FCC had ‘‘enabled implementation of the [E-rate] statutory goals with 
a minimum of fraud, waste, and abuse.’’

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

and  USAC  were  in  the  process  of  soliciting  and  reviewing  responses  to  a  Request 
for Proposal for audit services to conduct additional beneficiary audits. 
FCC Has Been Slow to Act on Some E-rate Appeals 

Under  FCC’s  rules,  program  participants  can  seek  review  of  USAC’s  decisions, 37 
although FCC’s appeals process for the E-rate program has been slow in some cases. 
Because  appeals  decisions  are  used  as  precedent,  this  slowness  adds  uncertainty  to 
the  program  and  impacts  beneficiaries.  FCC  rules  state  that  FCC  is  to  decide  ap-
peals  within  90  days,  although  FCC  can  extend  this  period.  At  the  time  of  our  re-
view  there  was  a  substantial  appeals  backlog  at  FCC  (i.e.,  appeals  pending  for 
longer  than  90  days).  Out  of  1,865  appeals  to  FCC  from  1998  through  the  end  of 
2004,  approximately  527  appeals  remain  undecided,  of  which  458  (25  percent)  are 
backlog appeals. 38 

We  were  told  by  FCC  officials  that  some  of  the  backlog  is  due  to  staffing  issues. 
FCC officials said they do not have enough staff to handle appeals in a timely man-
ner. FCC officials also noted that there has been frequent staff turnover within the 
E-rate program, which adds some delay to appeals decisions because new staff nec-
essarily take time to learn about the program and the issues. Additionally, we were 
told that another factor contributing to the backlog is that the appeals have become 
more  complicated  as  the  program  has  matured.  Lastly,  some  appeals  may  be  tied 
up if the issue is currently in the rulemaking process. 

The  appeals  backlog  is  of  particular  concern  given  that  the  E-rate  program  is  a 
technology program. An applicant who appeals a funding denial and works through 
the process to achieve a reversal and funding two years later might have ultimately 
won  funding  for  outdated  technology.  FCC  officials  told  us  that  they  are  working 
to resolve all backlogged E-rate appeals by the end of calendar year 2005. 
Summary 

In  summary,  we  remain  concerned  that  FCC  has  not  done  enough  to  proactively 
manage and provide a framework of government accountability for the multibillion-
dollar E-rate program. Lack of clarity about what accountability standards apply to 
the  program  causes  confusion  among  program  participants  and  can  lead  to  situa-
tions  where  funding  commitments  are  interrupted  pending  decisions  about  applica-
ble law, such as happened with the Antideficiency Act in the fall of 2004. Ineffective 
performance  goals  and  measures  make  it  difficult  to  assess  the  program’s  effective-
ness and chart its future course. Weaknesses in oversight and enforcement can lead 
to  misuse  of  E-rate  funding  by  program  participants  that,  in  turn,  deprives  other 
schools and libraries whose requests for support were denied due to funding limita-
tions. 

To  address  these  management  and  oversight  problems  identified  in  our  review  of 
the  E-rate  program,  our  report  recommends  that  the  Chairman  of  FCC  direct  com-
mission staff to (1) conduct and document a comprehensive assessment to determine 
whether  all  necessary  government  accountability  requirements,  policies,  and  prac-
tices have been applied and are fully in place to protect the E-rate program and uni-
versal service funding; (2) establish meaningful performance goals and measures for 
the  E-rate  program;  and  (3)  develop  a  strategy  for  reducing  the  E-rate  program’s 
appeals backlog, including ensuring that adequate staffing resources are devoted to 
E-rate appeals. 

We  provided  a  draft  of  our  report  to  FCC  for  comment.  FCC  said  that  it  took  a 
number  of  steps  in  2004  to  improve  its  management  and  oversight  of  the  program, 
and anticipates taking additional steps during the coming year. FCC concurred with 
our  recommendations  on  establishing  performance  goals  and  measures  and  devel-
oping  a  strategy  for  reducing  the  backlog  of  appeals.  FCC  did  not  concur  with  our 
recommendation  that  it  conduct  a  comprehensive  assessment  concerning  the  appli-
cability  of  government  accountability  requirements,  policies,  and  practices.  FCC 
maintains  that  it  has  already  done  so  on  a  case-by-case  basis.  As  noted  in  our  re-
port, however, we believe that major issues remain unresolved, such as the implica-
tions of FCC’s determination that the Universal Service Fund constitutes an appro-
priation under the current structure of the E-rate program and the extent to which 
FCC has delegated some program functions to USAC. 

37 Virtually all of the decisions made by FCC and USAC in their management and administra-
tion  of  the  E-rate  program  may  be  subject  to  petition  for  reconsideration  or  appeal  by  bene-
ficiaries.  Moreover,  schools  and  libraries  have  the  option  of  multiple  appeal  levels,  including 
USAC, the Wireline Competition Bureau, and the commission. 

38 The  bulk  of  the  appeals  are  to  USAC,  which  received  a  total  of  16,782  appeals  from  the 
beginning of the program through 2003. Of these, 646—roughly 4 percent—remained undecided 
as of September 20, 2004. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Scope and Methodology 

25

We  conducted  our  work  from  December  2003  through  December  2004  in  accord-
ance  with  generally  accepted  government  auditing  standards.  We  interviewed  offi-
cials from FCC’s Wireline Competition Bureau, Enforcement Bureau, Office of Gen-
eral  Counsel,  Office  of  Managing  Director,  Office  of  Strategic  Planning  and  Policy 
Analysis, and Office of Inspector General. We also interviewed officials from USAC. 
In  addition,  we  interviewed  officials  from  OMB  and  the  Department  of  Education 
regarding performance goals and measures. OMB had conducted its own assessment 
of  the  E-rate  program  in  2003,  which  we  also  discussed  with  OMB  officials.  We  re-
viewed and analyzed FCC, USAC, and OMB documents related to the management 
and  oversight  of  the  E-rate  program.  The  information  we  gathered  was  sufficiently 
reliable for the purposes of our review. See our full report for a more detailed expla-
nation of our scope and methodology. 

This concludes my prepared statement. I would be pleased to respond to any ques-

tions that you or other Members of the Committee may have. 

APPENDIX I: FISCAL LAW ISSUES INVOLVING THE UNIVERSAL SERVICE FUND 

There have been questions from the start of the E-rate program regarding the na-
ture of the Universal Service Fund (USF) and the applicability of managerial, fiscal, 
and  financial  accountability  requirements  to  USF.  FCC  has  never  clearly  deter-
mined  the  nature  of  USF,  and  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  (OMB),  the 
Congressional Budget Office (CBO), and GAO have at various times noted that USF 
has not been recognized or treated as federal funds for several purposes. 1 However, 
FCC  has  never  confronted  or  assessed  these  issues  in  a  comprehensive  fashion  and 
has  only  recently  begun  to  address  a  few  of  these  issues.  In  particular,  FCC  has 
recently  concluded  that  as  a  permanent  indefinite  appropriation,  USF  is  subject  to 
the Antideficiency Act and its funding commitment decision letters constitute obliga-
tions  for  purposes  of  the  Antideficiency  Act.  As  explained  below,  we  agree  with 
FCC’s  determination.  However,  FCC’s  conclusions  concerning  the  status  of  USF 
raise  further  issues  related  to  the  collection,  deposit,  obligation,  and  disbursement 
of those funds—issues that FCC needs to explore and resolve. 
Background 

Universal service has been a basic goal of telecommunications regulation since the 
1950s,  when  FCC  focused  on  increasing  the  availability  of  reasonably  priced,  basic 
telephone  service.  See  Texas  Office  of  Public  Utility  Counsel  v.  FCC,  183  F.3d  393, 
405–406  (5th  Cir.,  1999),  cert.  denied  sub  nom;  Celpage  Inc.  v.  FCC,  530  U.S.  1210 
(2000).  FCC  has  not  relied  solely  on  market  forces,  but  has  used  a  combination  of 
explicit  and  implicit  subsidies  to  achieve  this  goal.  Id.  Prior  to  1983,  FCC  used  the 
regulation  of  AT&T’s  internal  rate  structure  to  garner  funds  to  support  universal 
service.  With  the  breakup  of  AT&T  in  1983,  FCC  established  a  Universal  Service 
Fund  administered  by  the  National  Exchange  Carrier  Association  (NECA).  NECA 
is an association of incumbent local telephone companies, also established at the di-
rection of the FCC. Among other things, NECA was to administer universal service 
through  interstate  access  tariffs  and  the  revenue  distribution  process  for  the  na-
tion’s  local  telephone  companies.  At  that  time,  NECA,  a  nongovernmental  entity, 
privately maintained the Universal Service Fund outside the U.S. Treasury. 

Section  254  of  the  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996  codified  the  concept  of  uni-
versal  service  and  expanded  it  to  include  support  for  acquisition  by  schools  and  li-
braries of telecommunications and Internet services. Pub. L. No. 104–104, § 254, 110 
Stat. 56 (1996) (classified at 47 U.S.C. § 254). The act defines universal service, gen-
erally,  as  a  level  of  telecommunications  services  that  FCC  establishes  periodically 
after taking into account various considerations, including the extent to which tele-
communications services are essential to education, public health, and public safety. 
47  U.S.C.  § 254(c)(1).  The  act  also  requires  that  ‘‘every  telecommunications  carrier 

1 See  GAO,  Schools  and  Libraries  Program:  Application  and  Invoice  Review  Procedures  Need 
Strengthening,  GAO–01–105,  41.  FCC’s  IG  has  also  raised  questions  regarding  the  nature  of 
USF.  FCC’s  IG  first  looked  at  USF  in  1999  as  part  of  its  audit  of  the  commission’s  fiscal  year 
1999 financial statement. During that audit, the FCC IG questioned commission staff regarding 
the  nature  of  the  fund  and,  specifically,  whether  USF  was  subject  to  the  statutory  and  regu-
latory requirements for federal funds. In the next year’s audit, the FCC IG noted that the com-
mission  could  not  ensure  that  USF  activities  were  in  compliance  with  all  laws  and  regulations 
because  the  issue  of  which  laws  and  regulations  were  applicable  to  USF  was  still  unresolved 
at the end of the audit. In the FCC IG’s reports on FCC’s financial statements from fiscal years 
1999 to 2003, the IG consistently recommended that FCC management formally define in writ-
ing  the  financial  management  roles  and  responsibilities  of  FCC  and  USAC  to  avoid  confusion 
and misunderstanding. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

26

that  provides  interstate  telecommunications  services  shall  contribute . . . to  the 
specific,  predictable,  and  sufficient  mechanisms’’  established  by  FCC  ‘‘to  preserve 
and  advance  universal  service.’’  Id.,  § 254(d).  The  act  did  not  specify  how  FCC  was 
to  administer  the  E-rate  program,  but  required  FCC,  acting  on  the  recommenda-
tions  of  the  Federal-State  Joint  Board,  to  define  universal  service  and  develop  spe-
cific, predictable, and equitable support mechanisms. 

FCC  designated  the  Universal  Services  Administrative  Company  (USAC),  a  non-
profit corporation that is a wholly owned subsidiary of NECA, as the administrator 
of  the  universal  service  mechanisms. 2 USAC  administers  the  program  pursuant  to 
FCC  orders,  rules,  and  directives.  As  part  of  its  duties,  USAC  collects  the  carriers’ 
universal  service  contributions,  which  constitute  the  Universal  Service  Fund,  and 
deposits them to a private bank account under USAC’s control and in USAC’s name. 
FCC  has  directed  the  use  of  USF  to,  among  other  things,  subsidize  advanced  tele-
communications  services  for  schools  and  libraries  in  a  program  commonly  referred 
to  as  the  E-rate  program. 3 Pursuant  to  the  E-rate  program,  eligible  schools  and  li-
braries can apply annually to receive support and can spend the funding on specific 
eligible  services  and  equipment,  including  telephone  services,  Internet  access  serv-
ices, and the installation of internal wiring and other related items. Generally, FCC 
orders,  rules,  and  directives,  as  well  as  procedures  developed  by  USAC,  establish 
the  program’s  criteria.  USAC  carries  out  the  program’s  day-to-day  operations,  such 
as answering inquiries from schools and libraries; processing and reviewing applica-
tions; making funding commitment decisions and issuing funding commitment deci-
sion letters; and collecting, managing, investing, and disbursing E-rate funds. 

Eligible  schools  and  libraries  may  apply  annually  to  receive  E-rate  support.  The 
program places schools and libraries into various discount categories, based on indi-
cators  of  need.  As  a  result  of  the  application  of  the  discount  rate  to  the  cost  of  the 
service,  the  school  or  library  pays  a  percentage  of  the  cost  for  the  service  and  the 
E-rate program covers the remainder. E-rate discounts range from 20 percent to 90 
percent. 

Once the school or library has complied with the program’s requirements and en-
tered  into  agreements  with  vendors  for  eligible  services,  the  school  or  library  must 
file  a  form  with  USAC  noting  the  types  and  costs  of  the  services  being  contracted 
for, the vendors providing the services, and the amount of discount being requested. 
USAC  reviews  the  forms  and  issues  funding  commitment  decision  letters. 4 The 
funding commitment decision letters notify the applicants of the decisions regarding 
their  E-rate  discounts.  These  funding  commitment  decision  letters  also  notify  the 
applicants  that  USAC  will  send  the  information  on  the  approved  E-rate  discounts 
to  the  providers  so  that  ‘‘preparations  can  be  made  to  begin  implementing . . . E-
rate discount(s) upon the filing [by the applicant] of . . . Form 486.’’ The applicant 
files  FCC  Form  486  to  notify  USAC  that  services  have  started  and  USAC  can  pay 
service provider invoices. Generally, the service provider seeks reimbursement from 
USAC  for  the  discounted  portion  of  the  service,  although  the  school  or  library  also 
could  pay  the  service  provider  in  full  and  then  seek  reimbursement  from  USAC  for 
the discount portion. 
What Is the Universal Service Fund? 

The  precise  phrasing  of  the  questions  regarding  the  nature  of  USF  has  varied 
over the years, including asking whether they are federal funds, appropriated funds, 
or public funds and, if so, for what purposes? While the various fiscal statutes may 
use these different terms to describe the status of funds, we think the fundamental 
issue is what statutory controls involving the collection, deposit, obligation, and dis-
bursement  of  funds  apply  to  USF.  As  explained  below,  funds  that  are  appropriated 
funds are subject, unless specifically exempted by law, to a variety of statutory pro-
visions  providing  a  scheme  of  funds  controls.  See  B–257525,  Nov.  30,  1994;  63 
Comp. Gen. 31 (1983); 35 Comp. Gen. 436 (1956); B–204078.2, May 6, 1988. On the 
other  hand,  funds  that  are  not  appropriated  funds  are  not  subject  to  such  controls 

2 In 1998, we issued a legal opinion on the then-current structure of the E-rate program where 
FCC directed the creation of the Schools and Libraries Corporation to administer the universal 
service program. Under the Government Corporation Control Act, an agency must have specific 
statutory authority to establish a corporation. 31 U.S.C. § 9102. We concluded that FCC did not 
have  authority  to  create  a  separate  independent  corporation  to  administer  the  E-rate  program. 
B–278820,  Feb.  10,  1998.  Subsequently,  FCC  eliminated  the  Schools  and  Libraries  Corporation 
as a separate entity, and restructured the universal service program to its present form. 

3 The term ‘‘E-rate’’ evolved from some individuals referring to the program as the ‘‘Education’’ 

rate. 

4 USAC could reduce the amount requested if the school or library has included ineligible serv-

ices in its application or has calculated its discount category incorrectly. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

27

unless  the  law  specifically  applies  such  controls.  Thus,  we  believe  the  initial  ques-
tion is whether USF funds are appropriated funds. 

FCC  has  concluded  that  USF  constitutes  a  permanent  indefinite  appropriation. 
We agree with FCC’s conclusion. Typical language of appropriation identifies a fund 
or  account  as  an  appropriation  and  authorizes  an  agency  to  enter  into  obligations 
and make disbursements out of available funds. For example, Congress utilizes such 
language  in  the  annual  appropriations  acts.  See  1  U.S.C.  § 105  (requiring  regular 
annual appropriations acts to bear the title ‘‘An Act making appropriations . . . ’’). 
Congress,  however,  appropriates  funds  in  a  variety  of  ways  other  than  in  regular 
annual  appropriation  acts. 5 Indeed,  our  decisions  and  those  of  the  courts  so  recog-
nize. 

Thus,  a  statute  that  contains  a  specific  direction  to  pay,  and  a  designation  of 
funds to be used, constitutes an appropriation. 63 Comp. Gen. 331 (1984); 13 Comp. 
Gen.  77  (1933).  In  these  statutes,  Congress  (1)  authorizes  the  collection  of  fees  and 
their  deposit  into  a  particular  fund,  and  (2)  makes  the  fund  available  for  expendi-
ture  for  a  specified  purpose  without  further  action  by  Congress.  This  authority  to 
obligate or expend collections without further congressional action constitutes a con-
tinuing  appropriation  or  a  permanent  appropriation  of  the  collections.  E.g.,  United 
Biscuit  Co.  v.  Wirtz,  359  F.2d  206,  212  (DC  Cir.  1965),  cert.  denied,  384  U.S.  971 
(1966); 69 Comp. Gen. 260, 262 (1990); 73 Comp. Gen. 321 (1994). Our decisions are 
replete  with  examples  of  permanent  appropriations,  such  as  revolving  funds  and 
various special deposit funds, including mobile home inspection fees collected by the 
Secretary  of  Housing  and  Urban  Development, 6 licensing  revenues  received  by  the 
Commission on the Bicentennial, 7 tolls and other receipts deposited in the Panama 
Canal Revolving Fund, 8 user fees collected by the Saint Lawrence Seaway Develop-
ment Corporation, 9 user fees collected from tobacco producers to provide tobacco in-
spection, certification and other services, 10 and user fees collected from firms using 
the Department of Agriculture’s meat grading services. 11 It is not essential for Con-
gress  to  expressly  designate  a  fund  as  an  appropriation  or  to  use  literal  language 
of ‘‘appropriation,’’ so long as Congress authorizes the expenditure of fees or receipts 
collected and deposited to a specific account or fund. 12 In cases where Congress does 
not intend these types of collections or funds to be considered ‘‘appropriated funds,’’ 
it explicitly states that in law. See e.g., 12 U.S.C. § 244 (the Federal Reserve Board 
levies  assessments  on  its  member  banks  to  pay  for  its  expenses  and  ‘‘funds  derived 
from  such  assessments  shall  not  be  construed  to  be  government  funds  or  appro-
priated  moneys’’);  12  U.S.C.  § 1422b(c)  (the  Office  of  Federal  Housing  Enterprise 
Oversight  levies  assessments  upon  the  Federal  Home  Loan  Banks  and  from  other 
sources to pay its expenses, but such funds ‘‘shall not be construed to be government 
funds or appropriated monies, or subject to apportionment for the purposes of chap-
ter 15 of title 31, or any other authority’’). 

Like  the  above  examples,  USF’s  current  authority  stems  from  a  statutorily  au-
thorized  collection  of  fees  from  telecommunication  carriers,  and  expenditures  for  a 
specified  purpose—that  is,  the  various  types  of  universal  service. 13 Thus,  USF 
meets both elements of the definition of a permanent appropriation. 

We  recognize  that  prior  to  the  passage  of  the  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996, 
there  existed  an  administratively  sanctioned  universal  service  fund.  With  the  Tele-
communications  Act  of  1996,  Congress  specifically  expanded  the  contribution  base 
of  the  fund,  statutorily  mandated  contributions  into  the  fund,  and  designated  the 

5 Congress  has  recognized  that  an  appropriation  is  a  form  of  budget  authority  that  makes 
funds  available  to  an  agency  to  incur  obligations  and  make  expenditures  in  a  number  of  dif-
ferent  statutes.  For  example,  see  2  U.S.C.  § 622(2)(A)(i)  (budget  authority  includes  ‘‘provisions 
of  law  that  make  funds  available  for  obligation  and  expenditure . . . including  the  authority 
to  obligate  and  expend  the  proceeds  of  offsetting  receipts  and  collections’’)  and  31  U.S.C. 
§ 701(2)(C)  (appropriations  include  ‘‘other  authority  making  amounts  available  for  obligation  or 
expenditure’’). 

6 59 Comp. Gen. 215 (1980). 
7 B–228777, Aug. 26, 1988. 
8 B–204078.2, May 6, 1988 and B–257525, Nov. 30, 1994. 
9 B–193573, Jan. 8, 1979; B–193573, Dec. 19, 1979; B–217578, Oct. 16, 1986. 
10 63 Comp. Gen. 285 (1984). 
11 B–191761, Sept. 22, 1978. 
12 B–193573, Dec. 19, 1979. 
13 The  United  States  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  Fifth  Circuit  has  recognized  the  governmental 
character  of  the  funds.  Texas  Office  of  Public  Utility  Counsel  v.  FCC,  183  F.3d  393,  426–428 
(5th Cir., 1999), cert. denied sub nom; Celpage Inc. v. FCC, 530 U.S. 1210 2212 (2000). The Fifth 
Circuit held that USF funds are statutorily mandated special assessments supporting a federal 
program mandated by Congress. FCC has also requested that the Department of Justice recog-
nize that USF are federal funds for purposes of representing FCC and the United States in liti-
gation involving USF, such as the False Claims Act. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

purposes  for  which  the  monies  could  be  expended.  These  congressional  actions  es-
tablished USF in a manner that meets the elements for a permanent appropriation 
and  Congress  did  not  specify  that  USF  should  be  considered  anything  other  than 
an appropriation. 14 
Does the Antideficiency Act Apply to USF? 

Appropriated  funds  are  subject  to  a  variety  of  statutory  controls  and  restrictions. 
These  controls  and  restrictions,  among  other  things,  limit  the  purposes  for  which 
they  may  be  used  and  provide  a  scheme  of  funds  control.  See  e.g.,  63  Comp.  Gen. 
110 (1983); B–257525, Nov. 30, 1994; B–228777, Aug. 26, 1988; B–223857, Feb. 27, 
1987;  35  Comp.  Gen.  436  (1956).  A  key  component  of  this  scheme  of  funds  control 
is  the  Antideficiency  Act.  B–223857,  Feb.  27,  1987.  The  Antideficiency  Act 15 has 
been  termed  ‘‘the  cornerstone  of  congressional  efforts  to  bind  the  executive  branch 
of government to the limits on expenditure of appropriated funds.’’ 16 Primarily, the 
purpose  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  is  to  prevent  the  obligation  and  expenditure  of 
funds  in  excess  of  the  amounts  available  in  an  appropriation  or  in  advance  of  the 
appropriation  of  funds.  31  U.S.C.  § 1341(a)(1).  FCC  has  determined  that  the 
Antideficiency  Act  applies  to  USF,  and  as  explained  below,  we  agree  with  FCC’s 
conclusion. 

The  Antideficiency  Act  applies  to  ‘‘officer[s]  or  employee[s]  of  the  United  States 
Government . . . mak[ing] or authoriz[ing] an expenditure or obligation . . . from 
an appropriation or fund.’’ 31 U.S.C. § 1341(a). As established above, USF is an ‘‘ap-
propriation or fund.’’ The fact that USAC, a private entity whose employees are not 
federal  officers  or  employees,  is  the  administrator  of  the  E-rate  program  and  obli-
gates  and  disburses  funds  from  USF  is  not  dispositive  of  the  application  of  the 
Antideficiency Act. This is because, as the FCC recognizes, it, not USAC, is the enti-
ty  that  is  legally  responsible  for  the  management  and  oversight  of  the  E-rate  pro-
gram  and  FCC’s  employees  are  federal  officers  and  employees  of  the  United  States 
subject to the Antideficiency Act. 17 

Where  entities  operate  with  funds  that  are  regarded  as  appropriated  funds,  such 
as  some  government  corporations,  they,  too,  are  subject  to  the  Antideficiency  Act. 
See e.g., B–223857, Feb. 27, 1987 (funds available to Commodity Credit Corporation 
pursuant  to  borrowing  authority  are  subject  to  the  Antideficiency  Act);  B–135075–
O.M.,  Feb.  14,  1975  (Inter-American  Foundation).  The  Antideficiency  Act  applies  to 
permanent  appropriations  such  as  revolving  funds 18 and  special  funds.  72  Comp. 
Gen.  59  (1992)  (Corps  of  Engineers  Civil  Works  Revolving  Fund  subject  to  the 
Antideficiency  Act);  B–120480,  Sep.  6,  1967,  B–247348,  June  22,  1992,  and  B–
260606, July 25, 1997 (GPO revolving funds subject to Antideficiency Act); 71 Comp. 
Gen.  224  (1992)  (special  fund  that  receives  fees,  reimbursements,  and  advances  for 
services available to finance its operations is subject to Antideficiency Act). 

Where Congress intends for appropriated funds to be exempt from the application 
of  statutory  controls  on  the  use  of  appropriations,  including  the  Antideficiency  Act, 
it  does  so  expressly.  See  e.g.,  B–193573,  Jan.  8,  1979;  B–193573,  Dec.  19,  1979;  B–
217578,  Oct.  16,  1986  (Saint  Lawrence  Seaway  Development  Corporation  has  ex-
press statutory authority to determine the character and necessity of its obligations 
and  is  therefore  exempt  from  many  of  the  restrictions  on  the  use  of  appropriated 
funds that would otherwise apply); B–197742, Aug. 1, 1986 (Price-Anderson Act ex-

14 The  Senate  passed  a  ‘‘sense  of  the  Senate’’  provision  that  stated,  ‘‘Federal  and  State  uni-
versal  service  contributions  are  administered  by  an  independent  nonfederal  entity  and  are  not 
deposited  into  the  federal  Treasury  and  therefore  are  not  available  for  federal  appropriations.’’ 
See section 614, H.R. 2267, as passed by the Senate (Oct. 1, 1997). However, the purpose of that 
resolution  was  to  respond  to  an  attempt  to  withhold  USF  payments  as  a  means  to  balance  the 
federal budget or achieve budget savings. We understand section 614, H.R. 2267 intended to in-
sulate  USF  from  budgetary  pressures  and  not  to  express  a  view  on  the  proper  fiscal  treatment 
of  USF.  Our  interpretation  of  USF  as  a  permanent  appropriation  is  consistent  with  the  intent 
that USF is only available for universal service and could only be changed if Congress amended 
the law to permit USF to be used for other purposes. 

15 31 U.S.C. §§ 1341, 1342 and 1517. 
16 Hopkins & Nutt, The Anti-deficiency Act (Revised Statutes 3679) and Funding Federal Con-

tracts: An Analysis, 80 Mil. L. Rev. 51, 56 (1978). 

17 Under FCC’s rules, USAC is prohibited from making policy, interpreting unclear provisions 
of the statute or rules, or interpreting the intent of Congress. 47 CFR § 54.702(c). As addressed 
below, one of the issues that remains to be resolved is whether USAC is authorized to take the 
actions  that  obligate  and  disburse  USF  funds  pursuant  to  FCC  orders,  rules,  and  directives  or 
whether FCC must implement additional steps to ensure that obligations and disbursements are 
specifically authorized by FCC officials and employees. 

18 Revolving  funds  are  funds  authorized  by  law  to  be  credited  with  collections  and  receipts 
from  various  sources  that  generally  remain  available  for  continuing  operations  of  the  revolving 
fund without further congressional action. See 72 Comp. Gen. 59 (1992). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

29

pressly exempts the Nuclear Regulatory Commission from Antideficiency Act prohi-
bition against obligations or expenditures in advance or in excess of appropriations). 
There  is  no  such  exemption  for  FCC  or  USF  from  the  prohibitions  of  the 
Antideficiency Act. Thus, USF is subject to the Antideficiency Act. 
Do  the  Funding  Commitment  Decision  Letters  Issued  to  Schools  and

Libraries Constitute Obligations? 

An  important  issue  that  arises  from  the  application  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  to 
USF  is  what  actions  constitute  obligations  chargeable  against  the  fund.  Under-
standing  the  concept  of  an  obligation  and  properly  recording  obligations  are  impor-
tant  because  an  obligation  serves  as  the  basis  for  the  scheme  of  funds  control  that 
Congress  envisioned  when  it  enacted  fiscal  laws  such  as  the  Antideficiency  Act.  B–
300480,  Apr.  9,  2003.  For  USF’s  schools  and  libraries  program,  one  of  the  main 
questions is whether the funding commitment decision letters issued to schools and 
libraries  are  properly  regarded  as  obligations.  FCC  has  determined  that  funding 
commitment  decision  letters  constitute  obligations.  And  again,  as  explained  below, 
we agree with FCC’s determination. 

Under the Antideficiency Act, an agency may not incur an obligation in excess of 
the  amount  available  to  it  in  an  appropriation  or  fund.  31  U.S.C.  § 1341(a).  Thus, 
proper  recording  of  obligations  with  respect  to  the  timing  and  amount  of  such  obli-
gations  permits  compliance  with  the  Antideficiency  Act  by  ensuring  that  agencies 
have  adequate  budget  authority  to  cover  all  of  their  obligations. 19 B–300480,  Apr. 
9,  2003.  We  have  defined  an  ‘‘obligation’’  as  a  ‘‘definite  commitment  that  creates  a 
legal  liability  of  the  government  for  the  payment  of  goods  and  services  ordered  or 
received.’’  Id.  A  legal  liability  is  generally  any  duty,  obligation  or  responsibility  es-
tablished by a statute, regulation, or court decision, or where the agency has agreed 
to  assume  responsibility  in  an  interagency  agreement,  settlement  agreement  or 
similar  legally  binding  document.  Id.  citing  to  Black’s  Law  Dictionary  925  (7th  ed. 
1999).  The  definition  of  ‘‘obligation’’  also  extends  to  ‘‘[a]  legal  duty  on  the  part  of 
the  United  States  which  constitutes  a  legal  liability  or  which  could  mature  into  a 
legal  liability  by  virtue  of  actions  on  the  part  of  the  other  party  beyond  the  control 
of the United States . . . ’’ Id. citing to 42 Comp. Gen. 733 (1963); see also McDon-
nell Douglas Corp. v. United States, 37 Fed. Cl. 295, 301 (1997). 

The funding commitment decision letters provided to applicant schools and librar-
ies  notify  them  of  the  decisions  regarding  their  E-rate  discounts.  In  other  words,  it 
notifies them whether their funding is approved and in what amounts. The funding 
commitment  decision  letters  also  notify  schools  and  libraries  that  the  information 
on  the  approved  E-rate  discounts  is  sent  to  the  providers  so  that  ‘‘preparations  can 
be  made  to  begin  implementing . . . E-rate  discount(s)  upon  the  filing  [by  appli-
cants]  of . . . Form  486.’’  The  applicant  files  FCC  Form  486  to  notify  USAC  that 
services  have  started  and  USAC  can  pay  service  provider  invoices.  At  the  time  a 
school or library receives a funding commitment decision letter, the FCC has taken 
an  action  that  accepts  a  ‘‘legal  duty . . . which  could  mature  into  a  legal  liability 
by  virtue  of  actions  on  the  part  of  the  grantee  beyond  the  control  of  the  United 
States.’’ Id. citing 42 Comp. Gen. 733, 734 (1963). In this instance, the funding com-
mitment  decision  letter  provides  the  school  or  library  with  the  authority  to  obtain 
services  from  a  provider  with  the  commitment  that  it  will  receive  a  discount  and 
the  provider  will  be  reimbursed  for  the  discount  provided.  While  the  school  or  li-
brary  could  decide  not  to  seek  the  services  or  the  discount,  so  long  as  the  funding 
commitment  decision  letter  remains  valid  and  outstanding,  USAC  and  FCC  no 
longer  control  USF’s  liability;  it  is  dependent  on  the  actions  taken  by  the  other 
party—that is, the school or library. In our view, a recordable USF obligation is in-
curred at the time of issuance of the funding commitment decision letter indicating 
approval  of  the  applicant’s  discount.  Thus,  these  obligations  should  be  recorded  in 
the  amounts  approved  by  the  funding  commitment  decision  letters.  If  at  a  later 
date, a particular applicant uses an amount less than the maximum or rejects fund-
ing, then the obligation amount can be adjusted or deobligated, respectively. 

Additional  issues  that  remain  to  be  resolved  by  FCC  include  whether  other  ac-
tions  taken  in  the  universal  service  program  constitute  obligations  and  the  timing 
of and amounts of obligations that must be recorded. For example, this includes the 
projections and data submissions by USAC to FCC and by participants in the High 

19 Legal liability for obligational accounting and to comply with the Antideficiency Act and the 
Recording Statute, 31 U.S.C. § 1501 is distinct from accounting liabilities and projections booked 
in its proprietary accounting systems for financial statement purposes. For proprietary account-
ing purposes, a liability is probable and measurable future outflow or other sacrifice of resources 
as  a  result  of  past  transactions  or  events.  See  B–300480,  Apr.  9,  2003,  and  FASAB  Statement 
of Federal Financial Accounting Standards Number 1. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

30

Cost  and  Low  Income  Support  Mechanisms  to  USAC.  FCC  has  indicated  that  it  is 
considering  this  issue  and  consulting  with  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget. 
FCC  should  also  identify  any  other  actions  that  may  constitute  recordable  obliga-
tions and ensure those are properly recorded.

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Ms. Abshire. 

SHERYL 

OF 

ABSHIRE, 

STATEMENT 

COORDINATOR 

OF 
ADMINISTRATIVE 
CALCASIEU PARISH PUBLIC SCHOOLS 
Ms.  ABSHIRE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the 
Committee.  It  is  a  great  honor  to  be  asked  to  testify  in  support  of 
universal service and the E-rate program. I’m also here to urge you 
to  support  S.  241,  a  bill  that  would  ensure  that  universal  service 
and  E-rate  discounts  continue  to  flow  to  telephone  customers, 
schools and libraries. 

DISTRICT
TECHNOLOGY, 

My name is Sheryl Abshire and I am the District Administrative 
Coordinator  of  Technology  for  Calcasieu  Parish  Public  Schools  in 
Lake Charles, Louisiana. Currently, I’m board chair of the Consor-
tium  for  School  Networking,  CoSN,  a  non-profit  education  tech-
nology  association  that  promotes  the  use  of  information  tech-
nologies  and  the  Internet  to  improve  K  through  12  education.  I’m 
also  representing  the  Education  and  Libraries  Network  Coalition, 
an  E-rate  advocacy  organization  that’s  comprised  of  every  major 
public  and  private  school  organization  and  the  American  Library 
Association. 

CoSN  and  EdLiNC  were  greatly  dismayed  by  the  E-rate’s  pro-
gram  shutdown  last  year  as  a  result  of  the  application  of  the 
Antideficiency  Act.  We  strongly  supported  Congress’  temporary  ex-
emption  from  that  Act  for  universal  service  and  E-rate.  And  I’m 
here  today  to  urge  Congress  to  pass  S.  241  and  prevent  a  replay 
of last year’s devastating funding disruption. 

The  E-rate  has  had  an  extraordinary  nationwide  impact  on  edu-
cation  in  its  7  years  of  existence.  It  has  improved  schools’  public 
classroom  connections  to  the  Internet  from  14  percent  in  1998  to 
93 percent as of 2003. It has allowed students in rural and isolated 
areas  to  take  online  courses  in  subjects  not  available  in  their 
schools.  It  has  also  permitted  teachers  to  take  online  accreditation 
courses to become highly qualified as required by No Child Left Be-
hind. 

Let me now say a few words about what the E-rate has done for 
my  school  district  in  Lake  Charles,  Louisiana.  The  Calcasieu  Par-
ish Public Schools educates over 32,000 students and employs more 
than  5,000  people.  We  are  the  sixth  largest  school  district  in  the 
state and the largest employer in the parish. 

Thirty-six  percent  of  our  student  population  is  from  minority 
groups  and  53  percent  of  our  students  are  eligible  for  the  Federal 
free  and  reduced  price  lunch  program.  We  qualified  for  a  72  per-
cent E-rate discount. Before E-rate, our connectivity primarily con-
sisted  of  dialup  connections  and  the  technology  program  consisted 
of random trainings to teachers in how to use computers. 

Today,  however,  all  this  has  changed.  We  now  have  over  11,000 
computers connected to our network and at any given moment over 
6,000  of  them  are  accessing  the  network.  Each  day  our  students, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

31

our teachers, and our administrators make more than three million 
web  page  or  network  object  requests  and  send  and  receive  over 
30,000 e-mail messages and transmit an astounding 14.5 gigabytes 
of  data.  Last  fall,  our  school  system  was  recognized  as  one  of  the 
most  digitally  advanced  in  the  country  by  the  Center  for  Digital 
Education and the National School Boards Association. 

How did all this occur in such a short period of time? The answer 
is simply E-rate. Over the E-rate’s first 7 years, the Calcasieu Par-
ish  schools  have  received  just  over  $4  million  in  E-rate  discounts. 
We have used this money for infrastructure upgrades that will sup-
port  100  megabit  connections  to  every  desktop  of  every  computer 
in our district. E-rate discounts also support our telephone service, 
cellular phones and installation and upgrade of our high speed net-
work to all 59 of our schools in our compressed video services. I be-
lieve that we have made good use of our E-rate support. 

Each  year  we  have  paid  careful  heed  to  our  district’s  needs  and 
we  only  sought  E-rate  discounts  in  accordance  with  documented 
needs.  We  have  never  attempted  to  maximize  our  E-rate  discounts 
nor  have  we  overbought  technology.  We  understand  that  E-rate  is 
a  finite  and  precious  resource  particularly  because  it  has  a  hard 
cap of 2.25 billion per year. 

We also know that our technology infrastructure is useless with-
out ample instruction on how to use it and integrate it into the cur-
riculum.  We  provide  extensive  professional  development  for  teach-
ers and administrators before we apply any type of technology. But 
the real proof of the E-rate is in its impact on students. 

A  prime  example  is  the  story  of  John  F.  Kennedy  Elementary. 
It’s  a  school  where  95  percent  of  the  students  participate  in  a  free 
lunch  program.  Thirty-seven  percent  of  its  student  scored  below 
basic  in  reading  and  75  percent  scored  below  basic  in  math.  We 
used  E-rate  discounts  to  connect  every  classroom  to  the  Internet, 
then we used Title I dollars to purchase computers for every class-
room  and  established  after  school  programs  at  Kennedy  that  tar-
geted  online  technology  resources  to  specific  documented  student 
needs. 

The  results  have  been  outstanding.  Recent  test  scores  indicate 
only  16  percent  of  these  students  are  now  below  basic  in  reading 
and  only  21  percent  scored  below  basic  in  math.  In  response,  the 
U.S.  Department  of  Education  awarded  Kennedy  Elementary  the 
Title  I  distinguished  school  award  for  closing  the  achievement  gap 
among all groups in the school. 

I’m  convinced  that  E-rate  played  a  significant  role  in  this  situa-
tion.  All  this  leads  me  to  implore  you  to  make  sure  the  program 
remains  smooth,  running  and  vibrant.  The  Universal  Service  Ad-
ministrative Company shut down of the program for 3 months last 
year  was  a  major  catastrophe  for  my  district.  We  were  delayed  in 
implementing our infrastructure, a delay in implementing a library 
resource  center  and  what  a  tragedy  for  our  teachers  and  students 
to  be  ready,  willing  and  able  to  make  use  of  their  resources  only 
to be denied because of an accounting issue. 

In sum, E-rate has been a blessing for my district. This propelled 
us  from  the  technology  backwater  to  a  nationally  recognized  dis-
trict  in  6  years.  It  placed  distance  learning,  professional  develop-
ment and resources at the fingertips of everyone, and it’s helped us 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

32

to  make  significant  progress.  Please  help  to  us  continue  our  work 
by preventing any unnecessary disruptions to the programs. 

I  want  to  thank  Senators  Snowe  and  Rockefeller  for  introducing 
the  bill,  Chairman  Stevens  and  Ranking  Member  Inouye  for  sign-
ing on as original co-sponsors, and all of the Senators who have co-
sponsored it. Thank you for this hearing today, Chairman Stevens, 
for giving me an opportunity to share my views on Universal Serv-
ice and E-rate and I would be pleased to take any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Abshire follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SHERYL ABSHIRE, DISTRICT ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR 

OF TECHNOLOGY, CALCASIEU PARISH PUBLIC SCHOOLS 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee. It is a great honor to 
be asked to testify before you today in support of a program that I care for deeply—
universal  service  and,  especially,  the  E-rate  program—and  in  favor  of  S.  241,  a  bill 
that  would  ensure  that  universal  service  and  E-rate  support  continue  to  flow  unin-
terrupted to deserving telephone consumers, schools and libraries. 

My  name  is  Sheryl  Abshire  and  I  have  been  the  District  Administrative  Coordi-
nator of Technology for Calcasieu Parish Public Schools in Lake Charles, Louisiana 
for  the  past  7  years.  I  have  been  an  educator  for  more  than  30  years,  serving  var-
iously  as  a  school  principal,  K–5  teacher,  a  library/media  specialist,  a  classroom 
teacher, and an adjunct college professor. I have substantial experience with the in-
tegration  of  education  technology  into  the  classroom,  including  working  with  the 
International  Society  for  Technology  in  Education  to  compile  technology  standards 
for teachers, students, and most recently school administrators. 

Currently,  I  hold  the  Board  Chair  of  the  Consortium  for  School  Networking—or 
CoSN,  a  non-profit  education  technology  association  that  promotes  the  use  of  infor-
mation  technologies  and  the  Internet  to  improve  K–12  education.  CoSN  has  long 
been  a  champion  of  the  E-rate  program  and  views  it  as  essential  to  attaining  the 
high  goals  of  the  No  Child  Left  Behind  Act  and  preparing  our  students  for  today’s 
competitive, high-tech oriented job market. 

CoSN  was  greatly  dismayed  by  the  E-rate  program’s  shutdown  last  year  as  a  re-
sult of the application of the Antideficiency Act to the E-rate program. We strongly 
supported  the  ultimately  successful  efforts  to  gain  a  temporary  exemption  from  a 
key  provision  of  that  Act  for  all  of  universal  service,  including  the  E-rate.  I  come 
before you today to urge that last year’s temporary exemption to the Antideficiency 
Act  be  made  permanent  and  to  state  my  support  and  that  of  the  Consortium  for 
School Networking for S. 241, a bill that would do just that. 

I  am  also  here  representing  the  Education  and  Libraries  Networks  Coalition—or 
EdLiNC,  an  E-rate  advocacy  organization  that  is  comprised  of  every  major  public 
and private school organization, including CoSN, and the American Library Associa-
tion. EdLiNC has advocated in support of the E-rate program since its inception and 
continues  to  this  day  to  work  to  address  E-rate  implementation  issues  before  Con-
gress and the FCC. 

I am attaching as part of my testimony today a letter (Exhibit A), signed by nine-
teen  EdLiNC  member  organizations,  that  details  the  extraordinary  impact  that  the 
E-rate has had nationwide, particularly its success in improving public school class-
room  connections  to  the  Internet  from  14  percent  in  1998,  when  the  E-rate  first 
rolled-out, to 93 percent as of 2003. The letter also outlines how the E-rate has been 
instrumental  in  improving  education  by  affording  students  in  rural  and  isolated 
areas  the  opportunity  to  take  online  courses  in  subjects  not  available  in  their 
schools. It has also permitted teachers to take online accreditation courses that help 
them attain the ‘‘highly qualified’’ status required by the No Child Left Behind Act. 
In  order  to  continue  this  good  work,  EdLiNC  urges—as  do  CoSN  and  I—that  Con-
gress pass S. 241 and prevent a replay of last year’s devastating funding disruption. 
While I have spoken of the tremendous national impact of the E-rate, please allow 
me  to  say  a  few  words  about  all  that  the  E-rate  has  done  for  my  school  district  in 
Lake Charles, Louisiana. Calcasieu Parish Public Schools educates over 32,000 stu-
dents  and  employs  more  than  5,000  people.  We  are  the  sixth  largest  school  district 
in the state and the largest employer in the parish. Thirty-six percent of our student 
population is from a minority group and 53 percent of all Calcasieu Parish students 
are eligible for the federal free-and-reduced price lunch program. Based on this last 
figure,  Calcasieu  Parish  Public  Schools  qualified  this  year  for  a  72  percent  E-rate 
discount rate. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

33

When the E-rate began over 7 years ago, our connectivity consisted of a few dial-
up connections in our school libraries, and our technology professional development 
program  consisted  of  random  trainings  to  teach  teachers  just  how  to  turn  on  the 
computers and, occasionally, how to use a specific program with a student. 

Today, this has all changed. We now have over 11,000 computers connected to our 
network  and,  at  any  given  moment,  over  6,000  of  them  are  accessing  the  network. 
Each day, our students, teachers and administrators make more than 3 million web 
page  or  network  object  requests,  send  or  receive  over  30,000  e-mail  messages,  and 
transmit 14.5 gigabytes of data. Last fall, the Center for Digital Education and Na-
tional School Boards Association recognized us as one of the most digitally advanced 
large district school boards in the country. 

How  did  all  of  this  occur  in  such  a  short  period  of  time?  The  answer  is  the  E-

rate. 

Calcasieu  Parish  Public  Schools  has  applied  for  E-rate  discounts  in  each  of  the 
program’s  first  7  years,  receiving  to  date  just  over  $4  million.  A  sizable  chunk  of 
this  money  has  gone  to  support  a  currently  ongoing  infrastructure  upgrade  that, 
when  completed,  will  support  100  megabit  connections  to  all  11,000  desktops  at-
tached  to  our  network.  The  vast  majority  of  these  funds  have  been  used  to  support 
plain  old  telephone  service,  cellular  phone  service,  the  installation  and  upgrade  of 
a  high-speed  network  to  all  of  our  59  schools,  and  the  bandwidth  used  by  our  com-
pressed video services. 

I  believe  that  we  have  made  wise  use  of  our  E-rate  support.  Each  year,  we  have 
paid careful heed to our district’s technology needs and its financial capabilities, as 
laid  out  in  our  collaboratively  developed  technology  plan,  and  have  only  sought  E-
rate  discounts  in  accordance  with  documented  needs.  We  have  never  attempted  to 
‘‘maximize  our  E-rate  discounts,’’  nor  have  we  ‘‘over-bought’’  technology  or  network 
resources  with  E-rate  support.  At  Calcasieu  Parish  Public  Schools  we  understand 
that  the  E-rate  is  a  finite  and  precious  resource,  particularly  since  it  has  a  hard 
annual cap of $2.25 billion per year. 

We also know, though, that our technology infrastructure is useless without ample 
instruction  on  how  to  use  it  and  integrate  it  into  the  curriculum.  For  that  reason, 
no technology has been deployed in our district without intensive professional devel-
opment  for  teachers  and  administrators.  We  provide  intensive  professional  develop-
ment  courses  annually  to  over  300  teachers  and  over  300  pre-service  teacher  can-
didates,  rotating  that  training  to  different  grade  levels  each  year.  Additionally,  all 
teachers  in  our  district  actively  participate  in  instructional  technology  training 
through  online  and  face-to-face  workshops  and  in-service  trainings.  These  profes-
sional development efforts have paid-off with our recent national recognition for in-
novative use of online professional development using the Blackboard platform. 

The  real  proof  of  the  value  of  Calcasieu’s  and  the  E-rate’s  investment  in  techno-
logical  infrastructure,  however,  is  its  impact  on  our  students.  The  formal  mission 
of  my  department  is  to  ‘‘Advance  Quality  Education  with  Technology.’’  The  E-rate 
is helping us accomplish this goal. 

A prime example from Calcasieu Parish of which I am particularly proud is John 
F.  Kennedy  Elementary.  A  few  years  ago,  Kennedy  Elementary,  a  high  poverty 
school  where  95  percent  of  its  students  participate  in  the  federal  lunch  program, 
was  a  failing  school.  Starting  in  1998,  we  used  E-rate  discounts  to  connect  all  of 
its classrooms to the Internet and strategically leveraged Title I dollars to purchase 
computers  for  each  classroom.  The  district  then  established  after  school  programs 
at Kennedy that targeted online technology resources to specific student needs that 
we identified through multiple assessment analyses. 

The  results  have  been  outstanding.  Last  year,  Kennedy  Elementary  was  recog-
nized as one of the leading schools in the State of Louisiana for closing the achieve-
ment gap among all groups in the school, performing above the state average in all 
school  performance  categories  and  successfully  meeting  AYP—Annual  Yearly 
Progress as defined by NCLB. The U.S. Department of Education awarded Kennedy 
Elementary  the  Distinguished  Schools  Award  for  ‘‘outstanding  achievement  and 
progress towards the goal that all students achieve the state standards of academic 
excellence.’’ I am convinced that E-rate played a significant role in this achievement 
by  delivering  the  online  educational  resources  that  helped  spur  these  incredible 
gains. 

All  of  this  leads  me  to  implore  you  to  make  sure  that  the  program  remains  not 
just  in  operation  but  smooth  running  and  vibrant.  The  Universal  Service  Adminis-
trative  Company  shutdown  of  the  program  for  three  months  last  year  was  a  major 
catastrophe  for  our  district.  Overall,  it  set  back  our  infrastructure  upgrade  any-
where  from  six  months  to  a  year.  This  inability  to  complete  our  upgrade,  in  turn, 
caused  extensive  delays  in  fully  implementing  a  new  student  information  system 
and  data  warehouse,  both  of  which  are  critical  to  improving  instruction.  The  up-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

34

grade  delay  also  caused  us  to  eliminate  our  plans  to  launch  bandwidth  intensive 
video streaming resources in order to assure we had sufficient bandwidth to manage 
the  district’s  day-to-day  network  functions,  such  as  basic  Internet  access,  e-mail, 
and  attendance  and  grading  systems.  Finally,  the  upgrade  delays  caused  by  the 
shutdown  derailed  a  long-planned  upgrade  of  our  library  resources,  which  would 
have  established  a  fully  automated  district-wide  online  resource  center.  What  a 
tragedy  for  our  teachers  and  students  to  be  ready,  willing  and  able  to  make  use  of 
all  of  these  fantastic  new  resources  and  to  have  to  stand  idle  because  of  an  E-rate 
accounting issue! 

Without the passage of a permanent exemption to the Antideficiency Act, we fear 
another  shutdown  for  the  E-rate  at  the  end  of  this  year  and  even  longer  delays  in 
building-out our network and providing the learning opportunities that are essential 
for today’s students. 

In sum, the E-rate has been a blessing for my district, propelling it from a techno-
logical  backwater  to  a  nationally  recognized  technology  model  in  six  short  years. 
Our  students,  teachers,  library/media  specialists  and  administrators  have  all  bene-
fited  greatly  from  the  distance  learning  courses,  online  professional  development, 
and  the  wealth  of  Web-based  material  that  the  E-rate  has  put  at  their  fingertips. 
We  continue  to  make  significant  progress  academically  in  our  schools,  which,  in  no 
small  measure,  is  helped  by  the  E-rate.  Please  help  us  continue  our  work  by  pre-
venting any unnecessary disruptions to the program. Please pass S. 241. 

I  want  to  thank  Senators  Snowe  and  Rockefeller  for  introducing  this  bill,  Chair-
man Stevens and Ranking Member Inouye for signing-on as original cosponsors, and 
all of the Senators who have added their support to this most important legislation. 
In  particular,  I  want  to  thank  Senator  Stevens  for  holding  this  hearing  today  and 
giving me an opportunity to share my views on universal service and, most particu-
larly, the E-rate. I would be pleased to take any questions that you have. 
Exhibit A 

(EDLINC) EDUCATION AND LIBRARY NETWORKS COALITION 

April 11, 2005

United States Senate 
Washington, DC 20510

Dear Senator:
The Education and Libraries Networks Coalition (EdLiNC) greatly appreciates the 
Senate  Commerce,  Science  and  Transportation  Committee  holding  today’s  hearing 
on  S.  241,  critical  legislation  which  would  permanently  exempt  the  Universal  Serv-
ice Fund from a particular provision of the Antideficiency Act. EdLiNC is an organi-
zation  that  was  formed  by  the  leading  public  and  private  education  organizations 
and  the  American  Library  Association  to  support  the  passage  and  implementation 
of the E-rate program as part of the Telecommunications Act of 1996. We commend 
Senators  Snowe  and  Rockefeller,  Chairman  Stevens  and  Ranking  Member  Inouye, 
as  well  as  over  twenty  members  of  the  Senate  for  co-sponsoring  this  important  bill 
that  would  effectively  ensure  that  E-rate  funds  continue  to  flow  to  schools  and  li-
braries. 

Without  prompt  Congressional  passage  of  S.  241,  we  fear  that  all  universal  serv-
ice  programs  face  the  prospect  of  significant  and  possibly  protracted  funding  dis-
bursement interruptions when the current temporary exemption to the ADA expires 
in  December.  EdLiNC  fervently  hopes  that  today’s  hearing  will  help  speed  the  pas-
sage  of  S.  241  by  the  Senate  and  spur  the  House  of  Representatives  to  take  simi-
larly  quick  action  on  this  legislation.  At  the  conclusion  of  the  108th  Congress,  the 
Senate  unanimously  approved  the  existing  one-year  exemption.  This  exemption  ex-
pires at the end of this calendar year and would thereby threaten the continued flow 
of vital E-rate funds to schools and libraries. 

Since  it  commenced  operation  in  1998,  the  E-rate,  which  provides  deep  discounts 
to  public  and  private  schools  and  public  libraries  for  telecommunications  services, 
Internet  access  and  internal  connections,  has  played  a  leading  role  in  connecting 
schools  and  libraries  to  the  Internet.  In  1998,  only  14  percent  of  public  school  in-
structional classrooms were connected to the net; as of 2003, classroom Internet ac-
cess  stands  at  93  percent.  Nearly  all  public  library  outlets  are  now  able  to  offer 
Internet  access  to  their  patrons.  Private  schools  have  benefited  substantially,  as 
well,  with  88.4  percent  of  Catholic  schools  providing  student  Internet  access.  The 
E-rate’s  continuing  importance  to  schools  and  libraries  is  easily  observable  by  the 
fact that, in each funding year, requests for E-rate discounts vastly exceed the $2.25 
billion  available  annually.  These  funds  are  essential  if  schools  and  libraries  are  to 
remain connected to the Internet, the information super highway. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

35

Beyond these impressive figures, though, the E-rate is essential to schools and li-
braries  for  the  educational  and  employment  opportunities  that  it  helps  provide.  A 
2003  report  commissioned  by  EdLiNC,  entitled  E-rate:  A  Vision  of  Opportunity  and 
Innovation, found the following about the program:

• The E-rate is an important tool for economic empowerment in underserved com-

• The E-rate is beginning to bring new learning opportunities to special education 

munities.

students.

• The E-rate is transforming education in rural America.
• The E-rate is helping schools improve student achievement and comply with the 

No Child Left Behind Act.

• Schools  and  libraries  are  devoting  significant  resources  and  exercising  great 

care in completing E-rate applications.

The  story  of  two  of  the  communities  profiled  in  the  2003  report,  the  Kuspuk  and 
Kuskokwim School Districts in Southwestern Alaska, provides an excellent illustra-
tion  of  the  incomparable  value  of  the  E-rate  program.  Although  both  of  these  re-
mote, largely Eskimo and Native American villages are only accessible by single en-
gine plane, snowmobile or boat, their students now enjoy the same online resources 
as  their  peers  around  the  country  thanks  to  the  E-rate  program.  Because  of  E-rate 
supported  connectivity,  Kuspuk’s  teachers  are  able  to  exchange  lesson  plans  with 
their  counterparts  in  other  locations  and  Kuskokwim’s  students  are  able  to  over-
come  the  lack  of  certified  math  teachers  in  their  area  by  taking  online  courses  in 
math, algebra and geometry. As Kuspuk School District Superintendent Kim Lang-
ton summarized: ‘‘E-rate funds are critical to the school and to the community; with-
out E-rate funds we would be hamstrung educationally.’’ 

S.  241  will  ensure  that  E-rate  discounts  continue  to  reach  these  schools  and  oth-
ers  like  them  uninterrupted.  Last  year,  the  program  was  suspended  for  three 
months, during which time thousands of applications from schools and libraries lan-
guished  in  the  offices  of  the  E-rate’s  administrator.  This  de  facto  shutdown  of  the 
program  occurred  because  the  FCC  determined  that  a  particular  ADA  provision, 
which  bars  federal  agencies  from  obligating  funds  without  adequate  cash  on-hand 
to cover those obligations, applied to the E-rate and the program’s administrator re-
alized  that  it  had  insufficient  cash  in  its  accounts  to  cover  E-rate  funding  commit-
ment decision letters. At the same time, concerns were expressed that the universal 
service  high  cost  fund’s  projections  system  might  also  fall  within  the  ambit  of  the 
ADA,  potentially  causing  a  shutdown  of  that  program.  Fortunately,  the  108th  Con-
gress  passed  and  the  President  signed  legislation  to  exempt  for  twelve  months  all 
of  universal  service  from  that  ADA  provision,  thereby  allowing  E-rate  discounts  to 
flow again. 

However, we are drawing ever closer to another potential crisis for the E-rate and 
universal  service  when  the  ADA  exemption  expires  in  December.  Without  passage 
of  S.  241,  the  FCC  would  face  the  Hobson’s  choice  of  either  shutting  down  the  E-
rate  and/or  other  universal  service  programs  (rural  healthcare,  high  cost  telephone 
service, and low-income telephone service) for a period of time, thus depriving need-
ed E-rate discounts to deserving public and private schools and libraries, or raising 
the universal service collection rates dramatically, thereby virtually imposing major 
telephone  rate  hikes  for  consumers.  Therefore,  we  urge  you  to  preclude  the  FCC 
from making either of these bad choices and pass S. 241 to permanently exempt uni-
versal service from this single provision of the Antideficiency Act. 

We  thank  you  for  your  attention  to  this  very  critical  issue,  and  urge  you  to  sup-

port S. 241. 

Sincerely, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

36

AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF SCHOOL ADMINISTRATORS 
AMERICAN FEDERATION OF TEACHERS 
AMERICAN LIBRARY ASSOCIATION 
ASSOCIATION OF EDUCATIONAL SERVICE AGENCIES 
CONSORTIUM FOR SCHOOL NETWORKING 
COUNCIL OF CHIEF STATE SCHOOL OFFICERS 
INTERNATIONAL SOCIETY FOR TECHNOLOGY IN EDUCATION 
NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF ELEMENTARY SCHOOL PRINCIPALS 
NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF INDEPENDENT SCHOOLS 
NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF SECONDARY SCHOOL PRINCIPALS 
NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF STATE BOARDS OF EDUCATION 
NATIONAL CATHOLIC EDUCATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
NATIONAL EDUCATION ASSOCIATION 
NATIONAL EDUCATION KNOWLEDGE INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION 
NATIONAL PTA 
NATIONAL RURAL EDUCATION ADVOCACY COALITION 
NATIONAL SCHOOL BOARDS ASSOCIATION 
ORGANIZATIONS CONCERNED ABOUT RURAL EDUCATION 
UNITED STATES CONFERENCE OF CATHOLIC BISHOPS

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much.  Next  witness  is  Steve 
Hamlen,  who  is  the  President  and  CEO  of  United  Utilities,  Inc., 
which  is  in  my  state  in  an  area  ranging  from  the  Bristol  Bay  all 
the  way  over  to  Canada.  I’m  pleased  you  could  take  the  time  to 
come down, Steve. 

STATEMENT OF STEVE HAMLEN, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

UNITED UTILITIES, INC. 

Mr.  HAMLEN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Inouye  and 
Members of the Committee. I’m Steve Hamlen, CEO of United Util-
ities. We are headquartered in Anchorage, Alaska. 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  both  in 
my  capacity  as  CEO  of  United  Utilities  as  well  as  on  behalf  of  the 
United States Telecom Association in support of Senate Bill 241. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  know  you  are  very  familiar  with  my  company. 
I  would  for  the  benefit  of  the  rest  of  the  Committee  like  to  take  a 
moment  to  tell  everyone  about  United  and  why  Universal  Service 
support is so critical to my customers and company. 

United receives Universal Service Funds for eligible services pro-
vided  to  schools,  libraries,  health  care  providers  and  residents  of 
rural Alaska. We serve a population of approximately 25,000 in 60 
communities.  United’s  communities  are  accessible  only  by  air  and 
water  and  our  service  area  is  approximately  150,000  square  miles. 
That’s  comparable  to  the  size  of  the  states  of  New  York,  Pennsyl-
vania and Ohio. 

English, science and algebra classes are now being offered by dis-
tance learning networks and rural communities where it’s not been 
economical  or  feasible  for  school  districts  to  provide  a  full-time  in-
structor. Village health plans are now being assisted by doctors lo-
cated miles away. Children, teachers and health care professionals 
are  gaining  access  by  the  Internet  to  vast  amounts  of  information 
and  low-income  households  have  access  to  basic  telephone  service 
at  affordable  rates.  Clearly  the  E-rate  and  health  care  Universal 
Service  programs  have  improved  the  quality  of  health  care  and 
education. 

All  of  us  at  USTA  are  well  aware  of  the  crucial  role  played  by 
you  and  Senator  Burns  on  the  last  night  of  the  108th  Congress  to 
temporarily  resolve  the  crisis  of  applying  the  ADA  to  USAC.  We 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

37

deeply appreciate the ongoing efforts of Senators Snowe and Rocke-
feller. 

Today  the  agenda  is  on  securing  a  strong  and  viable  future  for 
Universal  Service.  We  believe  that  USAC’s  permanent  exemption 
from  the  requirements  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  is  essential  and 
that  this  exemption  should  be  permanently  codified  this  year.  The 
imposition of ADA on USAC will undermine the delivery of telenet-
working services to Alaskan communities. 

In Alaska, we face unique challenges in building communications 
infrastructure.  When  the  barge  leaves  Seattle  in  the  spring,  we 
need  to  have  our  materials  on  board.  Most  rural  communities  get 
only two barges a year. Some of them get only one. Barge deliveries 
do  not  go  past  September.  Air  transportation  is  costly  and  subject 
to  weather  and  some  items  like  towers  and  buildings  which  weigh 
several tons can only be barged. 

Without Universal Service support, it will not be possible for car-
riers like United to maintain and build infrastructures in our rural 
communities.  The  application  of  the  ADA  to  USAC  will  introduce 
uncertainty and raise havoc by disrupting funding to program par-
ticipants. 

USAC  will  be  faced,  as  it  was  last  fall,  with  having  to  suspend 
funding  applications,  the  processing  of  new  applications  will  need 
to  be  delayed.  Contribution  factors,  the  assessment  that  is  placed 
on  interstate  revenues  to  fund  Universal  Service  will  need  to  sky-
rocket  in  order  to  prefund  requests.  As  the  ADA  compliance  issue 
emerged last year, USAC informed us that in order to ensure ade-
quate funding going forward in the first quarter of 2005, USF con-
tribution  factor  might  need  to  be  increased  by  almost  50  percent. 
Mr. Chairman, Universal Service ensures that networks are via-
ble in rural areas and that the networks are continuously upgraded 
and  maintained—networks  that  reach  into  every  community  and 
provide  real  time  communications  across  rural  and  urban  America 
and across the globe. 

Consequently,  it  is  critical  that  the  continued  viability  of  Uni-
versal  Service  not  be  threatened  by  applying  the  ADA  to  USAC. 
Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, I appreciate the op-
portunity to address you today. It is critical that the current 1-year 
suspension  of  the  ADA  from  application  to  USAC  be  made  perma-
nent  by  legislation  this  year.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to 
present testimony. I’m available to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hamlen follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEVE HAMLEN, PRESIDENT AND CEO, UNITED UTILITIES, 

INC. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Inouye  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  Steve 
Hamlen, President and CEO of United Utilities, Inc. (United), headquartered in An-
chorage,  Alaska.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today,  both  in 
my  capacity  as  CEO  of  United  Utilities,  as  well  as  on  behalf  of  the  United  States 
Telecom  Association  (USTA),  in  support  of  making  the  Universal  Service  Adminis-
trative Corporation (USAC) permanently exempt from the requirements of the Anti-
deficiency Act. 

Mr. Chairman, while I know you are very familiar with my company, I would, for 
the  benefit  of  the  rest  of  the  Committee,  like  to  take  a  moment  to  tell  everyone 
about  United  and  why  universal  service  support  is  so  critical  both  to  my  company 
and our customers. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

38

United,  an  Alaskan  native-owned  telecommunications  carrier,  receives  Universal 
Service  funds  for  eligible  services  provided  to  schools,  libraries,  health  care  pro-
viders,  and  residents  in  rural  Alaska.  United  serves  a  population  of  approximately 
25,000  residing  in  60  communities.  These  communities  are  primarily  inhabited  by 
Native Americans, many of whom live a subsistence lifestyle. United’s communities 
are accessible only by air and water and this service area is approximately 150,000 
square miles—comparable to the size of New York, Pennsylvania and Ohio. English, 
Science,  and  Algebra  classes  are  now  being  offered  via  distance  learning  networks 
in  rural  communities  where  it  has  not  been  economical,  or  feasible,  for  school  dis-
tricts  to  provide  a  full  time  instructor.  Village  Health  Clinic  aides  are  now  being 
assisted  by  doctors  located  miles  away.  Children,  teachers,  and  health  care  profes-
sionals are gaining access via the Internet to vast amounts of information. And low 
income households and those living in high cost areas have access to basic telephone 
service  at  affordable  rates.  Clearly,  the  E-rate,  Rural  Health  Care  and  other  uni-
versal service programs are improving the quality of life for those living in the com-
munities United serves. 

USTA  is  the  premier  trade  association  representing  service  providers  and  sup-
pliers  of  the  telecom  industry.  USTA’s  1,200  member  companies  offer  a  wide  range 
of services, including local exchange, long distance, wireless, Internet, Internet Pro-
tocol video and telephony, and cable television service. Our membership ranges from 
the smallest rural telephone companies to some of the largest corporations in Amer-
ica. All of us in USTA are well aware of the crucial role played by you and Senator 
Burns  on  the  last  night  of  the  108th  Congress  to  temporarily  resolve  the  crisis  of 
applying the ADA to USAC. Of course, we also deeply appreciate the ongoing efforts 
of  Senators  Snowe  and  Rockefeller.  Their  tireless  work  during  the  past  decade  is 
deeply appreciated by our members—and our customers. 

We  are  an  organization  where  the  agenda  is  set  by  and  for  the  membership. 
Today that agenda centers on securing a strong and viable future for universal serv-
ice.  We  believe  USAC’s  permanent  exemption  from  the  requirements  of  the 
Antideficiency  Act  is  consistent  with  our  call  for  securing  a  strong  viable  future  for 
Universal  Service  and  freeing  our  companies  from  government  micromanagement. 
It  is  imperative  that  this  exemption  be  permanently  codified  this  year.  The  imposi-
tion  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  on  USAC  threatens  the  very  survival  of  rural  teleph-
ony, the availability of Internet and distance learning services to schools and librar-
ies,  the  availability  of  telemedicine  for  health  care,  and  exemplifies  the  need  for 
comprehensive legislation. 

Given the rugged terrain and conditions in rural Alaska, United would not be able 
to  provide  these  services  at  an  affordable  rate  without  universal  service  support. 
Universal  service  support  allows  companies  like  United  to  provide  basic  and  ad-
vanced  telecommunications  services  to  all  Americans,  whether  they  are  in  cities 
such as Anchorage or in the most rural parts of Alaska. That is why it is so impor-
tant that the Universal Service system continue to be viable and that threats to the 
system,  such  as  the  unnecessary  application  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  to  USAC,  be 
eliminated. 

The application of the Antideficiency Act to USAC will lead to overall higher con-
sumer  phone  bills  for  all  customers  and  dramatic  increases  in  the  phone  bills  of 
rural  America.  It  threatens  affordable  service  in  high  cost  areas  as  well  as  the  via-
bility  of  the  Lifeline  and  Link-Up  Programs  which  provide  reduced  phone  rates  for 
low income families. 

As  you  are  aware,  due  to  actions  by  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  to 
comply  with  government  accounting  rules  and  the  Antideficiency  Act,  last  year 
USAC was forced to radically change the timing of its funds distribution. Under the 
government accounting rules, before USAC is permitted to ‘‘obligate’’ funds, it must 
have  those  funds  on  hand.  Commitment  letters  to  recipients  of  the  schools  and  li-
braries  and  rural  health  care  programs  are  considered  ‘‘obligations’’  and  therefore 
subject  to  the  application  of  these  new  standards.  These  programs  are  designed  to 
provide  Internet  access,  Distance  Learning,  and  often  telecommunications  capabili-
ties  to  our  nation’s  schools  and  libraries.  In  addition,  the  program  helps  to  develop 
a  robust  communications  network  to  allow  rural  health  care  providers  to  properly 
diagnose  and  treat  patients  in  rural  America.  As  a  result  of  the  FCC’s  actions, 
USAC  suspended  new  funding  commitments  in  the  E-rate  and  Rural  Health  Care 
programs in August 2004. 

Mr. Chairman, as you know, the Universal Service program is funded through an 
assessment,  based  on  a  ‘‘contribution  factor,’’  on  the  amount  of  interstate  revenues 
received by telephone companies. The assessment is then placed on customers’ tele-
phone  bills.  Consequently,  a  significant  increase  in  the  contribution  factor  results 
in  a  significant  increase  in  every  telephone  customer’s  monthly  phone  bill.  As  the 
ADA compliance issue emerged last year, USAC informed us that in order to ensure 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

39

adequate  funding  going  forward,  the  first  quarter  2005  USF  Contribution  Factor 
might need to be increased by almost fifty percent. 

There is a strong indication that, if the Antideficiency Act exemption is not made 
permanent,  the  same  ‘‘obligation’’  restrictions  placed  on  funds  for  recipients  of 
schools,  library  and  rural  health  care  programs  would  also  be  placed  on  high  cost 
and low income support. This would lead to a disruption of universal service support 
to rural phone companies and a potential interruption in affordable telephone serv-
ice to rural customers. Further, the ‘‘contribution factor’’ would again have to be sig-
nificantly  raised,  possibly  to  over  20  percent,  resulting  in  further  significant  in-
creases to consumers’ bills. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Universal  Service  helps  to  make  sure  that  networks  are  viable  in 
rural areas, and that the networks are continuously upgraded and maintained. Net-
works  that  reach  into  every  community  provide  Internet  service,  distance  learning, 
e-mail, dial tone and real-time communications across rural and urban America and 
across  the  globe.  Universal  Service  ensures  that  networks  will  be  available  across 
the  country  to  provide  affordable  access  to  the  new  communications  services  which 
all  Americans  expect.  In  fact,  given  the  importance  of  communications  to  bringing 
technology  and  economic  growth  to  rural  America,  Universal  Service  may  be  more 
important  today  than  at  any  other  point  in  our  nation’s  history,  as  we  transition 
from  an  industrial  to  an  information  society.  Consequently,  it  is  critical  that  the 
continued viability of universal service not be threatened either by the applications 
of the Antideficiency Act to USAC or by any of the other challenges facing the Uni-
versal Service system today. 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, I appreciate the opportunity to ad-
dress  you  on  the  specific  issue  of  the  Antideficiency  Act.  The  FCC’s  application  of 
the  Antideficiency  Act  to  USAC  threatens  the  Universal  Service  system  and  a  per-
manent  exemption  is  warranted.  It  is  critical  that  the  current  one-year  suspension 
of  the  ADA  from  application  to  USAC  be  made  permanent  by  legislation  this  year. 
We  support  passage  of  S.  241.  While  it’s  April  and  we  believe  the  Congress  can 
develop  and  pass  legislation  that  provides  us  with  a  secure  Universal  Service  pro-
gram as well as a regulatory regime that creates a level playing field for all telecom 
providers,  we  understand  the  Committee  wants  to  move  this  legislation  forward. 
This  is  especially  important  should  unforeseen  circumstances  slow  down  efforts  to-
ward comprehensive reform. 

Thank you for the opportunity to present testimony; I am available to answer any 

questions.

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Steve.  Just  a  little  bit 
of history so we can go back on this one. When Senator Inouye and 
I  came  to  the  Senate,  he  was  here  first,  all  our  states  advertise-
ments  about  communications  said  that  these  rates  do  not  apply  in 
Alaska or Hawaii. 

So the rate—I do not know what was the rate paid in Hawaii at 
that time—but my allowance gave me the right to so many minutes 
of telephone calls to Alaska at the rate of $5 a minute. We saw the 
development  of  long  distance  rate  averaging  pools  in  the  southern 
48, which is what we call the continental 48. And my colleague and 
I  joined  together  to  ask  Congress  to  approve  a  resolution  request-
ing  the  telephone  industry  to  integrate  rates  so  that  it  included 
Alaska and Hawaii. 

That  process  started  voluntarily  by  the  industry  and  the  Uni-
versal  Service  Fund  began  there.  That  was  a  Fund  totally  orga-
nized  by  the  industry,  collected  by  the  industry  and  expended  by 
the  industry.  Before  the  1996  Act,  the  FCC  at  one  time  decided 
that  they  ought  to  take  over  the  management  of  this  Fund.  And  I 
objected to that and called the GAO and asked them to investigate 
the  matter,  and  they  did  decree  that  that  Fund  was  not  subject  to 
FCC control because it was totally an industry Fund, collected vol-
untarily and administrated by the industry. 

Senators Snowe and Rockefeller in connection with the 1996 Act 
decided  to  mandate  that  that  Fund  should  go  to,  and  be  allocated 
in  addition  to  just  bringing  long  distance  service  to  rural  America, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

40

particularly  to  the  offshore  states,  but  to,  and  I  think  wisely  the 
two  of  us  joined  Senators  Snowe  and  Rockefeller  in  this,  to  man-
date  the  concepts  of  serving  schools,  libraries  and  health  facilities. 
Following  that,  the  FCC  in  its  own  judgment  decided  to  mandate 
the creation of this corporation which Mr. Talbott is now the chair-
man of. 

That’s the best example I know of an agency trying to pull itself 
up by its bootstraps and then choking off the subject of its jurisdic-
tion.  This  has  been  the  result  of  the  determination  that  the  1996 
Act  mandated  the  creation  of  that  corporation,  which  it  did  not. 
Now  we  are  faced,  and  we  were  faced  last  year  with  the  problem 
of what to do about the FCC decisions confirmed by the GAO, and 
I  think  urged  by  the  OMB,  to  increase  Federal  control  of  this 
money. 

The money collected is capped by a decision, I believe of the FCC. 
Well, you have heard the testimony here and I think there is abso-
lutely  no  question  that  the  Snowe-Rockefeller  amendment  has 
brought  about  a  substantial  change  in  America.  It  made  available 
to  rural  schools  and  rural  communities  the  benefits  that  telemedi-
cine,  tele-education  and  teleconferencing  have  brought.  It  has 
brought communities together although they are stretched out over 
250,000  square  miles.  That  is  a  community  in  Alaska,  all  working 
together  to  provide  the  services  that  are  mandated  by  the  Snowe-
Rockefeller amendment. 

We  are  faced  with  a  real  problem.  And  I  appreciate  for  myself 
the suggestion that we take some type of time to try and figure out 
what  is  a  solution.  The  2-years  I  don’t  think  is  long  enough,  how-
ever,  Ms.  Dalton.  I  think  if  Congress  takes  a  lot  longer  than  that 
to make up its mind and we have seen that in connection with our 
problem  with  the  National  Wildlife  Refuge,  25  years  still  have  not 
made up its mind. 

As far as I’m concerned, we need more time than 2 years. I’m not 
sure  that  we  can  get  a  solution  right  now.  I’m  not  sure  that  we 
really  have  the  ability  to  decide  how  to  deal  with  these  other  laws 
which  are  not  within  the  jurisdiction  of  this  Committee.  The  only 
thing  we  have  got  the  right  to  do  is  suspend  the  application  of 
those laws for a while until we get the other legislative committees 
to  work  with  us  and  agree  with  us  that  we  need  to  find  a  solution 
to how to manage this money. 

From  my  point  of  view,  Mr.  Talbott  has  mentioned  one  of  the 
real  serious  problems  and  that  it  has  wisely  invested  in  this  fund 
in  the  past.  It  has  leveraged  collections  they  have  made  so  they 
really  have  appreciated  considerably  in  terms  of  the  amount  of 
money that’s available to carry out the services that they are man-
dated to do. 

That leveraging factor is lost under the decisions that have been 
made by the FCC, GAO and the OMB. I have a couple of questions 
to ask and let me say to my colleagues, Senator Inouye and I must 
go manage the Defense portion of the supplemental bill at 3 o’clock, 
so we intend to ask our questions and then leave. 

And  I  hope  Senator  Snowe,  if  you  will  be  able  to  stay  and  Sen-
ator  Rockefeller  stay  and  conduct  the  hearing  for  us  for  the  Com-
mittee.  I  consider  this  to  be  one  of  the  major  issues  before  this 
Committee in terms of communications this year. The solution may 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

41

be  temporary,  but  it’s  going  to  be  very  important  somehow  to  find 
a  way  to  not  lose  the  capabilities  that  have  been  brought  to  rural 
America  and  to  our  two  offshore  states  by  the  Snowe-Rockefeller 
Amendment. I apologize for that long monologue. 

I  have  a  few  rather  quick  questions.  One  is  what  is  the  current 
balance  of  this  Fund  and  how  much  is  offset  by  the  funding  com-
mitment decision letters that you have issued? 

Mr. TALBOTT. It’s about $3 billion in the Fund. Let me check my 

notes. But it’s over $2 billion that’s currently committed. 

Senator STEVENS. So unless we do something by the time we hit 

the fall, we are going to be in trouble? 

Mr. TALBOTT. Correct. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Is  it  true  that  there  are  overcommitments  to 

the program and how does that come about and why? 

Mr. TALBOTT. A couple of things happened. The process that the 
school  districts,  libraries  go  through  takes  some  time.  Technology 
prices  if  we  look  at  it  across  the  board  come  down.  The  cost  for 
technology has come down, so there is a gap in the technology that 
schools  are  putting  in,  what  they  have  requested  and  then  they 
make those adjustments as they move forward because the vendors 
will  give  those  adjustments  to  the  users.  And  that’s  part  of  the 
problem. 

Senator STEVENS. Is it true that the more you commit, the more 

is scored against this bill? 

Mr. TALBOTT. I don’t understand the question, sir. Maybe FCC—

the scoring is affected by overcommitments, right? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  I  hesitate  to  speak  specifically  to  scoring,  but  in 
terms of the obligations, yes, the commitment letters constitute the 
obligations and therefore it’s the issuance of the commitment letter 
that  is  counted  rather  than  the  eventual  disbursement  which  oc-
curs sometime later. 

Senator STEVENS. Let me ask this of the FCC. Is there a way to 
change  the  commitment  letters  to  avoid  the  accounting  problems 
we find that have been outlined here? 

Mr. SCHLICK. That is an option that’s been considered. 
Senator STEVENS. Can it be done without legislation? 
Mr.  SCHLICK.  Yes.  Those  letters  are  issued  by  USAC  under  the 

FCC’s direction, and they could be modified. 

Senator  STEVENS.  That  would  take  the  Commission’s  concur-

rence, would it not, to change the rule? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Yes.  It’s  one  of  the  functions  of  USAC  under  our 

supervision. Yes. 

Senator  STEVENS.  That  would  be  subject  to  a  series  of  hearings 
and  procedures  under  the  FCC.  In  other  words,  it  will  take  time 
if  we  opted  to  go  that  direction,  it  will  take  time.  Ms.  Gelb,  how 
long will that normally take to have a real change by the FCC? 

Mr. SCHLICK. Mr. Chairman, that’s not in the Commission’s rules 
now.  It  would  be  a  matter  of  consultation  between  USAC  and  the 
agency’s staff. 

Senator STEVENS. Would it involve a public process to determine 

how the rule was issued by the FCC? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Mr.  Chairman,  right  now  the  USAC  commitment 

letters are not enshrined in the rules. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

42

Senator  STEVENS.  The  accounting  change  I’m  suggesting, 

wouldn’t that take a rule? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  The  accounting  change,  yes.  The  application  of 
GovGAAP, which is the accounting rule that in October of 2003 the 
Commission  extended  to  USAC,  that  would  require  a  change  of 
FCC  rules.  But  it’s  important  to  note,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  the  ac-
counting  procedure  is  one  that  identifies  the  timing  of  the  obliga-
tions, not the rule that USAC must have cash on hand. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I’m  talking  about  Ms.  Dalton’s  problem,  if  we 
need  a  temporary  fix,  how  long  do  we  really  need  if  we  decided  to 
go that route? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  That  rule  change  will  not  affect  the  Antideficiency 
Act  problem,  Mr.  Chairman,  because  the  Antideficiency  Act  prob-
lem  is  one  that  is  statutory.  The  GovGAAP  procedures  are  a  tool 
that identifies the time obligations are incurred, but there is noth-
ing that the Commission could do. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Avoid  any  accounting  problem  but  not  solve 

the issues that I’m discussing, right? 

Mr. SCHLICK. That is correct, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Hamlen,  in  terms  of  this  as  it  affects  our 
state,  what  would  be  the  impact  on  your  total  operation  if  the  ex-
emption is allowed to expire and Congress does not act? 

Mr.  HAMLEN.  Well,  first  of  all,  our  customers,  school  districts, 
rural  health  care  providers  would  all  be  impacted.  The  impact  on 
our company would be severe. Our ability to continue to deliver the 
services  would  be  undermined  and  our  ability  to  build  out  new  in-
frastructure would also be undermined. In fact, if that were to hap-
pen,  we  would  probably  within  a  year  have  to  go  out  of  business. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Last  comment.  By  virtue  of  the  investments 
you’ve made in the past, Mr. Talbott, investments of the surpluses 
as  occurred  temporarily,  has  that  been  a  factor  in  acting  to  keep 
the contribution level as low as possible? 

Mr. TALBOTT. Yes, it has. 
Senator STEVENS. It’s up to about 11 percent now, is it not? 
Mr. TALBOTT. That is correct. 
Senator  STEVENS.  And  technically  paid  by  long  distance  carriers 

primarily. 

Mr. TALBOTT. Right. 
Senator STEVENS. Senator Inouye. 
Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  reviewing  the 
history  of  this  controversy  as  we  approach  this  moment.  In  my  re-
view, I note that one cannot help but conclude that the most influ-
ential  agency  guiding  policy  decision  making  is  OMB.  We  invited 
OMB  to  be  with  us  today  but  they  are  not  available.  But  I  note 
that  the  FCC  and  GAO  have  all  communicated  with  OMB.  What 
have they been telling you? Can you share it with us? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Senator  Inouye,  the  important  communication  for 
purposes  of  the  E-rate  program  was  the  consultation  that  we  had 
back  in  September  of  2004,  and  then  into  the  fall.  And  that  was 
the  expression  of  OMB’s  view  that,  first,  the  Universal  Service 
Fund  is  an  appropriation  to  which  the  Antideficiency  Act  would 
apply. 

And  second,  that  the  obligation  letters,  the  commitment  letters 
that  USAC  issues,  are  obligations  that  have  to  be  counted  under 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

43

the  Antideficiency  Act.  We  have  also  requested  an  opinion  from 
OMB concerning the high cost and low income programs under the 
USF  and  we  are  working  with  them  to  obtain  that.  It’s  our  ten-
tative view that those programs are being operated today in accord-
ance with the obligations of the Antideficiency Act, and that the re-
sumption of the application of the Act to those programs would not 
cause change in the operation of the programs. 

Senator INOUYE. What was the decision of OMB in 2000? 
Mr.  SCHLICK.  In  2000,  OMB  determined  that  the  Miscellaneous 
Receipts  Act,  which  is  the  statute  which  requires  that  public  mon-
eys  for  the  use  of  the  United  States  be  deposited  in  the  Treasury, 
does  not  apply  to  the  Universal  Service  Fund  and  that  is  a  view 
under which we have been operating. 

Senator INOUYE. Mr. Talbott? 
Mr.  TALBOTT.  Yes.  The  question  comes  down,  my  point  to  the 
commitment letters that we issue versus the high cost, low income 
where  we  do  not  issue  the  letters,  but  we  certainly  post  it  to  the 
website.  That’s  hard  for  me  to  differentiate  when  a  company  sees 
on the website what they will receive, but that’s not a commitment. 
So I think there is an obligation from our vantage point. 

Senator  STEVENS.  The  money  is  still  not  in  the  Treasury,  is  it? 
Mr.  SCHLICK.  No.  Mr.  Chairman,  no.  The  money  is  still  main-

tained outside the Treasury. 

Senator INOUYE. Ms. Dalton? 
Ms.  DALTON.  Senator,  we  were  simply  asked  to  review  what  the 
decisions were by OMB as well as the FCC to see if we concurred, 
which  we  did  with  their  reasoning  that  the  Antideficiency  Act  did 
apply in this particular situation. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Does  Congress  take  direction  from  the  OMB? 
Ms. DALTON. No. It does not, Senator. 
Senator INOUYE. Do we have any late message from OMB? 
Mr. SCHLICK. Not that I’m aware of. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Again,  my  regrets  to  all  of  you.  I  ask  Senator 
Snowe  and  Senator  Rockefeller  at  this  time  to  take  over  this  mat-
ter. And it will be my hope that we can find a way to get this mat-
ter on the first agenda possible. 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I also want to thank 
the  co-chair  as  well  for  giving  so  much  support  and  having  this 
hearing here today that emphatically I think indicates the support 
of  this  Committee  toward  resolving  this  issue  and  I  truly  appre-
ciate it. Senator Rockefeller. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  They  have  already  left.  I  wanted  to  duly 
thank  on  behalf  of—I  know  Senator  Snowe  and  myself,  the  Chair-
man and the Vice Chairman I guess, for their support of this legis-
lation.  I  also  note  not  only  the  absence  of  OMB  but  the  refusal  of 
OMB  to  put  down  in  writing  to  us  and  as  far  as  I  can  tell,  to  any 
of  you,  other  than  perhaps  a  couple  of  verbal  things  several  years 
ago  their  views,  even  though  they  are  responsible  for  a  good  deal 
of what has happened here. Mr. Talbott, a couple questions for you, 
sir. 

You’re Chairman of USAC? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

44

Mr. TALBOTT. Yes. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  And  without  an  exemption  of  the 
Antideficiency  Act  this  year,  what  would  you  say  you  need  to  rec-
ommend  to  the  FCC  for  the  first  quarter  of  2006  to  fully  fund  all 
four  of  the  Universal  Service  Fund  programs,  that  will  be  the  E-
rate, the high cost, the low income, and rural health care? 

Mr.  TALBOTT.  Well,  if  we  did  not  have  the  passage  of  the  Act—
let  me  back  up.  The  commitment  letters  that  were  addressed  ear-
lier,  we  have  a  softer  commitment  letter  that  was  one  thing  that 
was  suggested  this  past  year.  But  what  we  found  out  when  the 
auditors  started  looking  at  it,  the  school  district  started  looking  at 
it,  it  did  not  hold  water.  We  either  have  to  raise  the  contribution 
factor up significantly which is an impact on everybody or we have 
got  to  figure  out  a  way  to  fund  it.  And  that  way  would  be  to  shut 
down for X amount of time so we can build the Fund up. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Ms.  Abshire  and  Mr.  Hamlen,  both  of 
your testimony I thought were absolutely superb, but that’s no sur-
prise. But would that not also then increase the hesitancy of those 
particularly  rural  schools  and  areas  because  of  the  inconsistency 
being shown by Congress in funding this program? That when you 
shut things off and turn them on and shut them off and turn them 
on, people begin to walk away from it just a bit, don’t they? 

Ms.  ABSHIRE.  Yes,  sir.  I  think  the  key  is  the  constant  flow  of 
funds  that  those  of  us  in  districts  can  count  on  and  use  to  plan. 
We  have  had  a  lot  of  education  and  technology  funding  plans  and 
budgeting  and  we  have  tried  to  be  wise  and  build  plans  that  take 
us  into  the  future  and  leverage  resources  in  a  very  strategic  na-
ture.  And  when  we  have  issued  this  start  and  stop,  it  really  dis-
rupts  all  of  the  planning  processes  and  makes  people  reluctant  to 
be  engaged,  in  addition  to  the  educational  disruption  that  occurs. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Mr. Hamlen, you don’t need to answer be-
cause  you  answered  most  eloquently  when  you  said  you’d  have  to 
shut your business down in about a year and a half? 

Mr.  HAMLEN.  That  is  correct,  Senator.  I  would  like  to  add  one 
more  item.  Many  of  our  school  districts  in  rural  Alaska  receive  90 
percent  subsidy  and  the  cost  of  providing  service  to  these  remote 
schools is very high. And you’ll note that some of them could, if we 
have these disruptions and they continue to try and receive service 
and  they  become  liable  for  the  full  bill,  could  be  forced  into  bank-
ruptcy. So that that would be an added concern. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Thank  you.  I’m  going  to  try  and  ask  a 
couple  of  questions  quickly  before  Olympia  red  lights  me.  Mr. 
Talbott,  I’ll  go  back  to  you,  sir.  Were  there  any  costs  that  you  are 
aware  of  in  complying  with  the  FCC  guidance  last  fall?  Are  there 
any ongoing costs of compliance with the FCC? 

Mr. TALBOTT. Yes, the cost to implement GovGAAP, we lost $4.6 
million when we had to liquidate investments. We have already put 
one million into training. It’s going to cost us millions more to com-
plete that system overall and we have lost $4.1 million per year in 
interest over this next year. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Senator  Inouye  touched  on  this,  but  I 
want  to  do  it  again.  I’m  interested  in  an  explanation  as  to  why 
hundreds of millions of dollars are now sitting in non-interest bear-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

45

ing  accounts,  that  are  buried  in  a  hole,  rather  than  safely  earning 
interest for the purposes of America’s school children. 

Some of us here in Congress went through a lot of effort late last 
year,  and  Senator  Inouye  indicated  two  of  those  folks,  to  pass 
emergency  legislation  to  end  such  wasteful  practices.  This  legisla-
tion  granted  the  Universal  Service  Fund  a  1-year  exemption  from 
the  Antideficiency  Act  expressly  for  the  purpose  of  permitting  the 
FCC to act as a prudent steward of these public resources while we 
all addressed a more permanent solution. 

I agree with Senator Inouye that a 2 or 3-year solution is insuffi-
cient because of the nature of Congress and the nature of the situa-
tion.  The  FCC,  however,  has  done  nothing  to  prudently  invest 
these  funds,  these  non-interest  bearing  account  funds.  And  the 
delay  is  costing  the  public  millions  of  dollars  in  forgone  interest 
every month, is that not the case? 

Mr. TALBOTT. That is correct. And we are working within USAC. 
In  fact,  next  week  the  investment  committee  will  be  working  with 
the  board  and  trying  to  make  changes  there,  but  we  have  a  letter 
that  states  that  we  are  not  to  proceed  with  those  types  of  invest-
ments that you just described and we have to get FCC to allow us 
to do that. It’s a rule. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  My  final  question  is  to  you,  Mr.  Schlick. 
What  is  the  agency  doing  to  restore  the  $550  million  that  was 
undercollected for the E-rate program in 2004? 

Ms.  GELB.  At  this  time,  we  have  not  actively  collected  the  $550 
million.  In  part,  the  1-year  ADA  exemption  permitted  us  to  not 
have  to  collect  that  immediately,  so  right  now  there  is  incomplete 
collection of that amount. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I missed it. It was not collected? 
Ms. GELB. It has not been recollected. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. It has not been recollected. 
Ms. GELB. Yes. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Senator Rockefeller. 
Senator Nelson. 

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chairwoman.  I  must 
be  a  little  bit  confused  here.  Mr.  Schlick,  did  the  FCC  ask  for  an 
opinion  from  OMB?  I  think  you  said  no.  So  did  OMB  volunteer  it 
about the Antideficiency Act application to this Fund? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Senator,  the  FCC  did  ask  for  such  an  opinion  and 
such  an  opinion  has  been  provided.  And  it  is  the  view  of  OMB,  as 
well  as  now  later  of  GAO,  that  the  Antideficiency  Act  does  apply. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  Now,  is  that  standard  practice  on  any 
other  funds  that  you  collect  other  funds?  Are  you  custodian  of  any 
other funds that have to be collected and distributed? 

Mr. SCHLICK. I don’t know the answer to that question. There is 
nothing closely analogous to USF. I don’t know the answer to that 
question. 

Senator BEN NELSON. I’m a little confused, also, Ms. Gelb, about 
what  is  the—you  used  two  collections.  You  said  one,  has  been  col-
lected or it’s collected again? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

46

Mr. SCHLICK. That’s the high cost and low income program with-
in  the  Universal  Service  Fund.  The  operation  of  those  programs 
within the Universal Service Fund is very different. 

In  the  E-rate  program,  which  is  the  one  that  had  the  problem 
last  fall,  USAC  issues  commitment  letters  which  say  to  the  recipi-
ents,  this  is  what  you  will  receive  and  how  much  you’ll  receive.  In 
the  high  cost  and  low  income  programs,  USAC  does  an  initial  pro-
jection quite far in advance of what the expected revenue needs for 
the  program  will  be,  then  services  are  provided,  then  carriers  pay 
into the Fund in their monthly contributions. And some days after 
that, USAC authorizes disbursements to the carriers. 

So  for  two  reasons,  one  being  that  there  is  no  definite  commit-
ment to issue funds that’s equivalent to the E-rate commitment let-
ters,  and  also  because  the  funding  flows  are  requiring  carriers  to 
put  money  into  the  Fund  before  USAC  pays  out.  For  both  of  those 
reasons,  we  think  that  the  high  cost  and  low  income  Fund  is  now 
being operated in compliance under the Antideficiency Act. We did 
ask OMB for an opinion and we did advise USAC of our views last 
September. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  But  the  other  opinion  that  they  gave  you 
that was referenced earlier, apparently an oral opinion, not even a 
written opinion? 

Mr. SCHLICK. On the high cost, low income we have not received 

a written opinion from OMB. That is correct, Senator. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Also,  I’m  a  little  concerned  about  the  lack 
of  investment.  Mr.  Talbott,  you  said  you  have  a  letter  and  the  let-
ter is from whom or from what agency? 

Mr. TALBOTT. From the FCC, the Wireline Bureau. 
Senator BEN NELSON. About not investing the money? 
Mr. TALBOTT. No. 
Senator  BEN NELSON.  Mr.  Schlick,  why  would  you  tell  them  not 
to invest the money. Usually there is very little, if any, risk associ-
ated  with  it  and  I  guess  we  did  at  one  point  invest  the  money  in 
the long term, and had to liquidate that lost money because of the 
early liquidation. It seems to me that somewhere along the line, we 
would figure out how to get it straight. 

Mr. SCHLICK. Senator, it’s not a situation of investment or no in-
vestment.  Under  the  Antideficiency  Act  and  again  under  the  OMB 
guidance implementing that, which is something called circular A–
11, amounts that are in Federal Government securities are treated 
as available cash for purposes of the Antideficiency Act. 

So  when  we  issue  a  commitment  letter  if  we  have  investments 
in  Federal  securities  or  literally  as  cash,  those  may  be  used  to  off-
set  the  commitment  letter  and  therefore  ensure  compliance  with 
the  Antideficiency  Act.  If  the  moneys  are  invested  in  investments 
other  than  Federal  securities,  then  the  holding  of  those  invest-
ments  is  itself  viewed  as  an  obligation  of  the  government,  so  they 
may  not  be  treated  as  available  cash  for  purposes  of  offsetting  the 
commitment letters. 

The result of this is that, because under the law as it now stands 
on January 1, 2006 the Antideficiency Act will begin to apply to the 
Fund,  we  have  told  USAC  that  unless  they  obtain  approval  from 
us,  they  should  not  reallocate  their  portfolio  out  of  investments 
that  can  be  considered  cash  for  purposes  of  offsetting  obligations 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

47

under  the  Antideficiency  Act  into  non-Federal  investments  that 
cannot  have  that  status.  And  the  reason  for  doing  that  is  to  pre-
vent  the  kind  of  shock  that  we  had  last  fall  where  there  was  not 
available cash in the Fund to offset the commitment letters. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  So  if  this  amendment  passes,  will  we  be 
able  to  earn  some  money  for  the  kids  and  people  that  are  going  to 
receive  the  benefits  in  Louisiana,  Alaska  and  hopefully  Nebraska, 
Arkansas and everywhere else? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Yes,  sir.  I  think  it’s  a  fair  assumption  that  the  in-

terest will increase. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  There  was  another  question  relating  to 
that. But I think I was trying to follow about you have not decided 
about investments yet. Is this the same Fund or another Fund that 
I’m not familiar with? 

Ms. GELB. Sorry, I wasn’t clear. The question Senator Rockefeller 
asked me was whether we had collected the $550 million that was 
not  collected  in  2004.  In  2004  at  the  beginning  of  2004  we  worked 
with  the  USAC,  and  USAC  agreed  that  there  was  substantial 
buildup  of  cash  in  the  Universal  Service  Fund.  And  rather  than 
continue to collect the full amounts needed in the contribution fac-
tor, that there would be a reduction in contribution factor and some 
of the existing cash surplus will be used instead. 

This  was—decision  was  made  before 

the 
Antideficiency  Act  arose.  The  question  was  whether  we  had  since 
collected  that  $550  million  and  the  answer  is  no,  we  have  not  at 
this time collected that $550 million that we did not collect in 2004. 
Senator BEN NELSON. I must be missing something here as well. 

issue  of 

the 

Why would that be that we have not collected it? 

Ms.  GELB.  I  think  largely  because  the  1-year  exemption  on  the 
Antideficiency  Act  gave  the  Fund  flexibility  to  use  existing  stores 
of  cash  to  fund  the  program  and  we  did  not  need  the  full  amount 
of cash on hand in order to make all of the commitments. 

Senator BEN NELSON. But if we did not pass the bill that I think 
we are going to pass, and antideficiency did apply, is it not possible 
that we would run out of money if we did not go ahead and collect 
what we have not recollected or whatever it is? 

Ms.  GELB.  Yes.  I  think  that 

if  the  exemption  to  the 
Antideficiency Act ends, then we would over time, I used the word 
re-collect,  but  collect  the  $550  million  that  was  not  collected  pre-
viously in 2004. 

Senator BEN NELSON. I’m not in favor of collecting a lot of money 
to hold in storage, but I am a little perplexed that a decision would 
be made not to collect what is due and owing with the expectation 
that  one  way  or  the  other  it’s  going  to  have  to  be  paid  out.  Is  this 
a decision the Commission made or is it staff driven? 

Ms.  GELB.  It  wasn’t  a  decision  that  the  Commission  made.  I 
guess  the  answer  to  your  question  is  that  there  are  cash  reserves 
to pay out the funds. The issue arises when because there is a lag 
between  when  the  money  is  committed  and  when  it  is  disbursed, 
there will be money at that time necessary for disbursement. So if 
the Antideficiency Act exemption were to continue, what we would 
need  would  be  the  cash  on  hand  at  the  time  of  disbursement,  not 
necessarily the cash on hand at the time of commitment. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

48

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Just  one  follow-up,  Ms.  Dalton.  Did  you 
reference  that  in  your  GAO  report  by  any  chance  as  you  looked  at 
this issue? 

Ms.  DALTON.  I  addressed  it  very  briefly  in  my  statement  here 
today.  What  we  were  talking  about  is  looking  at  the  scenario  that 
occurred  in  2004  and  the  fact  that  the  money  wasn’t  available 
under  the  definition  under  the  Antideficiency  Act.  However,  Con-
gress  can  specifically  say  that  certain  resources  are  budgetary  re-
sources and are applicable under the Antideficiency Act. For exam-
ple,  the  investment  funds  could  be  considered  as  budgetary  re-
sources. 

Currently  under  the  Act,  without  special  authorization,  the 
money  has  to  be  in  Treasury  or  in  cash  to  be  considered  a  budg-
etary  resource.  However,  Congress  can  in  fact  say  very  specifically 
that  certain  investments  or  anticipated  investments  in  this  par-
ticular  case  should  be  considered  as  resources  to  balance  out  the 
commitments. 

Senator BEN NELSON. But you still have to collect them? 
Ms. DALTON. You do. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Senator  Nelson.  At  this  point,  I’ll 
take  my  turn  with  respect  to  questions.  It  truly  is  confounding  to 
understand  exactly  why  we  are  confronting  the  situation  we  are 
that really does have many consequences to the programs at stake. 
And certainly, it comes without explanation or rationale from the 
Office of Management and Budget, and I certainly note the absence 
of  OMB  here  today  which  would  certainly  have  been  helpful  to 
have  their  perspective  with  respect  to  the  impact  of  the  direct  and 
net effect of their directive. With respect to the E-rate program and 
the overall Universal Service Fund, Mr. Talbott, let me begin with 
you. 

Have you had direct conversations with OMB with respect to the 
impact  and  the  consequences  of  these  actions  prior  to  the  exemp-
tion that was passed by Congress? 

Mr. TALBOTT. No. 
Senator SNOWE. Have you had any since? 
Mr. TALBOTT. No. We have not. 
Senator SNOWE. So no explanation at all? 
Mr.  TALBOTT.  No.  We  administer  the  program,  the  FCC  would 

communicate that to us I assume. 

Senator SNOWE. Mr. Schlick, have you? 
Mr. SCHLICK. The Commission was consulting on these problems 
with  OMB  in  September  of  2004  which  was  after  USAC  had 
stopped issuing commitment letters. So OMB was very much aware 
of  the  practical  problem  that  we  faced  there  and  that’s  why  we 
went  to  OMB  and  asked  urgently  for  guidance.  So  they  were 
aware. 

Senator SNOWE. They were aware. Did they have any explicit ex-
planations  and  responses  to  the  problems  that  are  associated  with 
the implementation of their directive? I mean, realistic acknowledg-
ment of the practical effect? 

Mr. SCHLICK. I don’t want to characterize their views, but I think 
it’s  fair  to  say  that  they  were,  of  course,  aware  of  the  problem. 
They  were  viewing  the  issue  as  one  of  applying  the  statute,  the 
Antideficiency Act and precedents under it. As were we. And that’s 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

49

what  was  guiding  us  in  reaching  the  same  conclusion  that  GAO 
has now arrived at. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Were  they  aware  of  the  ruling  that  was  made 
by OMB in 2000 with respect to these funds. It was totally contrary 
to their view obviously. Were they aware of that ruling? 

Mr. SCHLICK. Yes, Senator. They were aware. 
That of course arose under a different statute, the Miscellaneous 
Receipts Act which involves deposits into the Treasury rather than 
the Antideficiency Act. 

Senator  SNOWE.  And  that  a  court  ruling  that  indicated  that  the 
USF  funds  were  not  a  tax?  They  were  not  derived  from  tax  reve-
nues. 

Mr. SCHLICK. I believe——
Senator SNOWE. It’s not an appropriation. 
Mr.  SCHLICK.  I  believe  those  core  decisions  were  part  of  our  dis-

Senator  SNOWE.  They  were.  And  how  did  they  recognize  that? 

How did they acknowledge the core decision? 

cussions. 

Mr. SCHLICK. Again, Senator, it’s my own view now. That’s really 
an  issue  that  goes  more  toward  the  character  of  the  Fund  under 
the  Miscellaneous  Receipts  Act  and  the  Antideficiency  Act.  Under 
the  Antideficiency  Act,  once  OMB,  GAO  and  CBO  all  treated  the 
Universal  Service  Fund  as  an  appropriation,  it  was  that  back  in 
late 1990’s that triggered the application of the Act. 

Senator SNOWE. Well, obviously it is not an appropriation in the 
final analysis. It is not. I mean, you know, you can call it whatever 
you  want—the  reality  is  and  that’s  the  frustration  with  the  direc-
tive that has been imposed by OMB—is not acknowledging the net 
practical  effect  of  what  has  occurred  here.  Already  the  loss  of  dol-
lars  is  hard  to  understand.  I  mean,  obviously  in  withholding  the 
commitments, and you have had to redeem bonds, did you not, Mr. 
Talbott, which cost more than $4 million to the Fund? 

Mr. TALBOTT. As well as certainty to the program. 
Senator SNOWE. You cannot put the funds in an interest bearing 
account,  even  a  modest  interest  bearing  account.  You  cannot  do 
that.  And  what  is  the  explanation  for  that?  Does  anybody  have 
one? Mr. Schlick? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Investments  that  are  not  Treasury  securities.  So 
interest  can  be  earned  although  it  has  to  be  a  Federal  security. 
And  the  answer  to  that  is  that  if  you—under  OMB  guidance,  the 
circular  A–11—if  you’re  purchasing  an  investment  asset  outside  of 
the  Treasury  that’s  viewed  as  itself  an  obligation  of  government 
funds. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Senator, I’m just stunned by that answer. 
I  apologize.  No  loss  of  your  time,  Madam  Chairwoman,  but  the 
OMB said that you could not do this because it could not work out 
financially.  I’m  confused  as  to  your  responsibilities  and  the  FCC’s 
and OMB’s responsibilities. 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Certainly,  Senator.  OMB  establishes  executive 
branch-wide  guidelines  and  one  of  those  guidelines  is  that  invest-
ments 
the 
Antideficiency Act, generally treated as an obligation——

in  non-Federal  securities  are, 

for  purposes  of 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Senator Nelson indicated they could be in 

government securities. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

50

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Yes.  And  my  understanding  is  that  a  portion  are. 
But perhaps Dr. Talbott can correct me on that. My understanding 
is that a portion right now are in government securities earning in-
terest. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Senator  Rockefeller.  So  what  has 
been the net cost so far as a result of this OMB directive? Is it four 
million? 

Mr.  TALBOTT.  We  lost  4.6  million  in  the  3-day  period  when  we 
got the order to liquidate by the end of the Fund year—because we 
were directed to do that on September 27th and of course, October 
1 is the new fiscal year. So we had to liquidate. We lost 4.6 million 
there  and  then  sequentially,  we  have  lost  for  each  quarter  signifi-
cant dollars that we have earned. 

Senator SNOWE. That you could have earned. 
Mr. TALBOTT. Could have earned. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Have  these  issues  been  raised  by  OMB  in  the 
subsequent time in which this legislation was passed? I mean, have 
you raised this at all about the loss? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  No.  I  don’t  think  we  have.  Under  our  direction 
from  last  December  to  USAC,  they  are  to  come  to  us  first  with  a 
proposal  to  reallocate  and  this  may  be  a  good  time  to  note  that 
there is no prohibition on investments outside of Federal securities 
or  cash.  It’s  simply  to  protect  ourselves  against  the  Antideficiency 
Act, we have to have enough that’s treated as cash there. 

Senator  SNOWE.  You  have  to  have  a  portion  of  your  portfolio  in 

cash? 

Mr. SCHLICK. Enough to cover the commitment letters. 
Senator SNOWE. Well, maybe they should apply the ADA to com-
mon sense because in the final analysis, I mean, it is not only cre-
ating  an  uncertainty  to  a  program  that  has  worked  exceptionally 
well  over  time.  Not  to  say  it  hasn’t  had  problems.  Not  to  say  that 
the  FCC  doesn’t  have  the  authority  to  conduct  audits  which  you 
are  doing.  Obviously  there  are  issues,  but  for  someone  to  arbi-
trarily impose this dictate that has created enormous consequences 
for  the  E-rate  program  and  high  cost  and  low  income,  which  if  we 
do not address this issue for the long term, a tremendous price and 
penalty will be imposed, as I understand it, to gather a surcharge, 
21 percent, will be doubling? 

Mr. TALBOTT. That is correct. USAC holds with maturities of less 
than 90 days and we have one long-term U.S. Treasury note that’s 
being held. That is correct. It not only brings about uncertainty but 
also—it increases the contribution factor. 

Senator SNOWE. It’s going to double the surcharge in addition to 
what  it  has  already  been  raised—from  8.7  to  10.9  percent.  So  all 
combined,  you  know,  it  wreaks  havoc  on  this  program.  As  a  result 
of  an  arbitrary  ruling  without  having  the  ability  to  sort  through 
what  we  can  do  to  plan  even  in  the  long  term.  I  mean,  that  is  the 
issue  here  is  that  it  was  summarily  imposed  without  any  oppor-
tunity to respond, to react, to try to address. 

And  so  obviously,  we  have  a  temporary  approach,  but  clearly  it 
needs  to  have  a  permanent  exemption  so  we  can  address  the  long 
term,  address  other  issues  regarding  the  Universal  Service  Fund 
because we know that there is declining revenue from long distance 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

51

carriers and so on, there are a number of issues. But this has clear-
ly  been  an  obstacle  and  impediment  of  a  program  that  has  served 
this  country  well  and  schools  and  libraries  as  we  have  heard  from 
you, Ms. Abshire, as well. 

We  ought  to  look  at  the  long  term  to  figure  it  out.  But  to  have 
to  respond  in  this  fashion  it  clearly  does  not  make  any  sense. 
That’s what I regret about it because we have to be able to sit here 
and rationally work out solutions to problems. And if somebody has 
a better idea on how to do it, fine. 

But  I  think  to  simply  impose  this  without  recognizing—by  the 
way,  numerous  other  agencies  that  are  exempt 
from  the 
Antideficiency Act. It’s not just the USF. There are other agencies. 
Highway  Trust  Fund,  U.S.  Information  Agency,  National  Park 
Service,  Fish  and  Wildlife  Program,  National  Insurance  Develop-
ment  Program,  probably  many  more.  It’s  not  as  if  this  has  always 
applied  and  the  uniqueness  of  this  program  should  be  recognized. 
Everybody  wants  to  live  by  good  government  accounting  principles 
obviously. So how can we solve the problem to get to the same net 
result  without  imposing  or  wreaking  havoc  on  this  valuable  pro-
gram. 

Senator Sununu? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU,
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  I  have  a  decidedly 
different  view  and  I  would  like  to  begin  by  encouraging  my  col-
leagues  that  if  this  bill  passes,  and  I  do  hope  it  doesn’t  pass,  that 
they  show  the  same  enthusiasm  for  allowing  Americans  to  invest 
their  payroll  taxes  in  interest  bearing  private  accounts  that  we 
have  shown  here  for  investing  schools’  and  libraries’  money  in  pri-
vate interest bearing accounts. 

My sense is, though, that that’s not going to happen. 
We’ll  find  a  reason  for  avoiding  any  kind  of  equivalency.  I  do 
think exempting the program from accounting statutes as a general 
premise  is  not  sound  policy.  And  when  you  have  a  program  that 
has  had  the  problems  of  the  schools  and  libraries,  I  think  that’s 
particularly the case. 

We have not, this is not a hearing about fraud, mismanagement, 
overcharging,  misapplication  of  funds  within  the  E-rate  programs, 
overbuilding,  gold  plating  some  of  these  investments.  That’s  not 
what this hearing is about. But we all know that these things have 
occurred  in  this  program  to  a  much  greater  extent  than  I  think 
anyone in this room would like to see. 

At  this  point  in  time,  the  fact  that  we  are  asking  the  program 
to operate under this existing accounting standard and that we are 
looking at Universal Service Fund reform, I think creates an oppor-
tunity  to  address  all  of  these  programs  as  we  mark  up  a  tele-
communications bill. And I do not think we should just exempt this 
in  perpetuity  so  that  the  funding  can  continue  to  come  in  and  go 
out without the kind of oversight and inspection that we would ex-
pect of a very large program like this. It’s $2.25 billion a year. 

So I see this as an opportunity to force the issue to make us look 
at  not  just  the  E-rate  but  all  of  Universal  Service  Fund.  In  fact, 
we were told when this temporary extension was passed at the end 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

52

of last year that this was just the temporary extension because we 
were going to look at all of these issues in conjunction with the re-
form of the Universal Service Fund. And here we are just 3 months 
later and suddenly, everyone has forgotten about that commitment. 
Second,  we  were  told  that  the  single  most  important  reason  for 
extending  or  providing  the  waiver  of  the  Antideficiency  Act  was  to 
avoid  an  increase  in  the  contribution  factor  and  lo  and  behold  2 
months later the contribution factor is increased any ways. 

So  I  have  heard  some  practical  arguments  for  extending  the 
waiver,  that  is,  arguments  that  it  will  make  us  operate  a  little  bit 
differently, force us to find ways around the restrictions as a prac-
tical  matter,  but  no  real  principaled  argument  for  why  this  pro-
gram  should  be  treated  so  uniquely.  And  I  think  I’ll  at  least  begin 
there and perhaps it was in the testimony and it’s something I may 
have  missed.  I’ll  be  the  first  to  admit.  Mr.  Talbott,  though,  why 
don’t I begin with you. I think in your testimony you said that you 
support  the  application  of  accounting  rules  to  USAC,  just  not  this 
one. 

What is it about the organization or the program that’s so unique 

that you should be exempted from this standard? 

Mr. TALBOTT. Let me say that under GovGAAP accounting which 
we  are  moving  to,  we  are  doing  that.  We  will  be  under  GovGAAP 
accounting.  What  it  is  is  whether  or  not  the  commitments  or  obli-
gations are not, and that is the point where this piece of legislation 
solves the problem for us. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  I  recognize  the  fact  that  it  solves  the  problem 
for  you.  But  what  is  it  about  you  that’s  so  unique  that  it  should 
be exempted from this? 

Mr. TALBOTT. I think it’s the impact on the schools and libraries. 
If there is no ADA exemption, there will be uncertainty. The poorer 
schools  get  hit  first.  The  budget  process  is  impacted.  Schools  may 
have to discontinue services which actually happened previously. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Are  you  suggesting  that  you  won’t  be  able  to 
spend  $2.25  billion  in  schools  and  libraries  in  the  coming  funding 
year. 

Mr. TALBOTT. I have to have it on hand. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  But  at  the  end  of  the  year,  will  you  spend 

$2.25 billion on libraries and student issues? 

Mr. TALBOTT. Absolutely. 
Senator SUNUNU. The year after that? 
Mr. TALBOTT. I have to have it in the bank. 
Senator SUNUNU. And the year after that? 
Mr. TALBOTT. Yes. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  And  the  year  after  that  assuming  nothing 

changes? 

Mr. TALBOTT. Yes. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  I  appreciate  the  challenge  of  dealing  with  the 
restraints  and  I  certainly  appreciate  the  degree  to  which  this  has 
provided  the  benefits  to  school  districts  represented  here,  but  the 
fact that we have spent money and made a different standard does 
not in an of itself justify spending $2.25 billion. 

I  could  have  $2.25  billion  and  waste  half  of  it  and  make  a  heck 
of  a  difference  with  the  other  half,  but  that  doesn’t  necessarily 
mean it’s a well run, well administered program. And I think a lot 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

53

of  efforts  have  been  made  to  do  better,  to  allocate  these  moneys 
better  and  I  appreciate  the  participation  of  the  school  districts  for 
whom it has made a difference. 

But  I  think  it  makes  it  all  the  more  important  that  we  look  at 
reform  in  the  context  of  Universal  Service,  which  is  another  $4  or 
$6 billion we provide to districts just like Ms. Abshire’s, those with 
a high cost profile and those with a low-income profile and I would 
very much like to see them all considered together. 

Mr. Hamlen, one question for you, you’re a provider, correct? 
Mr. HAMLEN. Yes. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  You’re,  I’m  sure,  very  unique.  My  guess  is  we 
cannot  find  an  operation  in  New  Hampshire  that  looks  anything 
like yours and that’s sort of a tribute to you. But I think the ques-
tion I have applies not just to you but to others. 

Is  it  your  contention,  let’s  say,  hypothetically  the  entire  schools 
and  libraries  program  went  away.  Is  it  your  contention  that  you 
would  not  be  able  or  willing  to  offer  any  discount  to  any  school  or 
library that came to you for service? You’d be forced to charge them 
the same rate that you charge any business or consumer? 

Mr.  HAMLEN.  Yes.  We  would.  The  schools  and  libraries,  the 
health care providers receive a discount. I’ll give you a good exam-
ple. We just won a contract to, under the rural health care program 
to provide telemedicine services to 47 clinics that do not have tele-
medicine services today. 

Now, we need to build out a network that will provide that serv-
ice  which  will  cost  a  substantial  amount,  takes  a  long  time  to  do 
that.  What  is  driving  the  buildout  of  the  network  is  the  rural 
health care program and the funding that is available to the health 
care  provider  to  be  able  to  purchase  that  service,  and  enable  the 
telemedicine  services  at  those  clinics.  So  these  networks  that  we 
have  in  rural  high  cost  areas  are  dependent  on  the  USF  support 
because they cannot be built. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Thank  you.  I  see  my  time  is  up.  Thank  you, 

Madam Chairwoman. 

Senator SNOWE. Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK L. PRYOR,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  I’d  like  to  follow  up 
on  a  couple  of  my  colleagues’  questions  here,  first  with  regard  to 
some of Senator Rockefeller’s questioning about the watering down 
of the commitment letter that you all answered. I believe that was 
you, Mr. Talbott, that answered that. But I’d like to hear if I could 
from  Ms.  Abshire  on  that.  I’d  like  to  know  the  practical  ramifica-
tions of that. 

Ms.  ABSHIRE.  Yes,  Senator.  When  that  first  was  considered  last 

year, it was met with dismay by people in my position. 

Senator PRYOR. Why is that? 
Ms. ABSHIRE. In order for me to be able to seek budget funds for 
a  non-discounted  portion,  I  have  to  have  a  commitment  to  be  able 
to  give  to  my  board  that  tells  them  that  we  are  contracting  only 
for  the  non-discounted  portions.  And  so  when  that  first  came  up, 
there  are  many  of  us  around  the  country  that  explored  that  and 
spoke to legal counsel in our districts. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

54

And  we  were  informed  that  unless  we  had  a  firm  funding  com-
mitment  that  enabled  us  to  go  to  that  board  and  say  that  the  dis-
counted  portion  would  be  covered  by  E-rate,  and  our  board  needed 
to  approve  the  non-discounted  portion,  that  we  were  really  left  in 
a  very  unclear  area,  and  that  we  were  very  reluctant  to  do  so.  We 
did explore that when that concept was put forth last year. 

Senator  PRYOR.  As  I  understand  it,  I  think  it’s  consistent  with 
what  Mr.  Talbott  said  is  that  in  effect  the  watering  down  makes 
it basically unworkable for you. Is that fair to say? 

Ms. ABSHIRE. Yes, sir. That’s fair. 
Senator PRYOR. Mr. Talbott, in connection with Senator Sununu’s 
questions  a  few  moments  ago,  basically  as  I  understand  your  an-
swers, you said you needed the cash on hand before you could dis-
tribute funds, is that right? 

Mr.  TALBOTT.  Right  now.  Not  right  now  because 

the 
Antideficiency  Act—because  of  the  exemption  we  got.  We  would 
have to have those funds and I did misspeak when I supported the 
change  because  we  administer  the  program.  And  through  my  en-
thusiasm  to  get  dollars  out  the  door  to  applicants  and  vendors,  I 
overstated the support because we are not in a position to say sup-
port. Not support. I just wanted to clarify that for the record. 

Senator  PRYOR.  In  other  words,  you  were  talking  about  the  pos-
sible  need  for  cash  on  hand  that  you  actually  had  to  have  the 
money in the account before you could distribute it? 

Mr.  TALBOTT.  Had  to  have  the  money  in  the  account  before  we 
could  distribute  it.  We  needed  the  money  there  in  the  accounts  at 
the time the obligation was made, the cash has to be on hand. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  I  guess  what  Senator  Sununu  was  asking 

was, what is the problem with that? Why is that a problem? 

Mr.  TALBOTT.  It’s  a  problem  because  we  have  with  the  cash, 
when we say we have $3 billion on hand, that’s committed but it’s 
committed  out  over  a  period  of  time.  So  we  would  have  to  raise 
that to $6 billion in order to take care of all of the obligations that 
we have, rather than paying it out as it comes in. 

Senator PRYOR. And I guess, Ms. Abshire, maybe this is best for 
you,  is  timing  important  with  these  requests?  I  mean,  are  these 
time sensitive requests? 

Ms.  ABSHIRE.  Well,  they  are  really  critical  in  terms  of  edu-
cational opportunities. One of the things that was such a derailing 
piece of our planning was when we had planned the infrastructure 
upgrades and put educational programs in place to support the up-
grades and we were not approved. 

The  real  key  is  that  471  process  that  has  all  the  due  diligence 
involved in it to make sure that we have properly contracted serv-
ices, that they are eligible. And that that pristine 471 process gives 
us  the  approval,  and  then  allows  me  to  move  forward  with  engi-
neering  work  and  deployment  across  a  very  large  and  diverse  dis-
trict,  and  put  education  programs  in  place  that  are  going  to  meet 
educational needs. 

So  the  timing  is  everything  in  planning  because  that’s  what  we 
have been asked to do is to plan wisely, strategically use resources 
and  deploy  them  for  increased  educational  opportunities.  Yes,  sir. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Let’s  talk  about  the  educational  needs  because 
now  we  have  No  Child  Left  Behind.  Did  the  E-rate  program,  does 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

55

it  help  your  schools,  does  it  help  schools  make  the  annual  yearly 
progress requirement in No Child Left Behind? 

Ms.  ABSHIRE.  For  us  it  has,  yes,  sir.  We  have  been  able  to—
again,  it’s  the  strategy  of  using  all  the  different  resources  that  we 
are provided to be able to have the connectivity. And then we have 
used  other  funds  to  train  teachers  and  administrators  how  to  use 
that connectivity. That’s been the key piece. 

So  that  students  then,  when  they  are  engaged  in  these  types  of 
activities  in  classrooms  using  the  connections  and  using  the  vast 
resources  on  the  worldwide  web,  that  they  are  used  for  highly 
skilled educational endeavors. 

And  our  communities,  our  business  and  industry  and  folks  that 
are  involved  in  economic  development  tell  us  over  and  over  again, 
we need students that leave our schools that know how to work in 
these  collaborative  environments  and  that  are  really  information 
literate. And if we don’t have the connectivity to model these types 
of  lessons  and  engage  students  in  these  types  of  activities,  we  will 
provide substandard opportunities for them. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Schlick, let me see if I can change gears and 
ask  you  again,  if  I  may,  and  again  touching  on  something  Senator 
Sununu mentioned a few moments ago or he basically talked about 
some  misuse  of  funds  or  he  used  the  term  gold  plating.  I’m  con-
cerned about fraud and I think you mentioned that as well. In your 
opinion,  does  subjecting  USF  to  the  ADA,  does  that  help  prevent 
fraud? 

Mr. SCHLICK. No. The waste, fraud and abuse issue is a different 

one than this question. 

not connected in your view? 

Senator PRYOR. So in other words, it’s not connected, the two are 

Mr. SCHLICK. That is correct. 
Senator  PRYOR.  I  guess  that’s  a  little  bit  counterintuitive  to  me. 

Could you walk through that, please? 

Mr. SCHLICK. The waste, fraud and abuse issues that we are act-
ing very aggressively against concerned the requests for money and 
the  uses  of  money.  That’s  essentially  the  relationship  between 
USAC  as  the  administrator  and  the  recipients  of  the  funds—the 
schools  and  libraries.  And  we  are  talking  about  providers  that  are 
providing their services. 

If it would help, I can give some examples of the kinds of things 
we  are  doing  to  address  those  problems.  Five  things  in  particular. 
We  are  working  very  hard  with  the  Department  of  Justice  to  have 
aggressive  civil  and  criminal  enforcement  against  those  who  abuse 
the program, to enforce the laws and protect the program. 

We  have  expanded  our  own  FCC  audit  program  for  the  E-rate 
program  under  the  direction  of  the  FCC  Inspector  General.  We 
have  added  additional  FCC  staff  to  oversee  the  program,  and  I 
know  that’s  directly  responsive  to  one  of  the  recommendations  of 
GAO in their report that was released last March. 

We are working now with OMB to develop performance measures 
for  the  E-rate  program  to  measure  the  effectiveness  of  the  dollars 
we  are  spending.  Again,  that’s  directly  responsive  to  one  of  GAO’s 
recommendations  and  we  are  providing  USAC  additional  guidance 
concerning the operational issues of the program and details of the 
implementation we think can protect the program funds. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

56

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Senator SNOWE. Senator Rockefeller? 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  I  just  want  to 
follow  on  a  little  bit  of  what  Senator  Pryor  was  questioning.  I’m 
going  to  wander  a  bit  in  making  this  point  which  is  very  unusual 
for me. 

I joined the Peace Corps when it was first started up in 1961 and 
1962.  And  I  think  most  people  would  agree  these  days  that  one  of 
the  great  things  that’s  happening  in  this  country  has  been  the 
United  States  Peace  Corps,  what  it’s  done  for  our  country’s  under-
standing  of  ourselves  and  our  understanding  of  ourselves  as  indi-
viduals. 

I  cannot  possibly  underestimate  to  you,  however,  the  amount  of 
waste,  not  necessarily  fraud  and  abuse  because  that  was  not  the 
intention,  but  I  was  at  that  point  the  director  of  the  Peace  Corps 
program  in  the  Philippines  which  was  the  largest  one.  Had  400 
teachers  going  to  400  Philippine  schools  with  the  exception  of  the 
fact that when the 400 got there, there are about 100 schools miss-
ing. 

Now,  one  can  draw  conclusions  from  that  philosophically.  One 
can  say,  well,  there  goes  the  U.S.  Government  messing  up  again. 
Or one can say, well, there is an entirely new program we were sit-
ting  around  on  the  floor  basically  with  a  lot  of  paper  trying  to  fig-
ure  out  what  to  do  to  startup  something  that  should  never  have 
taken place in this country before, and it did not start easily. It did 
not  start  easily  and  we  made  mistakes  and  we  continue  to  make 
mistakes. 

I can take you through 35 different mistakes that we have made 
that were corrected as the program matured. For example, we used 
to  say  the  rule  used  to  be  that  anybody,  in  order—everybody  went 
to  training  camp.  It  was  the  Philippines.  It  was  out  in  Hawaii, 
which  was  similar  in  some  respects  to  what  they  would  expect  to 
live in. 

And  the  rule  then  was  you  have  to  show  that  you’re—you  have 
to  show  that  you  cannot  do  the  job  in  order  not  to  qualify  to  be  a 
Peace Corps volunteer. Very low disqualification rates. All kinds of 
people were getting in all kinds of trouble, extreme moments of ex-
treme  happy,  wrong  people  marrying  the  wrong  people.  All  kinds 
of bad things. 

So  we  just  said  you  have  to  show  that  you  can  handle  being  a 
Peace  Corps  volunteer,  or  else  you’ll  be  eliminated  from  the  pro-
gram  which  then  eliminated  44  percent  of  all  trainees.  Those  are 
lessons learned from the program that is just beginning, these two 
that I reflect on having in the first two years. 

You  know,  Medicare,  boy,  I’d  love  to  do  a  study  on  waste,  fraud 
and abuse on Medicare, and I say this with all due respect to Sen-
ator  Sununu,  who  I  greatly  respect  for  many  reasons,  that  there 
it’s  systemic.  There  are  CDs  that  are  sent  around  to  physicians 
saying  how  you  could  take  advantage  of  Medicare  rates  and  get 
more for your money, et cetera. I think that would be a little hard-
er to do these days but nevertheless, that was endemic. 

And  yes,  it  is  true  I  can  remember  as  can  Senator  Snowe  when 
the  first  head  of  USAC  had  to  resign  because  the  Congress  in  our 
infinite  wisdom  and  then  carried  by  some  real  examples  where 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

57

there  was  vendor  waste,  fraud  and  abuse,  et  cetera.  These  stories 
caught  on  and  this  poor  fellow  who  was  absolutely  terrific  had  to 
resign. He just flat-out had to resign and he was very good at doing 
his best. And you remember that, and it was a tragic circumstance. 
I  would  then  say  that  the  coverage  of  classrooms  has  gone  from 
in  1996  and  1997,  probably  when  the  program  began  or  maybe 
1998 when it was actually put into effect, from 14 percent of class-
rooms  to  93  percent  of  classrooms,  in  just  over  6  or  7  years.  This 
is absolutely phenomenal. 

California started off with 15 percent of their classrooms covered 
and  they  are  now  up  to—Houston  had  zero  through  wireless,  they 
are  now  up  to  100  percent.  And  so  the  story  on  the  good  side  is 
so  much  better  than  virtually  any  other  government  program  that 
I  can  even  think  of.  I’m  forced  to  look  at  the  public  good  as  well 
as the problems. 

You,  Mr.  Schlick,  have  detailed  and  I  was  going  to  ask  you  this 
question, some of the things that the FCC and USAC and you have 
made rule changes. And you are doing things, both of you, to make 
major  changes  that  are  ongoing.  They  have  been  ongoing.  They 
continue  to  be  ongoing.  When  your  funding  continues  to  be  termi-
nated, I would think you would tend to ongo with it. 

Then  I  would  make  the  final  point,  Madam  Chair,  that  waste, 
fraud  and  abuse  is  not  accomplished  or  found  in  the  U.S.  Govern-
ment.  The  money  sits  in  the  government  and  then  it’s  sent  out  to 
the  schools.  And  sure,  there  was  a  period  of  time  and  there  may 
still be like some examples of where schools that have not handled 
this  before,  little  schools  in  rural  parts  of  Alaska  or  Louisiana  or 
West Virginia, where they are not used to handling the paperwork, 
where  it’s  like  you  are  going  to  get  a  grant  from  the  government 
you better have somebody that can write a grant. And nobody ever 
does in rural communities. 

And  the  same  thing  when  you’re  starting  up  a  program.  You 
make  a  mistake  or  a  vendor  takes  advantage  of  the  fact  that  you 
cannot do it properly, and those things do occur. Nobody is denying 
that.  But  if  you’re  correcting  them  virtually  all  of  these  areas  are 
now  covered,  and  the  benefit  to  the  United  States  is  I  think  im-
measurable. And once again, as you said, Mr. Schlick, that the non-
passage  of  the  ADA  or  the  passage  of  the  ADA,  either  way,  would 
have absolutely nothing to do with waste, fraud and abuse. 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  That  is  correct,  Senator.  The  Antideficiency  Act  is 
essentially a budget mechanism, the purpose of which is to prevent 
Federal  agencies  from  coming  to  Congress  in  need  of  additional 
money  because  they  have  overobligated.  Here,  of  course,  contribu-
tions are made by the industry rather than by direct congressional 
appropriation,  and  that’s  the  thrust  of  the  Act,  which  is  different 
from  the  focus  on  how  the  moneys  are  used  once  they  are  made 
available. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Senator Rockefeller. 
Just to followup on a couple of issues because I think it is impor-
tant  to  clarify  to  some  extent,  and  I  know  that  it’s  somewhat  un-
derstood.  On  the  issue  of  the  appropriations  because  it’s  a  big  dif-
ference between an appropriation and getting periodically through-
out  the  year  the  revenues  from  a  surcharge.  Is  not  that  the  way 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

58

it  is  funded,  Mr.  Talbott,  in  this  instance,  the  Universal  Service 
Fund? It’s the surcharges that are applied? 

Mr. TALBOTT. Yes. 
Senator SNOWE. So you don’t have the funds in hand consistently 
throughout the year in order to honor those letter of commitments, 
is that correct? 

Mr. TALBOTT. They are ongoing. 
Senator  SNOWE.  The  courts  have  recognized  it’s  a  unique  way  of 
financing  the  programs  so  it’s  not  dependent  like  other  programs 
on a one-time appropriation for the full cost of the program. It’s on-
going  throughout  the  year,  depending  on  how  the  surcharges  are 
collected, is that correct? 

Mr. TALBOTT. That is correct. 
Senator  SNOWE.  That  answers  the  problem.  Now  the  question  is 
why  OMB’s  directive  has  wreaked  such  havoc  because  it’s  making 
the same, drawing the same correlation between a one-time appro-
priation  and  ongoing  surcharge.  You’re  not  going  to  have  all  the 
money  for  those  commitments  there  at  any  one  time  but  that  you 
always  have  the  money  for  that  purpose  at  the  time  in  which 
you’re honoring the commitments, is that correct? 

Mr.  TALBOTT.  That  is  correct.  Through  the  quarterly  contribu-

tion. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Right.  So  it  seems  to  me  that  it  just  doesn’t 
make  practical  sense  to  be  requiring  the  Fund  to  adhere  to  the 
same standard as those agencies that receive a one-time appropria-
tion.  Not  to  mention  the  fact  that  it’s  not  a  tax  revenue.  I  mean, 
it’s  not  considered  as  taxes  at  least  in  the  court  mandates.  That’s 
OMB originally. I understand it’s a different administration but the 
fact of the matter is it did apply it. 

The question is what is the net result? And that’s the issue here 
because  ultimately  it’s  had  a  net  effect  of  placing  enormous  uncer-
tainty  in  the  program.  It  has  cost  the  program  a  great  deal  of 
money  and  yes,  we  are  to  resolve  the  issues  for  the  long  term,  but 
there is a way in which to do all this. 

It’s  not  as  if  the  FCC  does  not  have  broad  legal  authority—and 
I’d like to follow that, Mr. Schlick, about what you are doing to es-
tablish  orderly  audits,  to  make  sure  we  are  not  encountering  any 
potential  abuses.  And  I  know,  Ms.  Dalton,  you  have  done  a  very 
good  job  in  your  analysis  and  as  Senator  Rockefeller  indicated, 
where there are problems, many of them have been resolved. 

And I think it’s as a result of the FCC’s high profile cases in try-
ing to ferret out the abuses is what got the attention of OMB. Mr. 
Schlick,  do  you  have  broad  authority  under  the  law,  under  the 
Telecommunications  Act  of  1996,  to  administer  the  USF  and  do 
anything you need to do in order to be sure that these moneys are 
being appropriately administered? 

Mr. SCHLICK. We do have broad authority and to that I’d add the 
statutes  that  the  Department  of  Justice  can  enforce,  antitrust  and 
other, to bring actions against those who would abuse the program. 

Senator SNOWE. Are you using them? 
Mr.  SCHLICK.  We  are  attempting  to.  I  have  outlined  some  of  the 
ways  and  let  me  just  highlight  those  again.  We  are  working  on 
criminal  enforcement  in  many  cases  through  the  Department  of 
Justice,  as  well  as  civil.  We  are  recovering  funds  and  securing 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

59

criminal  prosecutions.  We  have  expanded  our  audit  program.  We 
have  an  expansive  audit  program  now,  which  Ms.  Gelb  can  give 
you further details if you’re interested. 

We  have  extended  additional  resources  to  oversight  of  the  pro-
gram,  performance  measurements  to  be  sure  that  the  program  is 
doing what it is intended to do, and attempting to work with USAC 
to develop procedures that are as tight as possible. 

Mr.  TALBOTT.  We  cooperate  with  USAC,  with  law  enforcement 
and  have  a  close  working  relationship  with  the  FCC  in  this  area. 
In  fact,  working  with  the  FCC–IG,  we  are  beginning  to  launch  a 
program for 700 beneficiary audits across all four mechanisms. And 
I think the work that we are doing cooperatively is addressing this 
issue,  and  we  will  continue  to  address  the  issue  because  we  want 
to solve the problem. 

Senator  SNOWE.  If  this—if  the  ADA  is  back  to  the  full  USF  and 
I gather you are thinking it would once it expires at the end of this 
year, would you have to suspend the high cost program? 

Mr. TALBOTT. We would have to raise——
Senator SNOWE. Or double——
Mr. TALBOTT. Raise the contribution factor or suspend it. 
Senator SNOWE. 21, 25 percent? 
Mr. TALBOTT. 21, 22 percent based on today’s contribution. 
Senator SNOWE. What would be the net effect of that? 
Mr. TALBOTT. Significant. 
Mr.  SCHLICK.  Senator  Snowe,  I  would  expect  that  USAC  would 
follow  our  direction  on  that.  And  the  direction  we  gave  them  in 
September  is  the  way  the  Fund  is  now  being  operated  and  is  con-
sistent  with  the  Antideficiency  Act.  So  based  on  our  view  at  this 
point,  we  don’t  think  that  those  sorts  of  modifications  will  be  nec-
essary. 

Senator SNOWE. Mr. Talbott? 
Mr.  TALBOTT.  We  have  that  question  in  writing  and  we  are  still 

waiting for a result on that. 

Senator SNOWE. Question you are providing to whom? 
Mr. TALBOTT. To the FCC. 
Senator  SNOWE.  So  you’re  not  convinced  that  this—you  want  to 

see their explanation? 

Mr. TALBOTT. I’m not convinced at this point. Just need clarifica-

Senator  SNOWE.  That’s  important.  We  know  that  OMB  has  not 
responded, is that correct? Now, how does OMB feel about that? Do 
they feel that it consistently applies to the ADA at this point? 

Mr. SCHLICK. Yes. The Antideficiency Act applies. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Do  they  think  that  it  does?  Do  they  think  cur-

rently the high cost low cost program does? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  You  are  correct.  We  are  awaiting  OMB’s  view  on 

tion. 

that. 

Senator  SNOWE.  So  you  don’t  know  whether  or  not  they  agreed 

with your assessment? 

Mr. SCHLICK. Yes. The response that Mr.——
Mr. TALBOTT. It refers to what was provided by the FCC on Octo-

ber 2004 to the USF. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Ms.  Dalton,  in  your  report,  I’d  be  interested, 
Congress  could  give  the  FCC  broad  authority  back  in  the  Tele-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

60

communications Act in 1996 when we were drafting all this legisla-
tion  to  oversee  the  Universal  Service  Fund.  You  understand  all 
these issues obviously. 

I  think  the  question  is,  is  there  another  way,  I  mean  does  the 
ADA really fit in this case. I mean, in terms of being applicable to 
the  exigencies  of  this  program,  when  you  consider  how  they  get 
their  funds,  and  whether  or  not  it  takes  either  a  period  of  adjust-
ment  for  several  years  or  whatever  the  case  may  be,  I  really  don’t 
know,  but  what  I  do  know  is  the  net  effect  of  what  has  occurred. 
And so again, it gets back to common sense and practicality here. 
Not  that  we  all  disagree  with  the  ultimate  goal,  but  the  question 
is,  can  you  achieve  that  goal  in  another  way.  And  you  know,  all  I 
can  say  is  somebody  once  said  government  does  more  harm  inad-
vertently  than  it  does  by  design.  And  so  I  think  that’s  the  bottom 
line  of  what  has  happened  here  with  respect  to  this  program  and 
the directive from OMB. 

Ms.  DALTON.  With  ADA,  basically  it’s  saying  that  you  have  to 
have the resources available for the obligations that you’re commit-
ting  to.  But  I  think  when  you  look  at  it,  it  was  designed—and  the 
way it’s interpreted at this point—for your typical government pro-
gram. And so it doesn’t take into account in many ways the unique-
ness of this program in terms of the resources it has available and 
how the money comes into the program, as well as how it goes out. 
So there may in fact be some other alternatives on how to address 
this issue. 

For  example,  using  a  targeted  approach,  the  anticipated  reve-
nues coming into the program could be included as a budgetary re-
source. Similarly, on the other side in the commitments, USAC has 
had  the  experience  over  the  last  7  years  of  sending  out  commit-
ment  letters,  but  obviously  not  all  of  those  commitments  are  real-
ized over the course of time. There may be 20 percent unexpended. 
I  don’t  know  exactly  what  the  number  is  that  the  schools  and  li-
braries  have  not  been  able  to  use  because  they  have  had  savings 
out there. 

So  there  is  a  way  on  the  commitment  side  that  hopefully  with 
some guidance from Congress, they may be able to say that we are 
committing  $100  million,  but  we  recognize  from  experience  that 
only $80 million of that will actually be spent. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Mr.  Talbott,  how  would  you  respond  to  that? 

saying? 

Would you respond to what Ms. Dalton just said? 

Mr. TALBOTT. FCC has allowed those funds to be rolled over into 
the next year. If we have unused funds this year, they apply to the 
next year. So we are only a year behind with those funds. 

Senator  SNOWE.  You  are  only  a  year  behind,  is  that  what  you’re 

Mr. TALBOTT. Yes. Behind. 
Senator SNOWE. Did you want, Ms. Gelb——
Ms.  GELB.  There  is  a  rollover  rule  that  we  created  a  couple  of 
years ago. If the question is every year the $2.2 billion being spent, 
I  think  the  answer  is  no.  But  there  is  an  increase  potentially  be-
cause of this rollover procedure that we have. 

Senator SNOWE. So the commitment is they may be higher, they 
may  not  go  up  to  the  $2.2  billion.  I  see.  But  the  commitments  are 
greater than that? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

61

Mr. TALBOTT. Commitments are there. Then you adjust it. 
Senator SNOWE. I appreciate that. Senator Sununu? 
Senator  SUNUNU.  Thank  you.  Couple  of  points  of  clarification. 
First, it’s my opinion or my concern is much less for rural districts 
cited  by  Senator  Rockefeller,  rural  Alaska,  rural  Maine  for  that 
matter, much less with their actions to effectively request and allo-
cate  and  apply  this  money  than  it  is  for,  say,  large  urban  districts 
and suburban districts that don’t necessarily need the resources as 
much as those rural districts. 

So  I  just  want  to  be  clear  about  where  my  concerns  lie.  I  want 
to  make  sure  all  of  them  are  using  it  efficiently,  but  I  don’t  think 
anywhere in my remarks I suggested that I thought rural districts 
did  a  poorer  job  than  others  in  performing  in  the  use  of  these 
funds. 

Second,  with  regard  to  Mr.  Schlick,  you  made  the  observation 
that  the  Antideficiency  Act—in  and  of 
itself,  applying  the 
Antideficiency  Act  did  not  address  the  issues  of  waste,  fraud  and 
abuse.  And  I  think  that  point  is  technically  correct  and  from  your 
position,  but  from  a  practical  matter  let  us  all  be  honest  about 
what is happening here. We have legislation that proponents of the 
E-rate program in its current form want to see passed. 

We  see  concerns  for  reform  that  I  and  many  others  I  would  as-
sume have. We see discussion about a telecommunications bill and 
Universal  Service  reform  that  is  also  taking  place.  And  what  is 
really  the  question  is  if  the  proponents  want  to  exempt  this  pro-
gram  from  the  ADA,  then  we  have  an  opportunity  to  force  and  re-
quire  additional  reforms  to  move  perhaps  in  conjunction  with  that 
legislation, or as part of a telecommunications bill. 

So  exemption  from  the  ADA  in  and  of  itself  may  not  address 
these  reform  issues,  but  from  a  practical  matter  they  are  abso-
lutely,  I  think,  should  be  on  the  table,  part  of  this  discussion  and 
considered as part of this discussion because proponents of the pro-
gram  are  obviously  pursuing  an  exemption  from  these  accounting 
standards. 

That’s why I think it’s important. But in and of itself, the appli-
cation  of  the  ADA  or  lack  of  application,  is  not  going  to  address 
fraud  and  abuse,  but  this  is  an  opportunity  to  make  sure  the  pro-
gram works as well as it possibly can. 

Mr.  Talbott,  a  couple  of  final  technical  questions.  I  think  you 
were  asked  before,  but  I  did  not  hear  the  specific  response.  How 
much  do  you  have  on  hand,  does  the  corporation  have  on  hand 
now? 

Mr. TALBOTT. Right about $3 billion. About $3.1 billion. 
Senator SUNUNU. How much of that has been committed? I have 

to ask that question. 

Mr. TALBOTT. $2.5 billion is committed. 
Senator SUNUNU. So you have already committed more than you 

are allowed to spend? 

ber. 

Mr. TALBOTT. We are going back—that’s how we get to that num-

Senator  SUNUNU.  How  much  of  that  previous—is  for  previous 

funding years and how much is for current funding years? 

Mr. TALBOTT. I will get you that information. I do not have those 

numbers with me. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

62

Senator  SUNUNU.  Nobody  back  there  has  that  number?  It  actu-

ally seems like a both simple and important number. 

Mr. TALBOTT. We will get it to you. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you  all  very  much  for  being  here  this 
afternoon  not  to  resolve  these  issues  today,  but  hopefully  we  will 
resolve it this year, so we can provide it and it’s essential. And also 
address  the  other  issues  that  have  been  discussed.  This  hearing  is 
adjourned. 

(Whereupon, at 3:55 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.)

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Nov 30, 2005 Jkt 021486 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21486.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

